(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“...see the vision of educational opportunity become a reality...”
“Standing on the shoulders of giants such as Milton Friedman strengthened by the pioneering work of countless allies and empowered by the promises set forth in Brown v Board of Education the Alliance is committed to the work of leading school choice into a new era one that will ultimately...”
“The Alliance for School Choice is the legacy of many years of advancing the cause of educational opportunity.”
“Together with its sister lobbying organization, Advocates for School Choice – and in close collaboration with state and national allies – the Alliance is devoted to assisting local efforts to implement successful and transformative school choice programs throughout the country.”
“The Alliance for School Choice is the only national policy organization devoted exclusively to promoting school choice programs that expand private sector opportunities, primarily for economically disadvantaged children.”
“After significant research and planning, on May 17, 2004 – the 50th anniversary of Brown v. Board of Education – this initiative became a reality, as the Alliance for School Choice was launched.”
“With this in mind, scholars, allies, philanthropists and activists discussed the creation of a single, national, high capacity initiative that could lead school choice into its most exciting era.”
“Throughout this period of tremendous growth, it became increasingly clear that the school choice movement would need to develop a national infrastructure and vision in order to achieve sustainable success.”
“In 2002, the movement earned a momentous triumph with the U.S. Supreme Court’s decision on the constitutionality of the Cleveland scholarship program in the 2002 Zelman v. Simmons-Harris decision.”
“With the development of these programs came the institution of multiple state-based and national organizations (link to allies page) whose function was the protection and expansion of school choice.”


...see the vision of educational opportunity become a reality...
Standing on the shoulders of giants such as Milton Friedman strengthened by the pioneering work of countless allies and empowered by the promises set forth in Brown v Board of Education the Alliance is committed to the work of leading school choice into a new era one that will ultimately...
The Alliance for School Choice is the legacy of many years of advancing the cause of educational opportunity.
Together with its sister lobbying organization, Advocates for School Choice – and in close collaboration with state and national allies – the Alliance is devoted to assisting local efforts to implement successful and transformative school choice programs throughout the country.
The Alliance for School Choice is the only national policy organization devoted exclusively to promoting school choice programs that expand private sector opportunities, primarily for economically disadvantaged children.
After significant research and planning, on May 17, 2004 – the 50th anniversary of Brown v. Board of Education – this initiative became a reality, as the Alliance for School Choice was launched.
With this in mind, scholars, allies, philanthropists and activists discussed the creation of a single, national, high capacity initiative that could lead school choice into its most exciting era.
Throughout this period of tremendous growth, it became increasingly clear that the school choice movement would need to develop a national infrastructure and vision in order to achieve sustainable success.
In 2002, the movement earned a momentous triumph with the U.S. Supreme Court’s decision on the constitutionality of the Cleveland scholarship program in the 2002 Zelman v. Simmons-Harris decision.
With the development of these programs came the institution of multiple state-based and national organizations (link to allies page) whose function was the protection and expansion of school choice.



**Something goes wrong**
“How we gonna pay the heating bills?”
“* Winter’s coming.”
“She believes bravery lives in every heart and her expectation is that it will be summoned.”
“You know, she taught her children—all the children who flocked to our house—that you are defined by your sense of honor, and you are redeemed by your loyalty.”
“Get up.”I wish that my dad was here tonight, but I am so grateful that my mom, Catherine Eugenia Finnegan Biden, is here.”
“With a dad who fell on hard economic times, but who always told me: “Champ, when you get knocked down, get up.”
“Mine began in Scranton, Pennsylvania, and then Wilmington, Delaware.”
“...the phone Barack Obama and I took very different journeys to this destination but we share a common story...”
“For every American who is trying to do the right thing for all those people in government who are honoring their pledge to uphold the law and respect our Constitution no longer will the eight most dreaded words in the English language be The vice president s office is on...”
“Let me make this pledge to you right here and now.”


How we gonna pay the heating bills?
* Winter’s coming.
She believes bravery lives in every heart and her expectation is that it will be summoned.
You know, she taught her children—all the children who flocked to our house—that you are defined by your sense of honor, and you are redeemed by your loyalty.
Get up.”I wish that my dad was here tonight, but I am so grateful that my mom, Catherine Eugenia Finnegan Biden, is here.
With a dad who fell on hard economic times, but who always told me: “Champ, when you get knocked down, get up.
Mine began in Scranton, Pennsylvania, and then Wilmington, Delaware.
...the phone Barack Obama and I took very different journeys to this destination but we share a common story...
For every American who is trying to do the right thing for all those people in government who are honoring their pledge to uphold the law and respect our Constitution no longer will the eight most dreaded words in the English language be The vice president s office is on...
Let me make this pledge to you right here and now.



**Something goes wrong**
“His prescriptions for job creation would work about as well in practice as his prayer-based attempt to end Texas’s crippling drought.”
“But it needs lots of new jobs just to keep up with its rising population — and as those unemployment comparisons show, recent employment growth has fallen well short of what’s needed.”
“In particular, there’s a good case to be made that zoning policies in many states unnecessarily restrict the supply of housing, and that this is one area where Texas does in fact do something right.”
“But what does population growth have to do with job growth?”
“Well, the high rate of population growth translates into above-average job growth through a couple of channels.”
“Many of the people moving to Texas — retirees in search of warm winters, middle-class Mexicans in search of a safer life — bring purchasing power that leads to greater local employment.”
“At the same time, the rapid growth in the Texas work force keeps wages low — nearly 10 percent of hourly Texan workers earn the minimum wage or less, well above the national average — and these low wages give corporations an incentive to move production to the Lone Star State.”
“So Texas tends, in good years and bad, to have higher job growth than the rest of America.”
“If this picture doesn’t look very much like the glowing portrait Texas boosters like to paint, there’s a reason: the glowing portrait is false.”
“So when Mr. Perry presents himself as the candidate who knows how to create jobs, don’t believe him.”


His prescriptions for job creation would work about as well in practice as his prayer-based attempt to end Texas’s crippling drought.
But it needs lots of new jobs just to keep up with its rising population — and as those unemployment comparisons show, recent employment growth has fallen well short of what’s needed.
In particular, there’s a good case to be made that zoning policies in many states unnecessarily restrict the supply of housing, and that this is one area where Texas does in fact do something right.
But what does population growth have to do with job growth?
Well, the high rate of population growth translates into above-average job growth through a couple of channels.
Many of the people moving to Texas — retirees in search of warm winters, middle-class Mexicans in search of a safer life — bring purchasing power that leads to greater local employment.
At the same time, the rapid growth in the Texas work force keeps wages low — nearly 10 percent of hourly Texan workers earn the minimum wage or less, well above the national average — and these low wages give corporations an incentive to move production to the Lone Star State.
So Texas tends, in good years and bad, to have higher job growth than the rest of America.
If this picture doesn’t look very much like the glowing portrait Texas boosters like to paint, there’s a reason: the glowing portrait is false.
So when Mr. Perry presents himself as the candidate who knows how to create jobs, don’t believe him.



Number  3
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As he wrote, “The opportunity society calls not for a laissez-faire society in which the economic world is a neutral jungle of purely random individual behavior, but for forceful government intervention on behalf of growth and opportunity.””
“His 1984 book, “Window of Opportunity,” is a broadside against what he calls the “laissez-faire” conservatism — the idea that government should just get out of the way so the market can flourish.”
“It is one of the most consistent themes of his career.”
“All of these are examples of government bringing about public purposes without creating massive taxpayer-funded bureaucracies.”This was not one of Gingrich’s passing fads.”
“We used what were in effect public-private partnerships to bring telephone service and electricity to every community in our nation.”
“The Homestead Act essentially gave away land to those willing to live on it and develop it.”
“I recognize that there are times when you need government to help spur private enterprise and economic development.”Look at American history, Gingrich continued, “The government provided railroad land grants to encourage widespread adoption of what was then the most modern form of transportation to develop our country.”
“As he said in 2007, “It’s not a point of view libertarians would embrace, but I am more in the Alexander Hamilton-Teddy Roosevelt tradition of conservatism.”
“Despite his erratically shifting views and odd phases, he continually returns to this core political refrain: He talks about using government in energetic but limited ways to increase growth, dynamism and social mobility.”
“Of all the major Republicans, the one who comes closest to my worldview is Newt Gingrich.”


As he wrote, “The opportunity society calls not for a laissez-faire society in which the economic world is a neutral jungle of purely random individual behavior, but for forceful government intervention on behalf of growth and opportunity.”
His 1984 book, “Window of Opportunity,” is a broadside against what he calls the “laissez-faire” conservatism — the idea that government should just get out of the way so the market can flourish.
It is one of the most consistent themes of his career.
All of these are examples of government bringing about public purposes without creating massive taxpayer-funded bureaucracies.”This was not one of Gingrich’s passing fads.
We used what were in effect public-private partnerships to bring telephone service and electricity to every community in our nation.
The Homestead Act essentially gave away land to those willing to live on it and develop it.
I recognize that there are times when you need government to help spur private enterprise and economic development.”Look at American history, Gingrich continued, “The government provided railroad land grants to encourage widespread adoption of what was then the most modern form of transportation to develop our country.
As he said in 2007, “It’s not a point of view libertarians would embrace, but I am more in the Alexander Hamilton-Teddy Roosevelt tradition of conservatism.
Despite his erratically shifting views and odd phases, he continually returns to this core political refrain: He talks about using government in energetic but limited ways to increase growth, dynamism and social mobility.
Of all the major Republicans, the one who comes closest to my worldview is Newt Gingrich.



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“On balance, we rate the statement Mostly True.”
“...as evidence that domestic oil production is on a healthy trendline...”
“"We need to continue to boost domestic production of oil and gas," he said.”
“"Last year, American oil production reached its highest level since 2003.”
“Let me repeat that.”
“Our oil production reached its highest level in seven years.”
“Oil production from federal waters in the Gulf of Mexico reached an all-time high.”
“For the first time in more than a decade, imports accounted for less than half of what we consumed.”
“So any notion that my administration has shut down oil production might make for a good political sound bite but it doesn t match up with reality In this item we ll check the first piece of evidence to support his contention that his administration hasn t shut down oil...”
“...production that last year American oil production reached its highest level since 2003”


On balance, we rate the statement Mostly True.
...as evidence that domestic oil production is on a healthy trendline...
"We need to continue to boost domestic production of oil and gas," he said.
"Last year, American oil production reached its highest level since 2003.
Let me repeat that.
Our oil production reached its highest level in seven years.
Oil production from federal waters in the Gulf of Mexico reached an all-time high.
For the first time in more than a decade, imports accounted for less than half of what we consumed.
So any notion that my administration has shut down oil production might make for a good political sound bite but it doesn t match up with reality In this item we ll check the first piece of evidence to support his contention that his administration hasn t shut down oil...
...production that last year American oil production reached its highest level since 2003



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“###”
“The repayments also increase Treasury's cushion to respond to any future financial instability that might otherwise jeopardize economic recovery.”
“These repayments help to reduce Treasury's borrowing and national debt.”
“Under the Emergency Economic Stabilization Act, proceeds from repayment will be applied to Treasury's general account.”
“Dividend payments received for all CPP participants are approximately $4.5 billion to date.”
“In addition to Treasury's potential income from sale of the warrants, these 10 institutions have already paid dividends on the preferred stock totaling approximately $1.8 billion over the last seven months.”
“Under the CPP investment agreements, firms that repay their preferred stock have the right to repurchase the warrants Treasury holds in their firms at fair market value.”
“Also, for the first time in many months, these banks have issued long-term debt that is not guaranteed by the government.”
“These repayments follow a period in which many banks have successfully raised equity capital from private investors.”
“"These repayments are an encouraging sign of financial repair, but we still have work to do," said Secretary Tim Geithner.”


###
The repayments also increase Treasury's cushion to respond to any future financial instability that might otherwise jeopardize economic recovery.
These repayments help to reduce Treasury's borrowing and national debt.
Under the Emergency Economic Stabilization Act, proceeds from repayment will be applied to Treasury's general account.
Dividend payments received for all CPP participants are approximately $4.5 billion to date.
In addition to Treasury's potential income from sale of the warrants, these 10 institutions have already paid dividends on the preferred stock totaling approximately $1.8 billion over the last seven months.
Under the CPP investment agreements, firms that repay their preferred stock have the right to repurchase the warrants Treasury holds in their firms at fair market value.
Also, for the first time in many months, these banks have issued long-term debt that is not guaranteed by the government.
These repayments follow a period in which many banks have successfully raised equity capital from private investors.
"These repayments are an encouraging sign of financial repair, but we still have work to do," said Secretary Tim Geithner.



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Tax Rates Marriage Penalties Payroll Representative Families Retirement Savings by Type of Table All Types of Tables Distribution Tables by Dollar Income Class Distribution Tables by Percentile Distribution Tables by Size of Tax Cut Revenue Tables Other Tables Descriptions of Laws and Proposals...”
“Act Accelerate Provisions in EGTRRA 2001 Tax Act Make Provisions in EGTRRA Permanent 2001 Tax Act Freeze Provisions in EGTRRA by Tax Topic All Tax Topics Alternative Minimum Tax Capital Gains Child Tax Credit Dividends Earned Income Tax Credit Estate and Gift Health Care Low Income Families and Children Marginal...”
“Growth Jobs Package 2004 Tax Act Working Families Tax Relief Act Featured 2005 Tax Acts 2003 Tax Act Democratic Alternative to Administration Plan 2006 Tax Acts 2003 Tax Act Administration Proposal 2002 Tax Act Job Creation and Worker Assistance Act 2001 Tax Act Economic Growth and Reconciliation Act 2001 Tax...”
“2001 and 2003 Tax Acts 2003 Tax Act Jobs and Growth Tax Relief Reconciliation Act 2003 Tax Act JGTRRA as Passed by the Senate 2003 Tax Act Senate Finance Committee Modified Jobs and Growth Tax Act 2003 Tax Act Senate Democratic Plan 2003 Tax Act House Ways and Means Economic...”
“Search Tax Tables by Laws Bills Proposals All Laws Bills and Proposals Current Law Distribution of Current Law and Recent Tax Cuts Kerry Economic Proposals Revenue Raising Options 2003 Child Credit Plan Senate 2003 Child Credit Plan House JGTRRA and EGTRRA Combined 2004 Middle Class Tax Cuts Repeal Elements of...”


Tax Rates Marriage Penalties Payroll Representative Families Retirement Savings by Type of Table All Types of Tables Distribution Tables by Dollar Income Class Distribution Tables by Percentile Distribution Tables by Size of Tax Cut Revenue Tables Other Tables Descriptions of Laws and Proposals...
Act Accelerate Provisions in EGTRRA 2001 Tax Act Make Provisions in EGTRRA Permanent 2001 Tax Act Freeze Provisions in EGTRRA by Tax Topic All Tax Topics Alternative Minimum Tax Capital Gains Child Tax Credit Dividends Earned Income Tax Credit Estate and Gift Health Care Low Income Families and Children Marginal...
Growth Jobs Package 2004 Tax Act Working Families Tax Relief Act Featured 2005 Tax Acts 2003 Tax Act Democratic Alternative to Administration Plan 2006 Tax Acts 2003 Tax Act Administration Proposal 2002 Tax Act Job Creation and Worker Assistance Act 2001 Tax Act Economic Growth and Reconciliation Act 2001 Tax...
2001 and 2003 Tax Acts 2003 Tax Act Jobs and Growth Tax Relief Reconciliation Act 2003 Tax Act JGTRRA as Passed by the Senate 2003 Tax Act Senate Finance Committee Modified Jobs and Growth Tax Act 2003 Tax Act Senate Democratic Plan 2003 Tax Act House Ways and Means Economic...
Search Tax Tables by Laws Bills Proposals All Laws Bills and Proposals Current Law Distribution of Current Law and Recent Tax Cuts Kerry Economic Proposals Revenue Raising Options 2003 Child Credit Plan Senate 2003 Child Credit Plan House JGTRRA and EGTRRA Combined 2004 Middle Class Tax Cuts Repeal Elements of...



**Something goes wrong**
“And one of the things I bring is a perspective as a community organizer, as a state legislator, as well as a U.S. senator, that says: Washington has to change.”
“But part of it is also overcoming special interests and lobbyists who are writing legislation that's critical to the American people.”
“First of all, thank you for inviting us here in The Citadel.”
“SEN. CHRISTOPHER DODD: Well, I think so.”
“Can you honestly say you're any different?”
“COOPER: Senator Dodd, you've been in Congress more than 30 years.”
“How are you going to be any different?”
“I mean, be honest with us.”
“What's going to make you any more effectual, beyond all the platitudes and the stuff we're used to hearing?”
“We have a Congress and a president with, like, a 30 percent approval rating, so clearly we don't think they're doing a good job.”


And one of the things I bring is a perspective as a community organizer, as a state legislator, as well as a U.S. senator, that says: Washington has to change.
But part of it is also overcoming special interests and lobbyists who are writing legislation that's critical to the American people.
First of all, thank you for inviting us here in The Citadel.
SEN. CHRISTOPHER DODD: Well, I think so.
Can you honestly say you're any different?
COOPER: Senator Dodd, you've been in Congress more than 30 years.
How are you going to be any different?
I mean, be honest with us.
What's going to make you any more effectual, beyond all the platitudes and the stuff we're used to hearing?
We have a Congress and a president with, like, a 30 percent approval rating, so clearly we don't think they're doing a good job.



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In recent days, Russia has talked of an invasion of Georgia to attack Chechen rebels.”
“If we were to attack Iraq now, alone or with few allies, it would set a precedent that could come back to haunt us.”
“...lab equipped to produce anthrax and other bio weapons as well as substantial nuclear facilities...”
“And though he repeatedly lied delayed and obstructed the inspections work the inspectors found and destroyed far more weapons of mass destruction capability than were destroyed in the Gulf War including thousands of chemical weapons large volumes of chemical and biological stocks a number of missiles and warheads a major...”
“Saddam Hussein agreed, and an inspection system was set up to ensure compliance.”
“As a condition for ending the conflict, the United Nations imposed a number of requirements on Iraq, among them disarmament of all weapons of mass destruction, stocks used to make such weapons, and laboratories necessary to do the work.”
“The U.S.-led coalition then withdrew, leaving the Kurds and the Shiites, who had risen against Saddam Hussein at our urging, to Saddam's revenge.”
“The first President Bush assembled a global coalition, including many Arab states, and threw Saddam out after forty-three days of bombing and a hundred hours of ground operations.”
“In 1991, Saddam Hussein invaded and occupied Kuwait, losing the support of the United States.”
“Unfortunately, during the 1980's, while he engaged in such horrific activity, he enjoyed the support of the American government, because he had oil and was seen as a counterweight to the Ayatollah Khomeini in Iran.”


In recent days, Russia has talked of an invasion of Georgia to attack Chechen rebels.
If we were to attack Iraq now, alone or with few allies, it would set a precedent that could come back to haunt us.
...lab equipped to produce anthrax and other bio weapons as well as substantial nuclear facilities...
And though he repeatedly lied delayed and obstructed the inspections work the inspectors found and destroyed far more weapons of mass destruction capability than were destroyed in the Gulf War including thousands of chemical weapons large volumes of chemical and biological stocks a number of missiles and warheads a major...
Saddam Hussein agreed, and an inspection system was set up to ensure compliance.
As a condition for ending the conflict, the United Nations imposed a number of requirements on Iraq, among them disarmament of all weapons of mass destruction, stocks used to make such weapons, and laboratories necessary to do the work.
The U.S.-led coalition then withdrew, leaving the Kurds and the Shiites, who had risen against Saddam Hussein at our urging, to Saddam's revenge.
The first President Bush assembled a global coalition, including many Arab states, and threw Saddam out after forty-three days of bombing and a hundred hours of ground operations.
In 1991, Saddam Hussein invaded and occupied Kuwait, losing the support of the United States.
Unfortunately, during the 1980's, while he engaged in such horrific activity, he enjoyed the support of the American government, because he had oil and was seen as a counterweight to the Ayatollah Khomeini in Iran.



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’ve got a different view.”
“Governor Romney has a perspective that says if we cut taxes, skewed towards the wealthy, and roll back regulations, that we’ll be better off.”
“The audience here in the hall has promised to remain silent – no cheers, applause, boos, hisses, among other noisy distracting things, so we may all concentrate on what the candidates have to say.”
“Both candidates will also have two-minute closing statements.”
“The segments as I announced in advance will be three on the economy and one each on health care, the role of government and governing, with an emphasis throughout on differences, specifics and choices.”
“And for the record, they were not submitted for approval to the commission or the candidates.”
“Thousands of people offered suggestions on segment subjects or questions via the Internet and other means, but I made the final selections.”
“There will be six roughly 15-minute segments with two-minute answers for the first question, then open discussion for the remainder of each segment.”
“Tonight’s 90 minutes will be about domestic issues and will follow a format designed by the commission.”
“This debate and the next three – two presidential, one vice presidential – are sponsored by the Commission on Presidential Debates.”


I’ve got a different view.
Governor Romney has a perspective that says if we cut taxes, skewed towards the wealthy, and roll back regulations, that we’ll be better off.
The audience here in the hall has promised to remain silent – no cheers, applause, boos, hisses, among other noisy distracting things, so we may all concentrate on what the candidates have to say.
Both candidates will also have two-minute closing statements.
The segments as I announced in advance will be three on the economy and one each on health care, the role of government and governing, with an emphasis throughout on differences, specifics and choices.
And for the record, they were not submitted for approval to the commission or the candidates.
Thousands of people offered suggestions on segment subjects or questions via the Internet and other means, but I made the final selections.
There will be six roughly 15-minute segments with two-minute answers for the first question, then open discussion for the remainder of each segment.
Tonight’s 90 minutes will be about domestic issues and will follow a format designed by the commission.
This debate and the next three – two presidential, one vice presidential – are sponsored by the Commission on Presidential Debates.



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(Bob Cusack, "Democrats Say McCain Nearly Abandoned GOP," The Hill, 3/29/07)- Weaver: "Well, If The Right People Asked Him."”
“"At the end of their March 31, 2001 lunch at a Chinese restaurant in Bethesda, Md., Downey said Weaver asked why Democrats hadn't asked McCain to switch parties."”
“I know that Tom, from a conversation with him, was in conversation with a number of Republicans back then.”
“SEN. JOHN KERRY: "I don't know all the details of it.”
“JONATHAN SINGER: "And I was wondering if you could talk a little bit about what your discussions were with him [McCain] in 2004, how far it went, who approached whom... if there was any 'there' there."”
“(Fox News' "Special Report With Brit Hume," 4/4/07; Sen. Kerry: "[McCain's] People Similarly Approached Me To Engage In A Discussion About His Potentially Being On The Ticket As Vice President."”
“McCain says that also is a mischaracterization, and that he was never serious about leaving the Republican Party."”
“This of course, follows a similar story that came out last week in which Senate Democrats where saying McCain was in serious negotiations with them about switching parties following his loss to George W. Bush in the 2000 presidential primaries.”
“But McCain says no, it was Kerry's idea, and that he rejected it each time it was raised.”
“The Politico newspaper reports Kerry maintains that McCain's people made overtures to him about a vice presidential nod.”


(Bob Cusack, "Democrats Say McCain Nearly Abandoned GOP," The Hill, 3/29/07)- Weaver: "Well, If The Right People Asked Him."
"At the end of their March 31, 2001 lunch at a Chinese restaurant in Bethesda, Md., Downey said Weaver asked why Democrats hadn't asked McCain to switch parties."
I know that Tom, from a conversation with him, was in conversation with a number of Republicans back then.
SEN. JOHN KERRY: "I don't know all the details of it.
JONATHAN SINGER: "And I was wondering if you could talk a little bit about what your discussions were with him [McCain] in 2004, how far it went, who approached whom... if there was any 'there' there."
(Fox News' "Special Report With Brit Hume," 4/4/07; Sen. Kerry: "[McCain's] People Similarly Approached Me To Engage In A Discussion About His Potentially Being On The Ticket As Vice President."
McCain says that also is a mischaracterization, and that he was never serious about leaving the Republican Party."
This of course, follows a similar story that came out last week in which Senate Democrats where saying McCain was in serious negotiations with them about switching parties following his loss to George W. Bush in the 2000 presidential primaries.
But McCain says no, it was Kerry's idea, and that he rejected it each time it was raised.
The Politico newspaper reports Kerry maintains that McCain's people made overtures to him about a vice presidential nod.



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Senator Barack Obama...”
“Sincerely,U.S.”
“Senator Barack Obama today sent a letter to Federal Reserve Chairman Bernanke and Treasury Secretary Paulson urging them to immediately convene a homeownership preservation summit with key stakeholders to fight foreclosures driven by growth in the subprime mortgage market.”
“The text of the letter is below:Dear Chairman Bernanke and Secretary Paulson,There is grave concern in low-income communities about a potential coming wave of foreclosures.”
“Because regulators are partly responsible for creating the environment that is leading to rising rates of home foreclosure in the subprime mortgage market I urge you immediately to convene a homeownership preservation summit with leading mortgage lenders investors loan servicing organizations consumer advocates federal regulators and housing related agencies to...”
“...assess options for private sector responses to the challenge...”
“We cannot sit on the sidelines while increasing numbers of American families face the risk of losing their homes.”
“And while neither the government nor the private sector acting alone is capable of quickly balancing the important interests in widespread access to credit and responsible lending, both must act and act quickly.”
“Working together, the relevant private sector entities and regulators may be best positioned for quick and targeted responses to mitigate the danger.”
“Rampant foreclosures are in nobody’s interest, and I believe this is a case where all responsible industry players can share the objective of eliminating deceptive or abusive practices, preserving homeownership, and stabilizing housing markets.”


Senator Barack Obama...
Sincerely,U.S.
Senator Barack Obama today sent a letter to Federal Reserve Chairman Bernanke and Treasury Secretary Paulson urging them to immediately convene a homeownership preservation summit with key stakeholders to fight foreclosures driven by growth in the subprime mortgage market.
The text of the letter is below:Dear Chairman Bernanke and Secretary Paulson,There is grave concern in low-income communities about a potential coming wave of foreclosures.
Because regulators are partly responsible for creating the environment that is leading to rising rates of home foreclosure in the subprime mortgage market I urge you immediately to convene a homeownership preservation summit with leading mortgage lenders investors loan servicing organizations consumer advocates federal regulators and housing related agencies to...
...assess options for private sector responses to the challenge...
We cannot sit on the sidelines while increasing numbers of American families face the risk of losing their homes.
And while neither the government nor the private sector acting alone is capable of quickly balancing the important interests in widespread access to credit and responsible lending, both must act and act quickly.
Working together, the relevant private sector entities and regulators may be best positioned for quick and targeted responses to mitigate the danger.
Rampant foreclosures are in nobody’s interest, and I believe this is a case where all responsible industry players can share the objective of eliminating deceptive or abusive practices, preserving homeownership, and stabilizing housing markets.



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Climate Policy Must Facilitate International Efforts To Solve The Problem.”
“Climate Policy Must Spur The Development And Deployment Of Advanced Technology.”
“Climate Policy Must Include Mechanisms To Minimize Costs And Work Effectively With Other Markets.”
“Climate Policy Should Utilize A Market-Based Cap And Trade System.”
“John McCain’s Principles For Climate Policy:Climate Policy Should Be Built On Scientifically-Sound, Mandatory Emission Reduction Targets And Timetables.”
“He will work with our international partners to secure our energy future, to create opportunities for American industry, and to leave a better future for our children.”
“John McCain will establish a market-based system to curb greenhouse gas (GHG) emissions, mobilize innovative technologies, and strengthen the economy.”


Climate Policy Must Facilitate International Efforts To Solve The Problem.
Climate Policy Must Spur The Development And Deployment Of Advanced Technology.
Climate Policy Must Include Mechanisms To Minimize Costs And Work Effectively With Other Markets.
Climate Policy Should Utilize A Market-Based Cap And Trade System.
John McCain’s Principles For Climate Policy:Climate Policy Should Be Built On Scientifically-Sound, Mandatory Emission Reduction Targets And Timetables.
He will work with our international partners to secure our energy future, to create opportunities for American industry, and to leave a better future for our children.
John McCain will establish a market-based system to curb greenhouse gas (GHG) emissions, mobilize innovative technologies, and strengthen the economy.



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And that's why it's just common sense to give the FBI the authority to keep terror suspects from buying guns and explosives.”
“That's why our police officers patrol sensitive locations.”
“We know Hasan was able to buy a handgun despite having been under investigation by the FBI for links to terrorism.”
“And on November 5, 2009, Major Nidal Hasan shot 43 people at Fort Hood -- killing 13.”
“He was charged with murder and 16 counts of terrorist acts.”
“At the time of the shooting, the FBI was already investigating the man after his arrest in Yemen with a fake Somali passport.”
“Last June in Little Rock, Arkansas, a man opened fire at a military recruiting station, killing one private and wounding another.”
“And, of course, attacks and planned attacks have not been limited to New York.”
“The second was in September, when the City and federal authorities broke up a plot to detonate explosives in the New York City subway system.”
“The first was last May, when the terrorists purchased guns and explosives as part of a planned attack on a Temple and Jewish Center in the Bronx.”


And that's why it's just common sense to give the FBI the authority to keep terror suspects from buying guns and explosives.
That's why our police officers patrol sensitive locations.
We know Hasan was able to buy a handgun despite having been under investigation by the FBI for links to terrorism.
And on November 5, 2009, Major Nidal Hasan shot 43 people at Fort Hood -- killing 13.
He was charged with murder and 16 counts of terrorist acts.
At the time of the shooting, the FBI was already investigating the man after his arrest in Yemen with a fake Somali passport.
Last June in Little Rock, Arkansas, a man opened fire at a military recruiting station, killing one private and wounding another.
And, of course, attacks and planned attacks have not been limited to New York.
The second was in September, when the City and federal authorities broke up a plot to detonate explosives in the New York City subway system.
The first was last May, when the terrorists purchased guns and explosives as part of a planned attack on a Temple and Jewish Center in the Bronx.



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But the D.C.”
“The congregation claimed that this revocation violated the Free Exercise and Free Speech clauses.”
“The ADF opposes the restriction because the rule requires churches to choose between actively participating in political campaigns, on the one hand, and accepting tax-deductible donations, on the other hand.”
“Why is the Alliance Defense Fund so interested in eliminating this restriction?”
“So a primary purpose of the 1954 amendment was to prevent donors from deducting political contributions from their taxes.”
“But organizations that qualify as charitable groups under section 501(c)(3) are special because donors to these organizations may deduct their contributions from their own federal income taxes.”
“For example, section 527 of the code exempts all sorts of political organizations from federal income tax.”
“Under the Internal Revenue Code, there are many different kinds of tax-exempt organizations.”
“Notably, the 1954 amendment is often misunderstood as limiting political advocacy, but the rule’s actual purpose has to do with political contributions.”
“But because there was little debate over the amendment or how it would influence churches, we don’t know precisely why Congress enacted the amendment.”


But the D.C.
The congregation claimed that this revocation violated the Free Exercise and Free Speech clauses.
The ADF opposes the restriction because the rule requires churches to choose between actively participating in political campaigns, on the one hand, and accepting tax-deductible donations, on the other hand.
Why is the Alliance Defense Fund so interested in eliminating this restriction?
So a primary purpose of the 1954 amendment was to prevent donors from deducting political contributions from their taxes.
But organizations that qualify as charitable groups under section 501(c)(3) are special because donors to these organizations may deduct their contributions from their own federal income taxes.
For example, section 527 of the code exempts all sorts of political organizations from federal income tax.
Under the Internal Revenue Code, there are many different kinds of tax-exempt organizations.
Notably, the 1954 amendment is often misunderstood as limiting political advocacy, but the rule’s actual purpose has to do with political contributions.
But because there was little debate over the amendment or how it would influence churches, we don’t know precisely why Congress enacted the amendment.



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““And on that score voters know in Alison Grimes they have someone who is going to champion the issue and that in Mitch McConnell who is going to make the problem worse.””
““He’s the number one recipient of contributions from lobbyists this cycle and his Karl Rove-affiliated Super PACs are clogging the Commonwealth’s airwaves with negative attack ads.”
“...of Indiana and Joe Manchin of West Virginia...”
“This is a sharp difference between her and McConnell someone who is advocating the make the problem worse The Grimes campaign message also directs voters to sign a petition calling on Congress to stop special interest billionaires that has the support of red state Democratic senators such as Joe Donnelly...”
““She understands that money in politics drowns out the voices of every day Kentuckians.”
““It’s very good that Alison Grimes has come out in support of a policy that puts regular people in charge of government again,” says David Donnelly, who is executive director of Public Campaign Action Fund.”
“But given the left’s apoplectic reaction to the Roberts Court’s dismantling limitations and the rise of super PACs, her position is receiving applause from watchdog groups.”
“Enough is enough—our democracy is too important to be auctioned off to the highest bidder.”Grimes has played it safe on the campaign trail when faced with thornier issues outside of core Democratic principles, such as raising the minimum wage.”
““Special interest money has already flooded into Mitch McConnell’s campaign,” Grimes said.”
““The real distinction is what are you going to do to clean it up and propose pro-actively to make the system better,” he says.”


“And on that score voters know in Alison Grimes they have someone who is going to champion the issue and that in Mitch McConnell who is going to make the problem worse.”
“He’s the number one recipient of contributions from lobbyists this cycle and his Karl Rove-affiliated Super PACs are clogging the Commonwealth’s airwaves with negative attack ads.
...of Indiana and Joe Manchin of West Virginia...
This is a sharp difference between her and McConnell someone who is advocating the make the problem worse The Grimes campaign message also directs voters to sign a petition calling on Congress to stop special interest billionaires that has the support of red state Democratic senators such as Joe Donnelly...
“She understands that money in politics drowns out the voices of every day Kentuckians.
“It’s very good that Alison Grimes has come out in support of a policy that puts regular people in charge of government again,” says David Donnelly, who is executive director of Public Campaign Action Fund.
But given the left’s apoplectic reaction to the Roberts Court’s dismantling limitations and the rise of super PACs, her position is receiving applause from watchdog groups.
Enough is enough—our democracy is too important to be auctioned off to the highest bidder.”Grimes has played it safe on the campaign trail when faced with thornier issues outside of core Democratic principles, such as raising the minimum wage.
“Special interest money has already flooded into Mitch McConnell’s campaign,” Grimes said.
“The real distinction is what are you going to do to clean it up and propose pro-actively to make the system better,” he says.



Number  16
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And I'll protect the rights of ordinary Americans by cracking down on companies that are trying to deceive them.”
“I'll eliminate income taxes for seniors making less than $50,000 a year.”
“But many more Americans aren't falling into debt because they made an irresponsible decision; they're falling into debt because credit card companies are pushing them over the edge.”
“And they should have to face the consequences of those decisions.”
“Part of why our debt crisis is so bad is that some folks are making reckless decisions – racking up big credit card bills by purchasing flat-screen TVs and other luxury goods that they know they can't afford.”
“Now, let's be honest.”
“And bankruptcy rates have steadily climbed over the past year.”
“The typical family is now nearly $10,000 in the red.”
“Over the past 15 years, average household credit card debt has tripled.”
“As a result, many of them are falling deeper and deeper into debt, and a lot of that debt is being put onto credit cards.”


And I'll protect the rights of ordinary Americans by cracking down on companies that are trying to deceive them.
I'll eliminate income taxes for seniors making less than $50,000 a year.
But many more Americans aren't falling into debt because they made an irresponsible decision; they're falling into debt because credit card companies are pushing them over the edge.
And they should have to face the consequences of those decisions.
Part of why our debt crisis is so bad is that some folks are making reckless decisions – racking up big credit card bills by purchasing flat-screen TVs and other luxury goods that they know they can't afford.
Now, let's be honest.
And bankruptcy rates have steadily climbed over the past year.
The typical family is now nearly $10,000 in the red.
Over the past 15 years, average household credit card debt has tripled.
As a result, many of them are falling deeper and deeper into debt, and a lot of that debt is being put onto credit cards.



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This was a good idea when Senator John McCain proposed it in the campaign, it's a good idea now, and we should embrace it.”
“It's a plan that asks everyone to take responsibility for meeting this challenge – not just government and insurance companies, but employers and individuals.”
“Under this plan, it will be against the law for insurance companies to deny you coverage because of a pre-existing condition.”
“What this plan will do is to make the insurance you have work better for you.”
“Let me repeat this: nothing in our plan requires you to change what you have.”
“...coverage or the doctor you have...”
“Here are the details that every American needs to know about this plan First if you are among the hundreds of millions of Americans who already have health insurance through your job Medicare Medicaid or the VA nothing in this plan will require you or your employer to change the...”
“And it's a plan that incorporates ideas from Senators and Congressmen; from Democrats and Republicans – and yes, from some of my opponents in both the primary and general election.”
“And it will slow the growth of health care costs for our families, our businesses, and our government.”
“They will no longer be able to place some arbitrary cap on the amount of coverage you can receive in a given year or a lifetime.”


This was a good idea when Senator John McCain proposed it in the campaign, it's a good idea now, and we should embrace it.
It's a plan that asks everyone to take responsibility for meeting this challenge – not just government and insurance companies, but employers and individuals.
Under this plan, it will be against the law for insurance companies to deny you coverage because of a pre-existing condition.
What this plan will do is to make the insurance you have work better for you.
Let me repeat this: nothing in our plan requires you to change what you have.
...coverage or the doctor you have...
Here are the details that every American needs to know about this plan First if you are among the hundreds of millions of Americans who already have health insurance through your job Medicare Medicaid or the VA nothing in this plan will require you or your employer to change the...
And it's a plan that incorporates ideas from Senators and Congressmen; from Democrats and Republicans – and yes, from some of my opponents in both the primary and general election.
And it will slow the growth of health care costs for our families, our businesses, and our government.
They will no longer be able to place some arbitrary cap on the amount of coverage you can receive in a given year or a lifetime.



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“000 500 1 500 Duncan Hunter 0 1 000 0 1 000”
“But because they are both funding their own campaigns, they owe the money to themselves.”
“This trend may exemplify growing dissatisfaction among members of the military with the administration's handling of foreign policy, especially in Iraq.”
“Democrat Barack Obama, who opposed the resolution to go to Iraq from the start, is the number-two recipient with at least $45,200.”
“Paul brought in at least $53,670 from the uniformed services, compared to McCain's $40,000.”
“...backs the administration s policy in Iraq...”
“Military Continues to Give to Paul Obama 10 19 07 5 30 pm Despite his anti war stance or perhaps because of it Ron Paul continues to collect more money from members of the U S military than any other presidential candidate including John McCain a Vietnam War prisoner who...”
“Other lesser-known candidates are libertarians or members of other third parties.”
“Cox is in the hole $1.1 million, almost twice more than he's brought in, and Lamagna's debt is $349,000.”
“By comparison, in 2000, the last presidential race before the Iraq war began, Democrats received only 18 percent of contributions from the military.”


000 500 1 500 Duncan Hunter 0 1 000 0 1 000
But because they are both funding their own campaigns, they owe the money to themselves.
This trend may exemplify growing dissatisfaction among members of the military with the administration's handling of foreign policy, especially in Iraq.
Democrat Barack Obama, who opposed the resolution to go to Iraq from the start, is the number-two recipient with at least $45,200.
Paul brought in at least $53,670 from the uniformed services, compared to McCain's $40,000.
...backs the administration s policy in Iraq...
Military Continues to Give to Paul Obama 10 19 07 5 30 pm Despite his anti war stance or perhaps because of it Ron Paul continues to collect more money from members of the U S military than any other presidential candidate including John McCain a Vietnam War prisoner who...
Other lesser-known candidates are libertarians or members of other third parties.
Cox is in the hole $1.1 million, almost twice more than he's brought in, and Lamagna's debt is $349,000.
By comparison, in 2000, the last presidential race before the Iraq war began, Democrats received only 18 percent of contributions from the military.



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Battle over the Right to Bear Arms in America...”
“People don t seem to like the idea of gun control but they still want the government to do more to keep guns out of the hands of criminals and the mentally ill said Adam Winkler a law professor at the University of California Los Angeles and author of Gunfight...”
“Favor: 86 percent.”
“Gallup poll, conducted Oct. 7-11: "Would you favor or oppose a law which would require universal background checks for all gun purchases in the U.S. using a centralized database across all 50 states?"”
“Unsure/No answer: 1 percent.”
“Oppose: 7 percent.”
“Favor: 92 percent.”
“CBS/New York Times poll, conducted Oct. 21-25: "Do you favor or oppose a federal law requiring background checks on all potential gun buyers?"”
“Oppose: 9 percent.”


The Battle over the Right to Bear Arms in America...
People don t seem to like the idea of gun control but they still want the government to do more to keep guns out of the hands of criminals and the mentally ill said Adam Winkler a law professor at the University of California Los Angeles and author of Gunfight...
Favor: 86 percent.
Gallup poll, conducted Oct. 7-11: "Would you favor or oppose a law which would require universal background checks for all gun purchases in the U.S. using a centralized database across all 50 states?"
Unsure/No answer: 1 percent.
Oppose: 7 percent.
Favor: 92 percent.
CBS/New York Times poll, conducted Oct. 21-25: "Do you favor or oppose a federal law requiring background checks on all potential gun buyers?"
Oppose: 9 percent.



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...you to our hosts and for everyone being here tonight...”
“And tonight s debate is about giving Delaware s voters an insight into which candidate has the experience the values and the ideas to best represent them and do the hard work of fixing what s broken in Washington Thank you KARIBJANIAN Your opening statement O DONNELL Thank you Thank...”
“Responses to their questions will be limited to one minute.”
“They have questions.”
“That will be followed by a 30-minute segment, during which we turn to the students here at the University of Delaware.”
“The first 60 minutes of this debate.”
“That's the first hour.”
“And then there will be an opportunity for all of us to mix it up a little bit, to get into a discussion, and follow up.”
“Responses to that initial question limited to two minutes with a one-minute rebuttal from the other candidate.”
“Following a two-minute opening statement from each candidate, Nancy and I will pose questions.”


...you to our hosts and for everyone being here tonight...
And tonight s debate is about giving Delaware s voters an insight into which candidate has the experience the values and the ideas to best represent them and do the hard work of fixing what s broken in Washington Thank you KARIBJANIAN Your opening statement O DONNELL Thank you Thank...
Responses to their questions will be limited to one minute.
They have questions.
That will be followed by a 30-minute segment, during which we turn to the students here at the University of Delaware.
The first 60 minutes of this debate.
That's the first hour.
And then there will be an opportunity for all of us to mix it up a little bit, to get into a discussion, and follow up.
Responses to that initial question limited to two minutes with a one-minute rebuttal from the other candidate.
Following a two-minute opening statement from each candidate, Nancy and I will pose questions.



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“CROWD: Kill the bill, kill the bill, kill the bill!”
“BOEHNER: We are about 24 hours from Armageddon.”
“(BEGIN VIDEOTAPE)DAVID AXELROD, SR. ADVISER TO THE PRESIDENT: I think we will have the votes.”
“We begin with seven days in two minutes.”
“It has been a struggle all week to get there.”
“That's how many yeas needed to pass the health care bill in the House, 216 votes among the 253 Democratic members.”
“For Democrats, the magic number is 216.”
“That said, it would in fact be the end if Republicans prevailed in today's vote.”
“We have heard the words "end game" so many times in this health care debate, I wouldn't try it now.”
“And analysis from Donna Brazile and Bill Bennett.”


CROWD: Kill the bill, kill the bill, kill the bill!
BOEHNER: We are about 24 hours from Armageddon.
(BEGIN VIDEOTAPE)DAVID AXELROD, SR. ADVISER TO THE PRESIDENT: I think we will have the votes.
We begin with seven days in two minutes.
It has been a struggle all week to get there.
That's how many yeas needed to pass the health care bill in the House, 216 votes among the 253 Democratic members.
For Democrats, the magic number is 216.
That said, it would in fact be the end if Republicans prevailed in today's vote.
We have heard the words "end game" so many times in this health care debate, I wouldn't try it now.
And analysis from Donna Brazile and Bill Bennett.



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“What more can you do?”
“TAPPER: Job creation has not gone as well as you hoped.”
“TAPPER: Don't you think it will slow economic growth?”
“We think that's the responsible thing to do because we need to make sure we can show the world that they're willing as a country now to start to make some progress bringing down our long -- our long-term deficits.”
“Now, we also think it's responsible to let the tax cuts expire that just go to 2 percent to 3 percent of Americans, the highest earning Americans.”
“We think it's responsible.”
“We think it's fair.”
“We think it's the right package.”
“We think that's a -- the -- it's a very strong package.”
“...invest in expanding output...”


What more can you do?
TAPPER: Job creation has not gone as well as you hoped.
TAPPER: Don't you think it will slow economic growth?
We think that's the responsible thing to do because we need to make sure we can show the world that they're willing as a country now to start to make some progress bringing down our long -- our long-term deficits.
Now, we also think it's responsible to let the tax cuts expire that just go to 2 percent to 3 percent of Americans, the highest earning Americans.
We think it's responsible.
We think it's fair.
We think it's the right package.
We think that's a -- the -- it's a very strong package.
...invest in expanding output...



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The American people are in charge, and they deserve nothing less.”
“And frankly, it’s also a break from the direction in which Republicans were headed when Americans last entrusted us with the reins of government.”
““All these things have combined to create massive uncertainty for small businesses, the engine of job creation in America, while our children face a future clouded by debt.”
“A government takeover of health care.”
“A job-killing national energy tax.”
“A ‘stimulus’ spending spree that created jobs in China and El Salvador, while millions of Americans lost their jobs here.”
“But instead of fixing them, his policies have made them worse.”
““These problems didn’t start under President Obama.”
“Our national debt has grown by $3 trillion Trust in government has fallen to an all-time low.”
“One in ten of our fellow citizens is out of work.”


The American people are in charge, and they deserve nothing less.
And frankly, it’s also a break from the direction in which Republicans were headed when Americans last entrusted us with the reins of government.
“All these things have combined to create massive uncertainty for small businesses, the engine of job creation in America, while our children face a future clouded by debt.
A government takeover of health care.
A job-killing national energy tax.
A ‘stimulus’ spending spree that created jobs in China and El Salvador, while millions of Americans lost their jobs here.
But instead of fixing them, his policies have made them worse.
“These problems didn’t start under President Obama.
Our national debt has grown by $3 trillion Trust in government has fallen to an all-time low.
One in ten of our fellow citizens is out of work.



**Something goes wrong**
“Roberts R KS Shelby R AL Snowe R ME Specter D PA Tester D MT Thune R SD Vitter R LA Voinovich R OH Wicker R MS Not Voting 3 Kennedy D MA Rockefeller D WV Sessions R AL Grouped by Home State...”
“Harkin D IA Yea Hatch R UT Nay Hutchison R TX Nay Inhofe R OK Nay Inouye D HI Yea Isakson R GA Nay Johanns R NE Nay Johnson D SD Nay Kaufman D DE Yea Kennedy D MA Not Voting Kerry D MA Yea Klobuchar D MN Yea Kohl...”
“No.”
“1014 ) Vote Number: 174 Vote Date: April 30, 2009, 02:47 PM Required For Majority: 3/5 Vote Result: Amendment Rejected Amendment Number: to S.Amdt.”
“1014 to S. 896 (Helping Families Save Their Homes Act of 2009) Statement of Purpose: To prevent mortgage foreclosures and preserve home values.”
“Vote Counts YEAs 45 NAYs 51 Not Voting 3 Information compiled through Senate LIS by the Senate bill clerk under the direction of the secretary of the Senate Alphabetical by Senator Name Akaka D HI Yea Alexander R TN Nay Barrasso R WY Nay Baucus D MT Nay Bayh D”
“IN Yea Begich D AK Yea Bennet D CO Nay Bennett R UT Nay Bingaman D NM Yea Bond R MO Nay Boxer D CA Yea Brown D OH Yea Brownback R KS Nay Bunning R KY Nay Burr R NC Nay Burris D IL Yea Byrd D WV Nay...”
“Cantwell D WA Yea Cardin D MD Yea Carper D DE Nay Casey D PA Yea Chambliss R GA Nay Coburn R OK Nay Cochran R MS Nay Collins R ME Nay Conrad D ND Yea Corker R TN Nay Cornyn R TX Nay Crapo R ID Nay DeMint R”
“SC Nay Dodd D CT Yea Dorgan D ND Nay Durbin D IL Yea Ensign R NV Nay Enzi R WY Nay Feingold D WI Yea Feinstein D CA Yea Gillibrand D NY Yea Graham R SC Nay Grassley R IA Nay Gregg R NH Nay Hagan D NC Yea...”
“D WI Yea Kyl R AZ Nay Landrieu D LA Nay Lautenberg D NJ Yea Leahy D VT Yea Levin D MI Yea Lieberman ID CT Yea Lincoln D AR Nay Lugar R IN Nay Martinez R FL Nay McCain R AZ Nay McCaskill D MO Yea McConnell R KY”


Roberts R KS Shelby R AL Snowe R ME Specter D PA Tester D MT Thune R SD Vitter R LA Voinovich R OH Wicker R MS Not Voting 3 Kennedy D MA Rockefeller D WV Sessions R AL Grouped by Home State...
Harkin D IA Yea Hatch R UT Nay Hutchison R TX Nay Inhofe R OK Nay Inouye D HI Yea Isakson R GA Nay Johanns R NE Nay Johnson D SD Nay Kaufman D DE Yea Kennedy D MA Not Voting Kerry D MA Yea Klobuchar D MN Yea Kohl...
No.
1014 ) Vote Number: 174 Vote Date: April 30, 2009, 02:47 PM Required For Majority: 3/5 Vote Result: Amendment Rejected Amendment Number: to S.Amdt.
1014 to S. 896 (Helping Families Save Their Homes Act of 2009) Statement of Purpose: To prevent mortgage foreclosures and preserve home values.
Vote Counts YEAs 45 NAYs 51 Not Voting 3 Information compiled through Senate LIS by the Senate bill clerk under the direction of the secretary of the Senate Alphabetical by Senator Name Akaka D HI Yea Alexander R TN Nay Barrasso R WY Nay Baucus D MT Nay Bayh D
IN Yea Begich D AK Yea Bennet D CO Nay Bennett R UT Nay Bingaman D NM Yea Bond R MO Nay Boxer D CA Yea Brown D OH Yea Brownback R KS Nay Bunning R KY Nay Burr R NC Nay Burris D IL Yea Byrd D WV Nay...
Cantwell D WA Yea Cardin D MD Yea Carper D DE Nay Casey D PA Yea Chambliss R GA Nay Coburn R OK Nay Cochran R MS Nay Collins R ME Nay Conrad D ND Yea Corker R TN Nay Cornyn R TX Nay Crapo R ID Nay DeMint R
SC Nay Dodd D CT Yea Dorgan D ND Nay Durbin D IL Yea Ensign R NV Nay Enzi R WY Nay Feingold D WI Yea Feinstein D CA Yea Gillibrand D NY Yea Graham R SC Nay Grassley R IA Nay Gregg R NH Nay Hagan D NC Yea...
D WI Yea Kyl R AZ Nay Landrieu D LA Nay Lautenberg D NJ Yea Leahy D VT Yea Levin D MI Yea Lieberman ID CT Yea Lincoln D AR Nay Lugar R IN Nay Martinez R FL Nay McCain R AZ Nay McCaskill D MO Yea McConnell R KY



**Something goes wrong**
“Based on that, and which you're now expressing your discomfort with it, in the debate that Al Gore had with Ross Perot, Al Gore said the following: "If you don't like NAFTA and what it's done, we can get out of it in six months.”
“Now, I think that Senator Clinton has shifted positions on this and believes that we should have strong environmental standards and labor standards, and I think that's a good thing.”
“And I have laid out my criticism, but in addition my plan, for actually fixing NAFTA.”
“Again, I have received a lot of incoming criticism from Senator Obama.”
“And the Cleveland Plain Dealer examined Senator Obama's attacks on me regarding NAFTA and said they were erroneous.”
“So I would hope that, again, we can get to a debate about what the real issues are and where we stand because we do need to fix NAFTA.”
“It is not working.”
“It was, unfortunately, heavily disadvantaging many of our industries, particularly manufacturing.”
“I have a record of standing up for that, of chairing the Manufacturing Caucus in the Senate, and I will take a tough position on these trade agreements.”
“MR. WILLIAMS: Senator, thank you.”


Based on that, and which you're now expressing your discomfort with it, in the debate that Al Gore had with Ross Perot, Al Gore said the following: "If you don't like NAFTA and what it's done, we can get out of it in six months.
Now, I think that Senator Clinton has shifted positions on this and believes that we should have strong environmental standards and labor standards, and I think that's a good thing.
And I have laid out my criticism, but in addition my plan, for actually fixing NAFTA.
Again, I have received a lot of incoming criticism from Senator Obama.
And the Cleveland Plain Dealer examined Senator Obama's attacks on me regarding NAFTA and said they were erroneous.
So I would hope that, again, we can get to a debate about what the real issues are and where we stand because we do need to fix NAFTA.
It is not working.
It was, unfortunately, heavily disadvantaging many of our industries, particularly manufacturing.
I have a record of standing up for that, of chairing the Manufacturing Caucus in the Senate, and I will take a tough position on these trade agreements.
MR. WILLIAMS: Senator, thank you.



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“However, CBO and JCT, in consultation with outside experts, have devoted a great deal of care and effort to the analysis of health care legislation in the past few years, and the agencies have strived to develop estimates that are in the middle of the distribution of possible outcomes.”
“6079 is enacted near the beginning of fiscal year 2013, CBO and JCT estimate that, on balance, the direct spending and revenue effects of enacting that legislation would cause a net increase in federal budget deficits of $109 billion over the 2013–2022 period.”
“...revenues from the excise tax on high premium insurance plans and net savings from other coverage related effects...”
“The costs of those coverage expansions which include the cost of the subsidies to be provided through the exchanges increased outlays for Medicaid and the Children s Health Insurance Program CHIP and tax credits for certain small employers will be partially offset by penalty payments from employers and uninsured individuals...”
“6079 because the net savings from eliminating the insurance coverage provisions would be more than offset by the combination of other spending increases and revenue reductions:The ACA contains a set of provisions designed to expand health insurance coverage, which, on net, are projected to cost the government money.”
“Deficits would be increased under H.R.”
“What Major Components Result in the Net Increase in Deficits?”
“6079 would reduce direct spending by $890 billion and reduce revenues by $1 trillion between 2013 and 2022, thus adding $109 billion to federal budget deficits over that period.”
“Specifically, we estimate that H.R.”
“Assuming that H.R.”


However, CBO and JCT, in consultation with outside experts, have devoted a great deal of care and effort to the analysis of health care legislation in the past few years, and the agencies have strived to develop estimates that are in the middle of the distribution of possible outcomes.
6079 is enacted near the beginning of fiscal year 2013, CBO and JCT estimate that, on balance, the direct spending and revenue effects of enacting that legislation would cause a net increase in federal budget deficits of $109 billion over the 2013–2022 period.
...revenues from the excise tax on high premium insurance plans and net savings from other coverage related effects...
The costs of those coverage expansions which include the cost of the subsidies to be provided through the exchanges increased outlays for Medicaid and the Children s Health Insurance Program CHIP and tax credits for certain small employers will be partially offset by penalty payments from employers and uninsured individuals...
6079 because the net savings from eliminating the insurance coverage provisions would be more than offset by the combination of other spending increases and revenue reductions:The ACA contains a set of provisions designed to expand health insurance coverage, which, on net, are projected to cost the government money.
Deficits would be increased under H.R.
What Major Components Result in the Net Increase in Deficits?
6079 would reduce direct spending by $890 billion and reduce revenues by $1 trillion between 2013 and 2022, thus adding $109 billion to federal budget deficits over that period.
Specifically, we estimate that H.R.
Assuming that H.R.



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“What's going on there?”
“And this week, of course, Hillary Clinton declared her campaign for the presidency talking about helping everyday people.”
“Are you also affirming that you are not giving up your — are you also affirming that you are not running for Senate?”
“1 to lead this country.”
“I'm very confident that I have the capability from day no.”
“But I'm certainly capable from day 1.”
“And clearly, as you see the history of the presidency, people who go into that office grow, the office helps you grow as well as you go through it and that's, having the ability to learn is a big part of the office as well.”
“...to do a very good job as president of the United States...”
“But from all that and given both my experience at the local state and federal level and especially the lessons learned over the last five years as I ve been engaged in federal policy making I m very confident that I have the judgment and the knowledge that I need...”
“And it's happening at a time when the country's going through an extraordinary economic transformation that is leaving many people insecure.”


What's going on there?
And this week, of course, Hillary Clinton declared her campaign for the presidency talking about helping everyday people.
Are you also affirming that you are not giving up your — are you also affirming that you are not running for Senate?
1 to lead this country.
I'm very confident that I have the capability from day no.
But I'm certainly capable from day 1.
And clearly, as you see the history of the presidency, people who go into that office grow, the office helps you grow as well as you go through it and that's, having the ability to learn is a big part of the office as well.
...to do a very good job as president of the United States...
But from all that and given both my experience at the local state and federal level and especially the lessons learned over the last five years as I ve been engaged in federal policy making I m very confident that I have the judgment and the knowledge that I need...
And it's happening at a time when the country's going through an extraordinary economic transformation that is leaving many people insecure.



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“PLOUFFE: Well, what it is, is what this country needs to do, which is reduce the deficit in a right way, fair and balanced way.”
“So, that's the stark choice --WALLACE: Does the president's agenda -- because I did not hear anything new in Ohio -- is the president's agenda for the next four years more of the same?”
“So, this is someone you're not going to be able to trust.”
“They ought to self deport.”
“Governor Romney essentially said the 11 million here ought to just go home.”
“Governor Romney has said he would veto the DREAM Act.”
“And that people who want to staff our labs and start businesses and serve their country ought to be able to do that.”
“So, this is someone who believed that we are a nation of laws, but also a nation of immigrants.”
“We're getting close to getting the DREAM Act done.”
“On immigration, yes, this is a president who's tried to get immigration done in a comprehensive way.”


PLOUFFE: Well, what it is, is what this country needs to do, which is reduce the deficit in a right way, fair and balanced way.
So, that's the stark choice --WALLACE: Does the president's agenda -- because I did not hear anything new in Ohio -- is the president's agenda for the next four years more of the same?
So, this is someone you're not going to be able to trust.
They ought to self deport.
Governor Romney essentially said the 11 million here ought to just go home.
Governor Romney has said he would veto the DREAM Act.
And that people who want to staff our labs and start businesses and serve their country ought to be able to do that.
So, this is someone who believed that we are a nation of laws, but also a nation of immigrants.
We're getting close to getting the DREAM Act done.
On immigration, yes, this is a president who's tried to get immigration done in a comprehensive way.



Number  29
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You know, clearly what they are doing is not working.”
“You can go back two years ago and the job figure was better and the president said we are turning the -- we are turning it around.”
“Is it the highest court in the land?”
“(BEGIN VIDEO CLIP)ROMNEY: The Supreme Court has the final word, right?”
“Reset.”
“A big oops in political world because Republicans have used the Supreme Court decision to argue that ObamaCare is a tax hike on the middle class.”
“It was already under fire from friendly sources as not ready for prime time when a senior adviser said that ObamaCare is fine, for not buying insurance is not a penalty, not a tax.”
“(END VIDEOTAPE)CROWLEY: Not the best of weeks for the Romney campaign.”
“I'm Candy Crowley and this is STATE OF THE UNION.”
“Former Democratic senator Bill Bradley on how to fix a broken Washington and what we can all do better.”


You know, clearly what they are doing is not working.
You can go back two years ago and the job figure was better and the president said we are turning the -- we are turning it around.
Is it the highest court in the land?
(BEGIN VIDEO CLIP)ROMNEY: The Supreme Court has the final word, right?
Reset.
A big oops in political world because Republicans have used the Supreme Court decision to argue that ObamaCare is a tax hike on the middle class.
It was already under fire from friendly sources as not ready for prime time when a senior adviser said that ObamaCare is fine, for not buying insurance is not a penalty, not a tax.
(END VIDEOTAPE)CROWLEY: Not the best of weeks for the Romney campaign.
I'm Candy Crowley and this is STATE OF THE UNION.
Former Democratic senator Bill Bradley on how to fix a broken Washington and what we can all do better.



Number  30
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ODIERNO: Well, I think it probably was.”
“Do you know what it is, in fact, was it a terrorist attack?”
“U.S. forces have now handed over control of all combat duties to Iraqi forces, and by the end of this month, all U.S. combat forces will be out.”
“(END VIDEO CLIP)AMANPOUR: This weekend marks a major milestone in the seven-year war in Iraq.”
“Bad news for President Obama.”
“(BEGIN VIDEO CLIP)(UNKNOWN): According to the Bureau of Labor statistics, like half of American workers hold on to a job for four years or more.”
“And the Sunday Funnies.”
“All the week's politics on our roundtable with Politico's John Harris; Gillian Tett of the Financial Times; George Packer of the New Yorker, and former Bush White House official Michael Gerson.”
“(END VIDEO CLIP)AMANPOUR: Jobs, immigration, and gay marriage.”
“Then...(BEGIN VIDEO CLIP)(UNKNOWN): We are losing everything we have.”


ODIERNO: Well, I think it probably was.
Do you know what it is, in fact, was it a terrorist attack?
U.S. forces have now handed over control of all combat duties to Iraqi forces, and by the end of this month, all U.S. combat forces will be out.
(END VIDEO CLIP)AMANPOUR: This weekend marks a major milestone in the seven-year war in Iraq.
Bad news for President Obama.
(BEGIN VIDEO CLIP)(UNKNOWN): According to the Bureau of Labor statistics, like half of American workers hold on to a job for four years or more.
And the Sunday Funnies.
All the week's politics on our roundtable with Politico's John Harris; Gillian Tett of the Financial Times; George Packer of the New Yorker, and former Bush White House official Michael Gerson.
(END VIDEO CLIP)AMANPOUR: Jobs, immigration, and gay marriage.
Then...(BEGIN VIDEO CLIP)(UNKNOWN): We are losing everything we have.



Number  31
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Learn more:”
“Read the full study.”
“The study estimates that 59 million women who receive their health insurance though their employer or their spouses employer, would be at risk of losing their coverage under McCains proposal, as would 30 million women with a pre-existing medical conditions.”
“Watch the AdThis ad comes from a recent study by the Planned Parenthood Action Fund and the Center for American Progress Action Fund, which found that McCains health care plan would leave more women than ever struggling to find affordable health coverage and basic care.”
“MCCAINS HEALTH CARE PLAN: WORSE FOR WOMENThe Planned Parenthood Action Fund's new TV ad, titled Worse for Women, points to a recent study that shows McCains health care plan would have an adverse impact on womens health.”


Learn more:
Read the full study.
The study estimates that 59 million women who receive their health insurance though their employer or their spouses employer, would be at risk of losing their coverage under McCains proposal, as would 30 million women with a pre-existing medical conditions.
Watch the AdThis ad comes from a recent study by the Planned Parenthood Action Fund and the Center for American Progress Action Fund, which found that McCains health care plan would leave more women than ever struggling to find affordable health coverage and basic care.
MCCAINS HEALTH CARE PLAN: WORSE FOR WOMENThe Planned Parenthood Action Fund's new TV ad, titled Worse for Women, points to a recent study that shows McCains health care plan would have an adverse impact on womens health.



Number  32
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But from my perspective, the characterization of people in a way that really seemed to be elitist and out of touch is something that we have to overcome.”
“CLINTON: Well, I'm going to let Senator Obama speak for himself.”
“The order tonight was decided by coin toss.”
“BROWN: Tonight, we're going to spend about half of our time with Senator Clinton, about half of our time with Senator Obama.”
“MEACHAM: Thank you.”
“Welcome, Jon.”
“He is the editor of Newsweek and one of America's best-known writers of religion and matters of faith.”
“Please welcome Jon Meacham.”
“And I'd like now to introduce my co-host.”
“Before we get started, on behalf of CNN and the candidates, I'd like to thank the people behind tonight's event, Faith in Public Life, the ONE Campaign, Oxfam America, and, of course, our hosts, Messiah College.”


But from my perspective, the characterization of people in a way that really seemed to be elitist and out of touch is something that we have to overcome.
CLINTON: Well, I'm going to let Senator Obama speak for himself.
The order tonight was decided by coin toss.
BROWN: Tonight, we're going to spend about half of our time with Senator Clinton, about half of our time with Senator Obama.
MEACHAM: Thank you.
Welcome, Jon.
He is the editor of Newsweek and one of America's best-known writers of religion and matters of faith.
Please welcome Jon Meacham.
And I'd like now to introduce my co-host.
Before we get started, on behalf of CNN and the candidates, I'd like to thank the people behind tonight's event, Faith in Public Life, the ONE Campaign, Oxfam America, and, of course, our hosts, Messiah College.



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The President was determined to go to war.”
“"The political winds were blowing in a different direction.”
“And so a war over secession became an opportunity to set the captives free.”
“And what we saw that morning was a challenge to a new generation.The history of America is one of tragedy turned into triumph.”
“It seemed all of the misery and all of the evil in the world were in that rolling black cloud, blocking out the September sun.What we saw that morning forced us to recognize that in a new world of threats, we are no longer protected by our own power.”
“Back at my law office, I watched the images from New York: a plane vanishing into glass and steel; men and women clinging to windowsills, then letting go; tall towers crumbling to dust.”
“We mourned the terrible loss suffered by our fellow citizens.”
“We feared for our families and our country.”
“By the time I got to my meeting, the second plane had hit, and we were told to evacuate.People gathered in the streets and looked up at the sky and the Sears Tower, transformed from a workplace to a target.”
“...news on my car radio a plane had hit the World Trade Center...”


The President was determined to go to war.
"The political winds were blowing in a different direction.
And so a war over secession became an opportunity to set the captives free.
And what we saw that morning was a challenge to a new generation.The history of America is one of tragedy turned into triumph.
It seemed all of the misery and all of the evil in the world were in that rolling black cloud, blocking out the September sun.What we saw that morning forced us to recognize that in a new world of threats, we are no longer protected by our own power.
Back at my law office, I watched the images from New York: a plane vanishing into glass and steel; men and women clinging to windowsills, then letting go; tall towers crumbling to dust.
We mourned the terrible loss suffered by our fellow citizens.
We feared for our families and our country.
By the time I got to my meeting, the second plane had hit, and we were told to evacuate.People gathered in the streets and looked up at the sky and the Sears Tower, transformed from a workplace to a target.
...news on my car radio a plane had hit the World Trade Center...



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“What more can you do?”
“TAPPER: Job creation has not gone as well as you hoped.”
“TAPPER: Don't you think it will slow economic growth?”
“We think that's the responsible thing to do because we need to make sure we can show the world that they're willing as a country now to start to make some progress bringing down our long -- our long-term deficits.”
“Now, we also think it's responsible to let the tax cuts expire that just go to 2 percent to 3 percent of Americans, the highest earning Americans.”
“We think it's responsible.”
“We think it's fair.”
“We think it's the right package.”
“We think that's a -- the -- it's a very strong package.”
“...invest in expanding output...”


What more can you do?
TAPPER: Job creation has not gone as well as you hoped.
TAPPER: Don't you think it will slow economic growth?
We think that's the responsible thing to do because we need to make sure we can show the world that they're willing as a country now to start to make some progress bringing down our long -- our long-term deficits.
Now, we also think it's responsible to let the tax cuts expire that just go to 2 percent to 3 percent of Americans, the highest earning Americans.
We think it's responsible.
We think it's fair.
We think it's the right package.
We think that's a -- the -- it's a very strong package.
...invest in expanding output...



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s time for our government to get serious about shared sacrifice.”
“Twelve members of Congress will soon take on the crucial job of rearranging our country’s finances.”
“...has compiled data from the returns of the 400 Americans reporting the largest income.”
“In 1992, the top 400 had aggregate taxable income of $16.9 billion and paid federal taxes of 29.2 percent on that sum.”
“In 2008, the aggregate income of the highest 400 had soared to $90.9 billion — a staggering $227.4 million on average — but the rate paid had fallen to 21.5 percent.”
“The taxes I refer to here include only federal income tax, but you can be sure that any payroll tax for the 400 was inconsequential compared to income.”
“In fact, 88 of the 400 in 2008 reported no wages at all, though every one of them reported capital gains.”
“Some of my brethren may shun work but they all like to invest.”
“(I can relate to that.)”
“I know well many of the mega-rich and, by and large, they are very decent people.”


It’s time for our government to get serious about shared sacrifice.
Twelve members of Congress will soon take on the crucial job of rearranging our country’s finances.
...has compiled data from the returns of the 400 Americans reporting the largest income.
In 1992, the top 400 had aggregate taxable income of $16.9 billion and paid federal taxes of 29.2 percent on that sum.
In 2008, the aggregate income of the highest 400 had soared to $90.9 billion — a staggering $227.4 million on average — but the rate paid had fallen to 21.5 percent.
The taxes I refer to here include only federal income tax, but you can be sure that any payroll tax for the 400 was inconsequential compared to income.
In fact, 88 of the 400 in 2008 reported no wages at all, though every one of them reported capital gains.
Some of my brethren may shun work but they all like to invest.
(I can relate to that.)
I know well many of the mega-rich and, by and large, they are very decent people.



**Something goes wrong**
“Is it true that her email server and a thumb drive were recently turned over to the government?”
“The Department of Justice is now seeking assurances about the storage of materials related to Clinton’s email account.”
“A Politifact analysis also confirmed that Clinton s practices complied with laws and regulations including support from the former director of a prominent government accountability organization In Clinton s defense we should note that it was only after Clinton left the State Department that the National Archives issued a recommendation...”
“In fact, more than 90% of those emails should have already been captured in the State Department’s email system before she provided them with paper copies.”
“As she has stated, Clinton's practice was to email government officials on their ".gov" accounts, so her work emails were immediately captured and preserved.”
“The regulation recognizes the use of non-government email accounts.”
“...recordkeeping system...”
“The 2009 National Archives regulation in place during her tenure required that a gencies that allow employees to send and receive official electronic mail messages using a system not operated by the agency must ensure that Federal records sent or received on such systems are preserved in the appropriate agency...”
“The laws, regulations, and State Department policy in place during her tenure permitted her to use a non-government email for work.”
“Yes.”


Is it true that her email server and a thumb drive were recently turned over to the government?
The Department of Justice is now seeking assurances about the storage of materials related to Clinton’s email account.
A Politifact analysis also confirmed that Clinton s practices complied with laws and regulations including support from the former director of a prominent government accountability organization In Clinton s defense we should note that it was only after Clinton left the State Department that the National Archives issued a recommendation...
In fact, more than 90% of those emails should have already been captured in the State Department’s email system before she provided them with paper copies.
As she has stated, Clinton's practice was to email government officials on their ".gov" accounts, so her work emails were immediately captured and preserved.
The regulation recognizes the use of non-government email accounts.
...recordkeeping system...
The 2009 National Archives regulation in place during her tenure required that a gencies that allow employees to send and receive official electronic mail messages using a system not operated by the agency must ensure that Federal records sent or received on such systems are preserved in the appropriate agency...
The laws, regulations, and State Department policy in place during her tenure permitted her to use a non-government email for work.
Yes.



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...the debt...”
“Paul said.”
“Feb 4 2011 In an exclusive interview with ABC News Sen Rand Paul R Ky took aim at the newly released House GOP budget saying it falls far short of what needs to be done to deal with the federal...”
“...deficit...”
“"It's really not going to touch the problem," Paul said.”
“"There's a disconnect between Republicans who want a balanced budget but aren't maybe yet brave enough to talk about the cuts to come."”
“The plan by House Budget Committee Chairman Paul Ryan, R-Wis., released on Thursday, would cut non-security discretionary spending by $58 billion by the end of fiscal year 2011, which ends on Sept. 30.”
“In an far-ranging interview aboard the Capitol Subway, Paul embraced the label "true believer" and said staying true to the principles of the Tea Party movement is more important to him than being a Republican.”
“He also refused to rule out a future run for president and suggested it may be time to reduce U.S. force levels in Afghanistan.”
“Paul has proposed his own plan to cut spending by $500 billion this year.”


...the debt...
Paul said.
Feb 4 2011 In an exclusive interview with ABC News Sen Rand Paul R Ky took aim at the newly released House GOP budget saying it falls far short of what needs to be done to deal with the federal...
...deficit...
"It's really not going to touch the problem," Paul said.
"There's a disconnect between Republicans who want a balanced budget but aren't maybe yet brave enough to talk about the cuts to come."
The plan by House Budget Committee Chairman Paul Ryan, R-Wis., released on Thursday, would cut non-security discretionary spending by $58 billion by the end of fiscal year 2011, which ends on Sept. 30.
In an far-ranging interview aboard the Capitol Subway, Paul embraced the label "true believer" and said staying true to the principles of the Tea Party movement is more important to him than being a Republican.
He also refused to rule out a future run for president and suggested it may be time to reduce U.S. force levels in Afghanistan.
Paul has proposed his own plan to cut spending by $500 billion this year.



Number  38
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Based on that, and which you're now expressing your discomfort with it, in the debate that Al Gore had with Ross Perot, Al Gore said the following: "If you don't like NAFTA and what it's done, we can get out of it in six months.”
“Now, I think that Senator Clinton has shifted positions on this and believes that we should have strong environmental standards and labor standards, and I think that's a good thing.”
“And I have laid out my criticism, but in addition my plan, for actually fixing NAFTA.”
“Again, I have received a lot of incoming criticism from Senator Obama.”
“And the Cleveland Plain Dealer examined Senator Obama's attacks on me regarding NAFTA and said they were erroneous.”
“So I would hope that, again, we can get to a debate about what the real issues are and where we stand because we do need to fix NAFTA.”
“It is not working.”
“It was, unfortunately, heavily disadvantaging many of our industries, particularly manufacturing.”
“I have a record of standing up for that, of chairing the Manufacturing Caucus in the Senate, and I will take a tough position on these trade agreements.”
“MR. WILLIAMS: Senator, thank you.”


Based on that, and which you're now expressing your discomfort with it, in the debate that Al Gore had with Ross Perot, Al Gore said the following: "If you don't like NAFTA and what it's done, we can get out of it in six months.
Now, I think that Senator Clinton has shifted positions on this and believes that we should have strong environmental standards and labor standards, and I think that's a good thing.
And I have laid out my criticism, but in addition my plan, for actually fixing NAFTA.
Again, I have received a lot of incoming criticism from Senator Obama.
And the Cleveland Plain Dealer examined Senator Obama's attacks on me regarding NAFTA and said they were erroneous.
So I would hope that, again, we can get to a debate about what the real issues are and where we stand because we do need to fix NAFTA.
It is not working.
It was, unfortunately, heavily disadvantaging many of our industries, particularly manufacturing.
I have a record of standing up for that, of chairing the Manufacturing Caucus in the Senate, and I will take a tough position on these trade agreements.
MR. WILLIAMS: Senator, thank you.



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“###”
“I will work hard to continue to secure funding for these critical programs.”“These are welcome investments for the Hudson Valley,” said Senator Clinton.”
“Senators Charles E Schumer and Hillary Rodham Clinton today announced that the full Senate Appropriations Committee has approved the Labor Health and Human Services and Education FY08 Appropriations Bill which includes 1 000 000 for Bethel Performing Arts and 300”
“000 for SUNY New Paltz...”
“The bill will now proceed to the Senate Floor as the next step in the appropriations process.”
“Schumer and Clinton worked closely with members of the Appropriations Committee to include funding for the project in this year’s spending bill.”
““This is great news for the Hudson Valley,” said Schumer.”
““These projects are designed to strengthen various aspects of the community from encouraging the arts to creating stronger and more specialized academic programs for our students.”
“These funds will help the for the Bethel Woods Center for the Arts continue to promote education the arts culture and tourism in the region and will help SUNY New Paltz continue its world class curriculum for students Bethel Performing...”
“Following approval by the Senate, the bill will move towards Conference with the House and then to the President for signature.”


###
I will work hard to continue to secure funding for these critical programs.”“These are welcome investments for the Hudson Valley,” said Senator Clinton.
Senators Charles E Schumer and Hillary Rodham Clinton today announced that the full Senate Appropriations Committee has approved the Labor Health and Human Services and Education FY08 Appropriations Bill which includes 1 000 000 for Bethel Performing Arts and 300
000 for SUNY New Paltz...
The bill will now proceed to the Senate Floor as the next step in the appropriations process.
Schumer and Clinton worked closely with members of the Appropriations Committee to include funding for the project in this year’s spending bill.
“This is great news for the Hudson Valley,” said Schumer.
“These projects are designed to strengthen various aspects of the community from encouraging the arts to creating stronger and more specialized academic programs for our students.
These funds will help the for the Bethel Woods Center for the Arts continue to promote education the arts culture and tourism in the region and will help SUNY New Paltz continue its world class curriculum for students Bethel Performing...
Following approval by the Senate, the bill will move towards Conference with the House and then to the President for signature.



Number  40
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“On balance, we rate the statement Mostly True.”
“...as evidence that domestic oil production is on a healthy trendline...”
“"We need to continue to boost domestic production of oil and gas," he said.”
“"Last year, American oil production reached its highest level since 2003.”
“Let me repeat that.”
“Our oil production reached its highest level in seven years.”
“Oil production from federal waters in the Gulf of Mexico reached an all-time high.”
“For the first time in more than a decade, imports accounted for less than half of what we consumed.”
“So any notion that my administration has shut down oil production might make for a good political sound bite but it doesn t match up with reality In this item we ll check the first piece of evidence to support his contention that his administration hasn t shut down oil...”
“...production that last year American oil production reached its highest level since 2003”


On balance, we rate the statement Mostly True.
...as evidence that domestic oil production is on a healthy trendline...
"We need to continue to boost domestic production of oil and gas," he said.
"Last year, American oil production reached its highest level since 2003.
Let me repeat that.
Our oil production reached its highest level in seven years.
Oil production from federal waters in the Gulf of Mexico reached an all-time high.
For the first time in more than a decade, imports accounted for less than half of what we consumed.
So any notion that my administration has shut down oil production might make for a good political sound bite but it doesn t match up with reality In this item we ll check the first piece of evidence to support his contention that his administration hasn t shut down oil...
...production that last year American oil production reached its highest level since 2003



Number  41
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“- Kirk Duncan, Vice President, Waste Management Inc.”
“The Hays Research Group's research helped guide our decision making process with fast, reliable and accurate data."”
“We will not share your email address with anyone.”
“Survey Methodology This survey was fielded July 24 -25, 2008 as part of the Hays Research Group Statewide Opinion Counts Survey.”
“404 completed respondents were interviewed The margin of error for the data collected is 4 86 for a 404 response survey for the data analyzed in its entirety with a 95 confidence level meaning that we can be 95 sure that if every resident of the State with working telephone...”
“...numbers who have at least one member who has voted in at least two of the last four local or state elections was actually surveyed the results would vary by no more than 4 86 in either direction...”
“The survey sample used was a computer generated random list derived from a database of all households within the State of Alaska with working telephone numbers who have at least one member who has voted in at least two of the last four local or state elections.”
“The sample frame was designed to accurately reflect the actual population percentages.”
“Respondents were screened to confirm they were over 18 and each household was attempted at least four times over a period of several days to account for non-response bias.”
“Data was analyzed utilizing SPSS Quancept Software.”


- Kirk Duncan, Vice President, Waste Management Inc.
The Hays Research Group's research helped guide our decision making process with fast, reliable and accurate data."
We will not share your email address with anyone.
Survey Methodology This survey was fielded July 24 -25, 2008 as part of the Hays Research Group Statewide Opinion Counts Survey.
404 completed respondents were interviewed The margin of error for the data collected is 4 86 for a 404 response survey for the data analyzed in its entirety with a 95 confidence level meaning that we can be 95 sure that if every resident of the State with working telephone...
...numbers who have at least one member who has voted in at least two of the last four local or state elections was actually surveyed the results would vary by no more than 4 86 in either direction...
The survey sample used was a computer generated random list derived from a database of all households within the State of Alaska with working telephone numbers who have at least one member who has voted in at least two of the last four local or state elections.
The sample frame was designed to accurately reflect the actual population percentages.
Respondents were screened to confirm they were over 18 and each household was attempted at least four times over a period of several days to account for non-response bias.
Data was analyzed utilizing SPSS Quancept Software.



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The biggest potential source of money for the wall would come from remittance seizure: remittance payments are money that immigrants, legal and illegal, earn in their country of residence and send back to their families in their native country.”
“Accounting for all the fees on over a million border crossing cards and visas in a year year – and even accounting for a twofold increase in those fees – that would still only generate about half a billion dollars, well short of an $8 billion price tag.”
“No decisions have been made, GOP sources said.”
“But doing so would force a showdown with Senate Democrats and potentially threaten a government shutdown.”
“If Mexico refuses to pay for the wall, the GOP could add billions of dollars into the spending bill that needs to pass by April 28 to keep the government open.”
“The Associated Press and Politico first reported elements of the talks earlier Thursday.”
“Mexican leaders have repeatedly said they will not pay for the wall.”
““Democrats may well find themselves in the position to shut down all of government to stop the buildout of a wall, or of a barrier, or of a fence,” Messer said.”
“Messer admitted it’s “big dollars, but it’s a question of priorities.” He pointed to a border security bill that Homeland Security Chairman Mike McCaul proposed last year that cost roughly $10 billion.”
“Rep Luke Messer said on Thursday...”


The biggest potential source of money for the wall would come from remittance seizure: remittance payments are money that immigrants, legal and illegal, earn in their country of residence and send back to their families in their native country.
Accounting for all the fees on over a million border crossing cards and visas in a year year – and even accounting for a twofold increase in those fees – that would still only generate about half a billion dollars, well short of an $8 billion price tag.
No decisions have been made, GOP sources said.
But doing so would force a showdown with Senate Democrats and potentially threaten a government shutdown.
If Mexico refuses to pay for the wall, the GOP could add billions of dollars into the spending bill that needs to pass by April 28 to keep the government open.
The Associated Press and Politico first reported elements of the talks earlier Thursday.
Mexican leaders have repeatedly said they will not pay for the wall.
“Democrats may well find themselves in the position to shut down all of government to stop the buildout of a wall, or of a barrier, or of a fence,” Messer said.
Messer admitted it’s “big dollars, but it’s a question of priorities.” He pointed to a border security bill that Homeland Security Chairman Mike McCaul proposed last year that cost roughly $10 billion.
Rep Luke Messer said on Thursday...



Number  43
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Not just a change of Party in the White House, but change in Washington that the American people can believe in - unity instead of division; hope instead of fear; a politics that leaves behind the fights of the past so that we can finally take hold of our future.”
“I am running for President because I believe that we need fundamental change in America.”
“It is a story of immigrants who set out from distant shores; pioneers who persevered; and people of all races, religions, and ethnic groups who put aside their doubts to seek a new frontier.”
“It is a story of ideals that know no boundaries.”
“The story of America leads west.”
“Here, in Denver, fur trappers and traders; gold rushers and ranchers; came in search of opportunity, and made the future their own.”
“This city, built at the base of the Rocky Mountains, stands as a monument to a uniquely American belief in things unseen.”
“It is fitting that the journey leads to Denver - a city that is younger than the Democratic Party itself, but filled with the promise that our Party has always fought for.”
“It is through campaigns that we bring new people into the process; build new coalitions; and renew who we are and what we stand for as a Party.”
“Because it is through campaigns that we hear directly from the American people, set our common goals, and debate our differences.”


Not just a change of Party in the White House, but change in Washington that the American people can believe in - unity instead of division; hope instead of fear; a politics that leaves behind the fights of the past so that we can finally take hold of our future.
I am running for President because I believe that we need fundamental change in America.
It is a story of immigrants who set out from distant shores; pioneers who persevered; and people of all races, religions, and ethnic groups who put aside their doubts to seek a new frontier.
It is a story of ideals that know no boundaries.
The story of America leads west.
Here, in Denver, fur trappers and traders; gold rushers and ranchers; came in search of opportunity, and made the future their own.
This city, built at the base of the Rocky Mountains, stands as a monument to a uniquely American belief in things unseen.
It is fitting that the journey leads to Denver - a city that is younger than the Democratic Party itself, but filled with the promise that our Party has always fought for.
It is through campaigns that we bring new people into the process; build new coalitions; and renew who we are and what we stand for as a Party.
Because it is through campaigns that we hear directly from the American people, set our common goals, and debate our differences.



Number  44
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“1997 Senator Obama supported the interests of the Illinois Churches in Action - ILLCAAAP 0 percent in 1997.”
“1997-1998 Senator Obama supported the interests of the National Association of Social Workers - Illinois Chapter 100 percent in 1997-1998.”
“2006 According to the National Journal - Conservative on Social Policy calculations, in 2006 Senator Obama voted more conservative on social policy issues than 21 percent of the [HOUSE].”
“2006 Senator Obama supported the interests of the Population Connection 100 percent in 2006.”
“2006 Senator Obama supported the interests of the Secular Coalition for America 90 percent in 2006.”
“2005-2006 Senator Obama supported the interests of the Population Action International 100 percent in 2005-2006.”
“2005 Senator Obama supported the interests of the Drum Major Institute for Public Policy 75 percent in 2005.”
“2005 Senator Obama supported the interests of the Mennonite Central Committee 90 percent in 2005.”
“2005 Senator Obama supported the interests of the NETWORK, A National Catholic Social Justice Lobby 100 percent in 2005.”
“2005 Senator Obama supported the interests of the Population Connection 100 percent in 2005.”


1997 Senator Obama supported the interests of the Illinois Churches in Action - ILLCAAAP 0 percent in 1997.
1997-1998 Senator Obama supported the interests of the National Association of Social Workers - Illinois Chapter 100 percent in 1997-1998.
2006 According to the National Journal - Conservative on Social Policy calculations, in 2006 Senator Obama voted more conservative on social policy issues than 21 percent of the [HOUSE].
2006 Senator Obama supported the interests of the Population Connection 100 percent in 2006.
2006 Senator Obama supported the interests of the Secular Coalition for America 90 percent in 2006.
2005-2006 Senator Obama supported the interests of the Population Action International 100 percent in 2005-2006.
2005 Senator Obama supported the interests of the Drum Major Institute for Public Policy 75 percent in 2005.
2005 Senator Obama supported the interests of the Mennonite Central Committee 90 percent in 2005.
2005 Senator Obama supported the interests of the NETWORK, A National Catholic Social Justice Lobby 100 percent in 2005.
2005 Senator Obama supported the interests of the Population Connection 100 percent in 2005.



Number  45
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'It's her show, and she doesn't want it to be about Kim or anyone else.'”
“...hands the insider revealed...”
“The 19-year-old reality icon has refused to discuss her ex Tyga (who has a son with Blac Chyna) or her new beau Travis Scott, according to a report from Life & Style.”
“The Keeping Up With The Kardashians star only wants her spinoff to be about her businesses and her social media presence, it was claimed.”
“Schtum: Kylie Jenner is reportedly refusing to discuss dating life for her new show Life Of KylieNetwork executives are now panicking after test audiences found the show too boring.”
“'When the show was announced in April, the network had agreed to follow Kylie's life, meaning her personal life as well,' and insider claimed.”
“'But when it came time to shoot, Kylie only wanted to document her business and her life on social media.”
“She refused to talk about her dating life.'”
“The source claimed that E!”
“'s top brass are worried the show is 'going to be a disaster.'”


'It's her show, and she doesn't want it to be about Kim or anyone else.'
...hands the insider revealed...
The 19-year-old reality icon has refused to discuss her ex Tyga (who has a son with Blac Chyna) or her new beau Travis Scott, according to a report from Life & Style.
The Keeping Up With The Kardashians star only wants her spinoff to be about her businesses and her social media presence, it was claimed.
Schtum: Kylie Jenner is reportedly refusing to discuss dating life for her new show Life Of KylieNetwork executives are now panicking after test audiences found the show too boring.
'When the show was announced in April, the network had agreed to follow Kylie's life, meaning her personal life as well,' and insider claimed.
'But when it came time to shoot, Kylie only wanted to document her business and her life on social media.
She refused to talk about her dating life.'
The source claimed that E!
's top brass are worried the show is 'going to be a disaster.'



Number  46
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Quinn and Huck end up kissing and having sex at the parking garage outside Pope & Associates, which leads Maya to walk past them and stab Rowan.”
“Quinn is caught in the middle when Huck and Charlie disagree on the way of locating Dominic Bell.”
“[3] When Quinn discovers the body, she calls Olivia, who decides to clean up the crime scene.”
“Chambers attacks Gideon and stabs him in the neck with scissors, ultimately killing him.”
“When Gideon figures out the truth about Amanda and President Grant's alleged affair, he confronts Billy Chambers, who is revealed to have slept with Amanda.”
“Quinn and Gideon's relationship begins to evolve and they agree to be together as long as Gideon doesn't ask questions about Amanda Tanner.”
“Quinn begins to learn how the law-firm works and forms a friendship with Huck, the tech guy at the firm.”
“She begins to form a relationship with a news-reporter Gideon Wallace after trying to find out what he knows about Amanda Tanner.”
“[2] As Olivia hires Amanda as her client, Quinn is the only one in the office allowed to help her with the case.”
“She is tasked by Olivia to watch Amanda Tanner at the hospital after Amanda tries to commit suicide.”


Quinn and Huck end up kissing and having sex at the parking garage outside Pope & Associates, which leads Maya to walk past them and stab Rowan.
Quinn is caught in the middle when Huck and Charlie disagree on the way of locating Dominic Bell.
[3] When Quinn discovers the body, she calls Olivia, who decides to clean up the crime scene.
Chambers attacks Gideon and stabs him in the neck with scissors, ultimately killing him.
When Gideon figures out the truth about Amanda and President Grant's alleged affair, he confronts Billy Chambers, who is revealed to have slept with Amanda.
Quinn and Gideon's relationship begins to evolve and they agree to be together as long as Gideon doesn't ask questions about Amanda Tanner.
Quinn begins to learn how the law-firm works and forms a friendship with Huck, the tech guy at the firm.
She begins to form a relationship with a news-reporter Gideon Wallace after trying to find out what he knows about Amanda Tanner.
[2] As Olivia hires Amanda as her client, Quinn is the only one in the office allowed to help her with the case.
She is tasked by Olivia to watch Amanda Tanner at the hospital after Amanda tries to commit suicide.



Number  47
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“If you need a challenge on this machine, it's probably best to use a heavier weight and keep a neutral stance in your feet so you don't sacrifice form.”
“For me, it was a little too hard to successfully do the leg press with my feet together.”
“"There is no major advantage to doing the leg press with your feet together; it just works different muscle groups," she says.”
“This instruction was a bit of red flag, because having your feet closer together can put more pressure on your joints and make it more difficult to move the weight, Stone says.”
“From there, you transition to the leg press machine , but instead of placing your feet hip-width apart, you put them close together so that your knees are touching.”


If you need a challenge on this machine, it's probably best to use a heavier weight and keep a neutral stance in your feet so you don't sacrifice form.
For me, it was a little too hard to successfully do the leg press with my feet together.
"There is no major advantage to doing the leg press with your feet together; it just works different muscle groups," she says.
This instruction was a bit of red flag, because having your feet closer together can put more pressure on your joints and make it more difficult to move the weight, Stone says.
From there, you transition to the leg press machine , but instead of placing your feet hip-width apart, you put them close together so that your knees are touching.



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jason Aldean, who was on stage when the shooting began, also canceled his shows through October 12.”
“In the aftermath of Sunday’s shooting, which killed 58 and injured more than 500, fellow Vegas-based performer Jennifer Lopez canceled her shows through October 7, according to a statement obtained by Variety.”
“Dion also dedicate the show to the victims, their families, first responders, and doctors and nurses “who are working around the clock to save lives.”“I want you to know that you have made the right choice in being here tonight,” she said.”
““They are going to need a lot of love, a ton of emotional support, as well as a great deal of financial aid.”Her announcement that proceeds would be donated drew more than 30 seconds of applause from the crowd.”
“But tonight, we are going to let these families know that we are supporting them and that we will help them through their tragic loss,” she said.”
“...still suffering...”
“Should I still do my show only two days after the nightmare These are difficult questions Dion said she ultimately decided to go on with her performances to show love and support for those who are affected On Sunday we lost too many beautiful innocent souls and so many are...”
“For you, it’s, ‘Do we still go to Celine’s show on Tuesday night, only two days after the nightmare?’ For me, it’s, ‘Can I still do my show?”
““After Sunday night’s incredibly tragic event, all of us here find ourselves asking a similar question.”
““Tonight is very different,” Dion said ahead of her show, according to videos taken by fans.”


Jason Aldean, who was on stage when the shooting began, also canceled his shows through October 12.
In the aftermath of Sunday’s shooting, which killed 58 and injured more than 500, fellow Vegas-based performer Jennifer Lopez canceled her shows through October 7, according to a statement obtained by Variety.
Dion also dedicate the show to the victims, their families, first responders, and doctors and nurses “who are working around the clock to save lives.”“I want you to know that you have made the right choice in being here tonight,” she said.
“They are going to need a lot of love, a ton of emotional support, as well as a great deal of financial aid.”Her announcement that proceeds would be donated drew more than 30 seconds of applause from the crowd.
But tonight, we are going to let these families know that we are supporting them and that we will help them through their tragic loss,” she said.
...still suffering...
Should I still do my show only two days after the nightmare These are difficult questions Dion said she ultimately decided to go on with her performances to show love and support for those who are affected On Sunday we lost too many beautiful innocent souls and so many are...
For you, it’s, ‘Do we still go to Celine’s show on Tuesday night, only two days after the nightmare?’ For me, it’s, ‘Can I still do my show?
“After Sunday night’s incredibly tragic event, all of us here find ourselves asking a similar question.
“Tonight is very different,” Dion said ahead of her show, according to videos taken by fans.



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"We all know how it feels to want to belong, but only a few know how it really feels to not belong anywhere."”
“"My children are not at all perfect, and at home, he's like all the kids that come, but from what he looks like, he's good at school, talk to his kids," he encouraged.”
“Kimberly also explained that the video was taken after she picked up her song from school because she was afraid to go to lunch.”
“They stink, I guess."”
“"It's not your fault, but if you make fun of them, just do not let them bother you.”
“"It is not necessary to criticize people who are different," the angry boy urged anyone watching.”
“...the young man asked while talking to the camera, detailing how his teammates had spilled milk, mocked his appearance and called him "ugly".”
“What's the use?"”
“"Why do they intimidate?”
“The student's story went viral on Friday after Jones' mother, Kimberly Jones shared a video of her tearful son describing the bullying he suffers at school.”


"We all know how it feels to want to belong, but only a few know how it really feels to not belong anywhere."
"My children are not at all perfect, and at home, he's like all the kids that come, but from what he looks like, he's good at school, talk to his kids," he encouraged.
Kimberly also explained that the video was taken after she picked up her song from school because she was afraid to go to lunch.
They stink, I guess."
"It's not your fault, but if you make fun of them, just do not let them bother you.
"It is not necessary to criticize people who are different," the angry boy urged anyone watching.
...the young man asked while talking to the camera, detailing how his teammates had spilled milk, mocked his appearance and called him "ugly".
What's the use?"
"Why do they intimidate?
The student's story went viral on Friday after Jones' mother, Kimberly Jones shared a video of her tearful son describing the bullying he suffers at school.



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Each season would feature a brand new cast.”
“As previously reported, the project follows a group of friends as their lives intersect through five events.”
“Hulu also confirmed Wednesday that it has officially picked up Four Weddings and a Funeral, a series adaptation of the 1994 romantic comedy exec produced by Mindy Kaling and Matt Warburton.”
“In making the announcement, the streamer noted that last week’s Season 2 premiere earned double the viewership of last year’s Season 1 opener.”
“One week after the the Emmy-winning, dystopian drama launched its second season, Hulu has renewed the Elisabeth Moss-fronted series for a third season.”
“I’m sorry, Aunt Lydia, but The Handmaid’s Tale will continue — not that there was any doubt.”


Each season would feature a brand new cast.
As previously reported, the project follows a group of friends as their lives intersect through five events.
Hulu also confirmed Wednesday that it has officially picked up Four Weddings and a Funeral, a series adaptation of the 1994 romantic comedy exec produced by Mindy Kaling and Matt Warburton.
In making the announcement, the streamer noted that last week’s Season 2 premiere earned double the viewership of last year’s Season 1 opener.
One week after the the Emmy-winning, dystopian drama launched its second season, Hulu has renewed the Elisabeth Moss-fronted series for a third season.
I’m sorry, Aunt Lydia, but The Handmaid’s Tale will continue — not that there was any doubt.



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“However, it’s unclear how long the this romance lasted, as they’ve since broken up.”
“The two celebs took their romance public on Instagram.”
“However, it’s confirmed that the breakup rumours aren’t true.”
“...month old child...”
“...photography by steve granitz contributor getty November 2011 Jelena is over apparently Rumours that Gomez has dumped the Canadian pop star begin to surface after a Bieber fan claimed she had sex with him backstage at a show in October 2010 and that he is the father of her 4”
“Oh, young love.”
“...photography by Kevin Mazur/Contributor/GettyMay 2011: Billboard Music AwardsJelena looked happy and strong at the Billboard Music Awards.”
“Aren’t they adorable?”
“Photography by Jon Kopaloff/FilmMagicFebruary 2011: Jelena steps out on red carpet at the Vanity Fair Oscars partyYup, they finally made our dreams a reality by walking the red carpet together for the first time, thus confirming their young love.”
“But it wasn’t until January 2011 that the pop stars confirmed their romance, namely by partaking in major PDA while on vacation together in St. Lucia.”


However, it’s unclear how long the this romance lasted, as they’ve since broken up.
The two celebs took their romance public on Instagram.
However, it’s confirmed that the breakup rumours aren’t true.
...month old child...
...photography by steve granitz contributor getty November 2011 Jelena is over apparently Rumours that Gomez has dumped the Canadian pop star begin to surface after a Bieber fan claimed she had sex with him backstage at a show in October 2010 and that he is the father of her 4
Oh, young love.
...photography by Kevin Mazur/Contributor/GettyMay 2011: Billboard Music AwardsJelena looked happy and strong at the Billboard Music Awards.
Aren’t they adorable?
Photography by Jon Kopaloff/FilmMagicFebruary 2011: Jelena steps out on red carpet at the Vanity Fair Oscars partyYup, they finally made our dreams a reality by walking the red carpet together for the first time, thus confirming their young love.
But it wasn’t until January 2011 that the pop stars confirmed their romance, namely by partaking in major PDA while on vacation together in St. Lucia.



Number  52
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Where to stream Claws...”
“New episodes of Claws air Sunday nights at 9:00 p.m. Eastern on TNT.”
“If you guessed Game of Thrones… you’re wrong!”
“It’s Claws!”
“Premiering last year, the TNT dramedy takes a look at the life and crimes of a group of women who work at a South Florida nail salon.”
“Featuring an all-star cast that includes Emmy-nominated actress Niecy Nash, Carrie Preston, and Judy Reyes, this good women gone bad comedy is a fun mix of female friendship and organized crime.”
“Decider’s own Joe Reid called Claws one of TV’s “most unpredictable dramas” that’s both “addictive and delightful.”When can you expect Season 2 of Claws to hit Hulu?”
“Here’s everything you need to know!”
“WHAT CHANNEL DOES CLAWS COME ON?”
“You can catch all new episodes of Claws on TNT.”


Where to stream Claws...
New episodes of Claws air Sunday nights at 9:00 p.m. Eastern on TNT.
If you guessed Game of Thrones… you’re wrong!
It’s Claws!
Premiering last year, the TNT dramedy takes a look at the life and crimes of a group of women who work at a South Florida nail salon.
Featuring an all-star cast that includes Emmy-nominated actress Niecy Nash, Carrie Preston, and Judy Reyes, this good women gone bad comedy is a fun mix of female friendship and organized crime.
Decider’s own Joe Reid called Claws one of TV’s “most unpredictable dramas” that’s both “addictive and delightful.”When can you expect Season 2 of Claws to hit Hulu?
Here’s everything you need to know!
WHAT CHANNEL DOES CLAWS COME ON?
You can catch all new episodes of Claws on TNT.



Number  53
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Justin Hartley This Is Us NBC John Lithgow Perry Mason HBO Tobias Menzies The Crown Netflix Tom Pelphrey Ozark Netflix Michael K Williams Lovecraft Country HBO BEST SUPPORTING ACTRESS IN A DRAMA SERIES Gillian Anderson The Crown Netflix Cynthia Erivo The Outsider HBO Julia Garner Ozark Netflix Janet McTeer Ozark...”
“BEST ACTRESS IN A DRAMA SERIES Christine Baranski The Good Fight CBS All Access Olivia Colman The Crown Netflix Emma Corrin The Crown Netflix Claire Danes Homeland Showtime Laura Linney Ozark Netflix Jurnee Smollett Lovecraft Country HBO BEST SUPPORTING ACTOR IN A DRAMA SERIES Jonathan Banks Better Call Saul AMC”
“Josh O’Connor is nominated for Best Actor in a Drama Series, while Olivia Colman and Emma Corrin find themselves together in the Best Actress in a Drama Series category.”
““The Crown” also saw many of its royal players recognized.”
““Ozark” stars Jason Bateman and Laura Linney will vie for Best Actor in a Drama Series and Best Actress in a Drama Series respectively, while Tom Pelphrey, Julia Garner, and Janet McTeer are all nominated for their supporting roles.”
“This year, two Netflix series lead the pack, with “Ozark” and “The Crown” each up for six awards including Best Drama Series.”
“Film nominees will be revealed on February 8, and the format of this year’s event will be announced at a later date, as health and safety guidelines are taken into consideration.”
“The show will continue its combined Film and Television awards format, honoring the finest in both cinematic and televised/streaming achievement.”
“The winners will be revealed LIVE on The CW on Sunday, March 7, 2021 from 7-10pm ET/PT, with acclaimed film, television, and stage star Taye Diggs returning to host for his third consecutive time.”
“Association CCA announced today the series nominees for the 26th annual Critics Choice Awards...”


Justin Hartley This Is Us NBC John Lithgow Perry Mason HBO Tobias Menzies The Crown Netflix Tom Pelphrey Ozark Netflix Michael K Williams Lovecraft Country HBO BEST SUPPORTING ACTRESS IN A DRAMA SERIES Gillian Anderson The Crown Netflix Cynthia Erivo The Outsider HBO Julia Garner Ozark Netflix Janet McTeer Ozark...
BEST ACTRESS IN A DRAMA SERIES Christine Baranski The Good Fight CBS All Access Olivia Colman The Crown Netflix Emma Corrin The Crown Netflix Claire Danes Homeland Showtime Laura Linney Ozark Netflix Jurnee Smollett Lovecraft Country HBO BEST SUPPORTING ACTOR IN A DRAMA SERIES Jonathan Banks Better Call Saul AMC
Josh O’Connor is nominated for Best Actor in a Drama Series, while Olivia Colman and Emma Corrin find themselves together in the Best Actress in a Drama Series category.
“The Crown” also saw many of its royal players recognized.
“Ozark” stars Jason Bateman and Laura Linney will vie for Best Actor in a Drama Series and Best Actress in a Drama Series respectively, while Tom Pelphrey, Julia Garner, and Janet McTeer are all nominated for their supporting roles.
This year, two Netflix series lead the pack, with “Ozark” and “The Crown” each up for six awards including Best Drama Series.
Film nominees will be revealed on February 8, and the format of this year’s event will be announced at a later date, as health and safety guidelines are taken into consideration.
The show will continue its combined Film and Television awards format, honoring the finest in both cinematic and televised/streaming achievement.
The winners will be revealed LIVE on The CW on Sunday, March 7, 2021 from 7-10pm ET/PT, with acclaimed film, television, and stage star Taye Diggs returning to host for his third consecutive time.
Association CCA announced today the series nominees for the 26th annual Critics Choice Awards...



Number  54
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I don’t want it to ever end.”For more of Young’s story, pick up the latest issue of PEOPLE, on newsstands FridayRELATED VIDEO: Why Bellamy Young Said Olivia Pope Would Be ‘Distraught’ on Scandal Season Finale...”
““My first [adoptive] dad died when I was 15, and his best friend, Bill, did all the dad stuff with me, so I did a mushing of our names,” Young says.”
“...her off screen story is just as captivating...”
““I was adopted, so I was in foster care for six weeks,” the actress, 45, says in the latest issue of PEOPLE.”
““We only had two lines on my dad and a paragraph on my mom.”
“It said she loved to sing, so my mom who raised me would find any way to let me perform.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Young says she spent her youth in Asheville, North Carolina, learning ballet and tap dancing and performing at school and church.”
“After graduating from Yale, Young – who grew up with the first name Amy – spent a few years doing theater in New York before making the move to Los Angeles in 2000 to pursue TV and film work.”
““When I went to join the Screen Actors Guild, there was already an Amy Young so I had to register under a different name,” says Young.”
““I tried to become Susanna or Violet or something fabulous, but it just didn’t feel like I could carry the ruse off.”So the actress turned to her family for inspiration.”


I don’t want it to ever end.”For more of Young’s story, pick up the latest issue of PEOPLE, on newsstands FridayRELATED VIDEO: Why Bellamy Young Said Olivia Pope Would Be ‘Distraught’ on Scandal Season Finale...
“My first [adoptive] dad died when I was 15, and his best friend, Bill, did all the dad stuff with me, so I did a mushing of our names,” Young says.
...her off screen story is just as captivating...
“I was adopted, so I was in foster care for six weeks,” the actress, 45, says in the latest issue of PEOPLE.
“We only had two lines on my dad and a paragraph on my mom.
It said she loved to sing, so my mom who raised me would find any way to let me perform.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.
Young says she spent her youth in Asheville, North Carolina, learning ballet and tap dancing and performing at school and church.
After graduating from Yale, Young – who grew up with the first name Amy – spent a few years doing theater in New York before making the move to Los Angeles in 2000 to pursue TV and film work.
“When I went to join the Screen Actors Guild, there was already an Amy Young so I had to register under a different name,” says Young.
“I tried to become Susanna or Violet or something fabulous, but it just didn’t feel like I could carry the ruse off.”So the actress turned to her family for inspiration.



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Check out more from Lydia on her marriage, below.”
“After a family vote, it was unanimous that I should take a break.”
“Lydia McLaughlin has confirmed she will not return to The Real Housewives of Orange County.”
“Lydia returned to the SoCal crew in Season 12 after having previously spent some time on the show back in Season 8.”
““RHOC has given me a great platform and I’m grateful for that.”
“However, I feel like I can only handle this show one season at a time,” she wrote in a blog post on Friday (February 9).”
““I need a break!”
“There is a lot of good that comes from the show, but also a lot of negativity.”
“Sometimes the people who love us the most see things even we don’t see.”
“Last month, Meghan King Edmonds revealed her departure from the show.”


Check out more from Lydia on her marriage, below.
After a family vote, it was unanimous that I should take a break.
Lydia McLaughlin has confirmed she will not return to The Real Housewives of Orange County.
Lydia returned to the SoCal crew in Season 12 after having previously spent some time on the show back in Season 8.
“RHOC has given me a great platform and I’m grateful for that.
However, I feel like I can only handle this show one season at a time,” she wrote in a blog post on Friday (February 9).
“I need a break!
There is a lot of good that comes from the show, but also a lot of negativity.
Sometimes the people who love us the most see things even we don’t see.
Last month, Meghan King Edmonds revealed her departure from the show.



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: BarkShopThe Bachelorette...”
“You can get the rose bouquet toy Copper enjoyed on the show for your own pup, to show he’ll always be your final rose pick.”
“...every year.”
“The party Copper, Peter and Rachel attended was a mini West Coast follow-up to the giant BarkFest party BarkBox hosts in N.Y.C.”
“He is wearing a cast because he broke his toe “jumping off something.”He works to keep his gloriously fluffy coat in check.”
“He is Rachel’s best friend, obviously.”
“Here’s what we’ve dug up on Copper so far.”
“Until this dream comes true, we are focused on finding out as much as we can about Rachel’s dreamy dog.”
“Hopefully this a sign that a dog-based Bachelor show is on the horizon; one where all the contestants have dogs and can only date the Bachelor/Bachelorette if their dogs get along.”
“And while Peter made a superb first impression, it seems Copper is now the early front-runner for the final rose.”


Image zoom Credit: BarkShopThe Bachelorette...
You can get the rose bouquet toy Copper enjoyed on the show for your own pup, to show he’ll always be your final rose pick.
...every year.
The party Copper, Peter and Rachel attended was a mini West Coast follow-up to the giant BarkFest party BarkBox hosts in N.Y.C.
He is wearing a cast because he broke his toe “jumping off something.”He works to keep his gloriously fluffy coat in check.
He is Rachel’s best friend, obviously.
Here’s what we’ve dug up on Copper so far.
Until this dream comes true, we are focused on finding out as much as we can about Rachel’s dreamy dog.
Hopefully this a sign that a dog-based Bachelor show is on the horizon; one where all the contestants have dogs and can only date the Bachelor/Bachelorette if their dogs get along.
And while Peter made a superb first impression, it seems Copper is now the early front-runner for the final rose.



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...their divorce filings in April after almost two years of separation will continue to put their children Violet 11 Seraphina 8 and Samuel 5 first...”
“A friend of the actor tells PEOPLE that Affleck is committed to bettering himself and continues to stay on his path of wellness and spends time with his family FROM PEN EW s Top Ten Rom Com Movie Moments The friend adds that Affleck and Jennifer Garner 45 who coordinated...”
“I want my kids to know there is no shame in getting help when you need it, and to be a source of strength for anyone out there who needs help but is afraid to take the first step,” the post continued.”
““I want to live life to the fullest and be the best father I can be.”
“In March, Affleck revealed in a Facebook post that he had completed treatment for alcohol addiction, “something I’ve dealt with in the past and will continue to confront,” he wrote.”
“Ben Affleck and Girlfriend Lindsay Shookus Reunite — and He Visits Her OfficeIt’s not clear for whom they were buying the alcohol.”
“She captioned, “The one time I don’t look up at the customer AT ALL.”RELATED: Live From New York!”
“Noyes later posted a screenshot of security footage on Twitter in another post that has since been deleted.”
“Affleck and the Saturday Night Live producer visited the same store the day before.”
“...captioning it Met Ben Affleck at work today She has since deleted the post...”


...their divorce filings in April after almost two years of separation will continue to put their children Violet 11 Seraphina 8 and Samuel 5 first...
A friend of the actor tells PEOPLE that Affleck is committed to bettering himself and continues to stay on his path of wellness and spends time with his family FROM PEN EW s Top Ten Rom Com Movie Moments The friend adds that Affleck and Jennifer Garner 45 who coordinated...
I want my kids to know there is no shame in getting help when you need it, and to be a source of strength for anyone out there who needs help but is afraid to take the first step,” the post continued.
“I want to live life to the fullest and be the best father I can be.
In March, Affleck revealed in a Facebook post that he had completed treatment for alcohol addiction, “something I’ve dealt with in the past and will continue to confront,” he wrote.
Ben Affleck and Girlfriend Lindsay Shookus Reunite — and He Visits Her OfficeIt’s not clear for whom they were buying the alcohol.
She captioned, “The one time I don’t look up at the customer AT ALL.”RELATED: Live From New York!
Noyes later posted a screenshot of security footage on Twitter in another post that has since been deleted.
Affleck and the Saturday Night Live producer visited the same store the day before.
...captioning it Met Ben Affleck at work today She has since deleted the post...



Number  58
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“—Additional reporting by Mike Vulpo...”
“Bass and partner Michael Turchin joined Fatone in watching the show.”
“Other presenters included , and , , and , who introduced the Backstreet Boys as former singer cheered him on from the side of the stage.”
“The Thirteen Reasons Why stars were also spotted being swarmed by fans and took selfies with many of them.”
“Her boyfriend from SNL said her performance was "f--king lit."”
“The actors also introduced Ariana onstage.”
“Thirteen Reasons Why cast members Devin Druid (Tyler), Justin Prentice (Bryce) and Timothy Granaderos (Monty) were also seen rocking out and singing along to the Backstreet Boys from the side stage.”
“Iaconetti posted on Instagram a video of her and Haibon dancing together at Wango Tango to the Backstreet Boys' song "Everybody (Backstreet's Back)" with the caption, "Cringe away."”
“Performers at Wango Tango included , , the , , , and .”


—Additional reporting by Mike Vulpo...
Bass and partner Michael Turchin joined Fatone in watching the show.
Other presenters included , and , , and , who introduced the Backstreet Boys as former singer cheered him on from the side of the stage.
The Thirteen Reasons Why stars were also spotted being swarmed by fans and took selfies with many of them.
Her boyfriend from SNL said her performance was "f--king lit."
The actors also introduced Ariana onstage.
Thirteen Reasons Why cast members Devin Druid (Tyler), Justin Prentice (Bryce) and Timothy Granaderos (Monty) were also seen rocking out and singing along to the Backstreet Boys from the side stage.
Iaconetti posted on Instagram a video of her and Haibon dancing together at Wango Tango to the Backstreet Boys' song "Everybody (Backstreet's Back)" with the caption, "Cringe away."
Performers at Wango Tango included , , the , , , and .



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"So why is it different for a boy?"”
“NBC NewsThe mother said she was devastated when she received an email reply back saying "at this time it is not possible to book princess for a day for a boy," NBC News' British partner, ITV News reported.”
“Noah, who is a super fan of Princess Elsa in the film “Frozen” was “buzzing with excitement” when he learned about the makeover opportunity at the Disneyland Hotel, the boy’s mother, Hayley McLean-Glass, wrote in an open letter on her blog.”
“The hotel is located near the entrance of the park in the suburbs of Paris, France.”
“McLean-Glass, who is from Devon, England, wrote that she decided to book the experience for Noah as early Christmas gift.”
““I knew that there would be NOTHING he'd love more than to get to wear a pretty dress, put make up on like Mummy does and have his photo taken being one of his beloved Disney Princesses,” she wrote.”
“Disneyland Paris' description of the service on its website reads: "Grant every little girl's wish with a real Princess's make-up and hair-styling session; a fairytale transformation they'll treasure forever."”
“Noah McLean-Glass, three, stands next to his mother, Hayley McLean-Glass.”
““I was so angry, I literally couldn’t stop shaking for half an hour afterwards — I was just so shocked,” she told ITV.”
“"The way I look at it, if a little girl went to Disneyland and wanted to do a pirate experience or a 'Spider-Man' experience, there would be no way that they would stop a girl from doing that because there would be an uproar," she said.”


"So why is it different for a boy?"
NBC NewsThe mother said she was devastated when she received an email reply back saying "at this time it is not possible to book princess for a day for a boy," NBC News' British partner, ITV News reported.
Noah, who is a super fan of Princess Elsa in the film “Frozen” was “buzzing with excitement” when he learned about the makeover opportunity at the Disneyland Hotel, the boy’s mother, Hayley McLean-Glass, wrote in an open letter on her blog.
The hotel is located near the entrance of the park in the suburbs of Paris, France.
McLean-Glass, who is from Devon, England, wrote that she decided to book the experience for Noah as early Christmas gift.
“I knew that there would be NOTHING he'd love more than to get to wear a pretty dress, put make up on like Mummy does and have his photo taken being one of his beloved Disney Princesses,” she wrote.
Disneyland Paris' description of the service on its website reads: "Grant every little girl's wish with a real Princess's make-up and hair-styling session; a fairytale transformation they'll treasure forever."
Noah McLean-Glass, three, stands next to his mother, Hayley McLean-Glass.
“I was so angry, I literally couldn’t stop shaking for half an hour afterwards — I was just so shocked,” she told ITV.
"The way I look at it, if a little girl went to Disneyland and wanted to do a pirate experience or a 'Spider-Man' experience, there would be no way that they would stop a girl from doing that because there would be an uproar," she said.



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Scroll down below to see more photos of Perry and Bloom’s trip to the Vatican.”
“Bloom and Perry have been dating on and off since 2016 but have been spotted together several times since they last called it quits in March 2017.”
“The songstress was also accompanied by her manager, meditation teacher Bob Roth, and the CEO of the meditation nonprofit David Lynch Foundation.”
“The Grammy nominee spoke at the conference about how she uses transcendental meditation to treat her anxiety and stress instead of prescription drugs.”
“In one clip, Perry sat in a car as she expressed her excitement and said she was with her mom, Mary Perry, and “my darling” as she swung the camera towards Bloom.”
“Perry shared some videos on her Instagram Story during her visit to Rome and the Pirates of the Caribbean actor, 41, was by her side supporting her on her big day.”
“The “Swish Swish” singer, 33, was scheduled to be one of the speakers at the United to Cure event, which is an international conference focusing on finding a cure for cancer, on Saturday, April 28.”
“Katy Perry and her “darling” Orlando Bloom headed to the Vatican for a conference and the pair got to meet Pope Francis.”
“A blessed love!”


Scroll down below to see more photos of Perry and Bloom’s trip to the Vatican.
Bloom and Perry have been dating on and off since 2016 but have been spotted together several times since they last called it quits in March 2017.
The songstress was also accompanied by her manager, meditation teacher Bob Roth, and the CEO of the meditation nonprofit David Lynch Foundation.
The Grammy nominee spoke at the conference about how she uses transcendental meditation to treat her anxiety and stress instead of prescription drugs.
In one clip, Perry sat in a car as she expressed her excitement and said she was with her mom, Mary Perry, and “my darling” as she swung the camera towards Bloom.
Perry shared some videos on her Instagram Story during her visit to Rome and the Pirates of the Caribbean actor, 41, was by her side supporting her on her big day.
The “Swish Swish” singer, 33, was scheduled to be one of the speakers at the United to Cure event, which is an international conference focusing on finding a cure for cancer, on Saturday, April 28.
Katy Perry and her “darling” Orlando Bloom headed to the Vatican for a conference and the pair got to meet Pope Francis.
A blessed love!



Number  61
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our Email Newsletters here.”
“...to actors Nicole Kidman and Dustin Hoffman director Sofia Coppola producer Jason Blum cinematographer Ed Lachman and a Gotham Humanitarian Tribute to Al Gore...”
“And we’re off to the races!”
“The Independent Filmmaker Project (IFP) officially kicked off the 2017-18 awards season with this evening’s 27th Annual Gotham Awards, which took place at Cipriani Wall Street in New York City and were hosted by John Cameron Mitchell.”
“Jordan Peele’s “Get Out” proved to be the night’s biggest winner, with three wins, including Best Screenplay, the Audience Award, and Breakthrough Director.”
“Luca Guadagnino’s “Call Me by Your Name” proved victorious in the Best Feature category, winning out against a stacked list of competitors.”
“Earlier in the night, star Timothee Chalamet won the Breakthrough Actor award for his star-making turn in the romance.”
“The ceremony s nomination list was studded with some of the year s most beloved indies including Get Out Call Me by Your Name Greta Gerwig s Lady Bird Kogonada s Columbus and Sean Baker s The Florida Project In addition to the competitive awards Gotham Award Tributes were given...”
“This year’s nomination jury included IndieWire’s own Jude Dry, David Ehrlich, Eric Kohn, and Liz Shannon Miller.”
“Myes Sign Up Stay on top of the latest breaking film and TV news...”


Sign up for our Email Newsletters here.
...to actors Nicole Kidman and Dustin Hoffman director Sofia Coppola producer Jason Blum cinematographer Ed Lachman and a Gotham Humanitarian Tribute to Al Gore...
And we’re off to the races!
The Independent Filmmaker Project (IFP) officially kicked off the 2017-18 awards season with this evening’s 27th Annual Gotham Awards, which took place at Cipriani Wall Street in New York City and were hosted by John Cameron Mitchell.
Jordan Peele’s “Get Out” proved to be the night’s biggest winner, with three wins, including Best Screenplay, the Audience Award, and Breakthrough Director.
Luca Guadagnino’s “Call Me by Your Name” proved victorious in the Best Feature category, winning out against a stacked list of competitors.
Earlier in the night, star Timothee Chalamet won the Breakthrough Actor award for his star-making turn in the romance.
The ceremony s nomination list was studded with some of the year s most beloved indies including Get Out Call Me by Your Name Greta Gerwig s Lady Bird Kogonada s Columbus and Sean Baker s The Florida Project In addition to the competitive awards Gotham Award Tributes were given...
This year’s nomination jury included IndieWire’s own Jude Dry, David Ehrlich, Eric Kohn, and Liz Shannon Miller.
Myes Sign Up Stay on top of the latest breaking film and TV news...



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Getty ImagesFujikawa's LinkedIn profile also states that he went to New York University starting in 2004 where he studied music.”
“He went to NYU.”
“Here is everything you need to know about the first-time dad.”
“She and Fujikawa began dating a little more than a year ago, and this will be the couple's first child together.”
“Hudson has two children, Ryder Russell Robinson, 15, and Bingham Hawn Bellamy, 8, from previous relationships with Chris Robinson and Matt Bellamy, respectively.”
“Hudson captioned the post, adding that they have "a little girl on the way."”
“"My kids, Danny, myself and the entire family are crazy excited!"”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“Back in April 2018, Hudson announced she and Fujikawa were having a baby with an Instagram video of their exciting gender-reveal party.”


Getty ImagesFujikawa's LinkedIn profile also states that he went to New York University starting in 2004 where he studied music.
He went to NYU.
Here is everything you need to know about the first-time dad.
She and Fujikawa began dating a little more than a year ago, and this will be the couple's first child together.
Hudson has two children, Ryder Russell Robinson, 15, and Bingham Hawn Bellamy, 8, from previous relationships with Chris Robinson and Matt Bellamy, respectively.
Hudson captioned the post, adding that they have "a little girl on the way."
"My kids, Danny, myself and the entire family are crazy excited!"
You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.
This content is imported from Instagram.
Back in April 2018, Hudson announced she and Fujikawa were having a baby with an Instagram video of their exciting gender-reveal party.



Number  63
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“News reported that Odell was laid to rest in a private funeral service on June 13.”
“We will not be making anymore statements.”E!”
“We are now going to try to make sense of our immeasurable loss privately.”
“Our family will always carry that truth forward.”“Our wish is that the rest of the world who knew and loved him does as well.”
“He had so much more to share.”
““He will always be a shining light and a brilliant, loving and talented soul.”
““The Odell family has lost our beloved son and brother, Jackson Odell, on Friday,” the statement read.”
““He was found unresponsive.”RELATED VIDEO: Goldbergs and Modern Family Actor Jackson Odell, 20, Found DeadAfter his death, Odell’s family released a statement on Twitter.”
““There was no paraphernalia or legal drugs found on the scene,” Assistant Chief Coroner Ed Winter told PEOPLE at the time.”
“Odell was found dead in a Los Angeles sober living home on June 8.”


News reported that Odell was laid to rest in a private funeral service on June 13.
We will not be making anymore statements.”E!
We are now going to try to make sense of our immeasurable loss privately.
Our family will always carry that truth forward.”“Our wish is that the rest of the world who knew and loved him does as well.
He had so much more to share.
“He will always be a shining light and a brilliant, loving and talented soul.
“The Odell family has lost our beloved son and brother, Jackson Odell, on Friday,” the statement read.
“He was found unresponsive.”RELATED VIDEO: Goldbergs and Modern Family Actor Jackson Odell, 20, Found DeadAfter his death, Odell’s family released a statement on Twitter.
“There was no paraphernalia or legal drugs found on the scene,” Assistant Chief Coroner Ed Winter told PEOPLE at the time.
Odell was found dead in a Los Angeles sober living home on June 8.



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tweet This...”
“Story continues below advertisementIf you or someone you know is having suicidal thoughts, is in crisis or needs someone to talk to, you can find 24-hour help through the Canadian Association for Suicide Prevention.”
“A note written by Carrey’s ex-girlfriend Cathriona White has surfaced, alleging the actor “introduced” her to multiple things, including hard drugs and prostitutes.”
“The opposition’s lawyer has already accused Carrey of giving White three sexually transmitted infections (STIs).”
“The letter was allegedly written in April 2013.”
“White intentionally overdosed on prescription medication, which was supposedly provided by Carrey.”
“The wrongful death lawsuit against Carrey was filed by White’s estranged husband, Mark Burton, and White’s mother, Brigid Sweetman, who amalgamated their complaints into one single case.”
“WATCH BELOW: The latest on the Jim Carrey lawsuitStory continues below advertisementThe body of the 30-year-old makeup artist, originally from Ireland, was discovered in her Los Angeles home in September 2015.”
“She and Carrey, 55, met in 2012, and dated on and off.”
“There was some hope for a settlement out-of-court between the parties, but Burton and Sweetman’s lawyer, Michael Avenatti, has insisted multiple times in the past that he wants Carrey to take the stand at trial and has been demanding his deposition for months.”


Tweet This...
Story continues below advertisementIf you or someone you know is having suicidal thoughts, is in crisis or needs someone to talk to, you can find 24-hour help through the Canadian Association for Suicide Prevention.
A note written by Carrey’s ex-girlfriend Cathriona White has surfaced, alleging the actor “introduced” her to multiple things, including hard drugs and prostitutes.
The opposition’s lawyer has already accused Carrey of giving White three sexually transmitted infections (STIs).
The letter was allegedly written in April 2013.
White intentionally overdosed on prescription medication, which was supposedly provided by Carrey.
The wrongful death lawsuit against Carrey was filed by White’s estranged husband, Mark Burton, and White’s mother, Brigid Sweetman, who amalgamated their complaints into one single case.
WATCH BELOW: The latest on the Jim Carrey lawsuitStory continues below advertisementThe body of the 30-year-old makeup artist, originally from Ireland, was discovered in her Los Angeles home in September 2015.
She and Carrey, 55, met in 2012, and dated on and off.
There was some hope for a settlement out-of-court between the parties, but Burton and Sweetman’s lawyer, Michael Avenatti, has insisted multiple times in the past that he wants Carrey to take the stand at trial and has been demanding his deposition for months.



Number  65
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“The film stumbled at the box office but Alwyn remains grateful It s still the most amazing experience I ve ever had Landing a starring role so soon could have turned his head but the young actor stayed focused on his work and regrouped by taking a number of smaller...”
“Christian AnwanderIn 2017, British actor Joe Alwyn shot four films across three continents in less than twelve months, and the resulting projects, all of which hit theaters in the latter half of this year, reveal his impressive range in a series of small but critical roles.”
“First came Operation Finale, about the hunt for Nazi officer Adolf Eichmann (Ben Kingsley), with Alwyn as Eichmann’s son.”
“Then there was Boy Erased, a film about gay-­conversion therapy, in which Alwyn, alongside a cast including Nicole Kidman, Russell Crowe, and Lucas Hedges, played a closeted predator.”
“The Favourite soon followed, a riotous period piece with Alwyn, as a besotted courtier, revealing a knack for physical comedy opposite Emma Stone.”
“Coat ($930) by AMI Alexandre Mattiussi; turtleneck ($980) by Prada; trousers ($348) by Boss; sneakers ($180) by New Balance x Stüssy.”
“Christian AnwanderThis month, the twenty-­seven-year-old appears in a very different kind of period film, Mary Queen of Scots.”
“Directed by Josie Rourke it tells the true story of two young queens who are cousins and rivals for the English crown with a fierce and brilliant Saoirse Ronan in the role of Mary and Margot Robbie as a powerful yet vulnerable Elizabeth I Alwyn plays Robert Dudley Elizabeth s...”
“...right hand...”


You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...
The film stumbled at the box office but Alwyn remains grateful It s still the most amazing experience I ve ever had Landing a starring role so soon could have turned his head but the young actor stayed focused on his work and regrouped by taking a number of smaller...
Christian AnwanderIn 2017, British actor Joe Alwyn shot four films across three continents in less than twelve months, and the resulting projects, all of which hit theaters in the latter half of this year, reveal his impressive range in a series of small but critical roles.
First came Operation Finale, about the hunt for Nazi officer Adolf Eichmann (Ben Kingsley), with Alwyn as Eichmann’s son.
Then there was Boy Erased, a film about gay-­conversion therapy, in which Alwyn, alongside a cast including Nicole Kidman, Russell Crowe, and Lucas Hedges, played a closeted predator.
The Favourite soon followed, a riotous period piece with Alwyn, as a besotted courtier, revealing a knack for physical comedy opposite Emma Stone.
Coat ($930) by AMI Alexandre Mattiussi; turtleneck ($980) by Prada; trousers ($348) by Boss; sneakers ($180) by New Balance x Stüssy.
Christian AnwanderThis month, the twenty-­seven-year-old appears in a very different kind of period film, Mary Queen of Scots.
Directed by Josie Rourke it tells the true story of two young queens who are cousins and rivals for the English crown with a fierce and brilliant Saoirse Ronan in the role of Mary and Margot Robbie as a powerful yet vulnerable Elizabeth I Alwyn plays Robert Dudley Elizabeth s...
...right hand...



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Beyond that, we are not going to engage with a story based on rumours from unnamed sources."”
“Recent years have seen an ever-closer working relationship between all the different royal households and their respective teams...”
“According to E!”
“...and the U.K.’s The Times, the prince’s staff is reportedly planning his transition to king.”
“It’s all part of a bigger plan called “Project 70.” We love hearing royal family news, so we’re all ears.”
“(Hey, even the real queen watches The Crown.)”
“Project 70 refers to Prince Charles becoming king by his 70th birthday.”
“That’s not too far away — Prince Charles turns 70 on November 14, 2018.”
“According to The Times, his staff is “keen to ‘accelerate’ plans to increase his involvement in key royal events” by then.”
“Here’s what that involvement might look like, according to The Times.”


Beyond that, we are not going to engage with a story based on rumours from unnamed sources."
Recent years have seen an ever-closer working relationship between all the different royal households and their respective teams...
According to E!
...and the U.K.’s The Times, the prince’s staff is reportedly planning his transition to king.
It’s all part of a bigger plan called “Project 70.” We love hearing royal family news, so we’re all ears.
(Hey, even the real queen watches The Crown.)
Project 70 refers to Prince Charles becoming king by his 70th birthday.
That’s not too far away — Prince Charles turns 70 on November 14, 2018.
According to The Times, his staff is “keen to ‘accelerate’ plans to increase his involvement in key royal events” by then.
Here’s what that involvement might look like, according to The Times.



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Whenever Turner’s big day does arrive, the only list Arya Stark will be manning is a guest one.”
“High School Musical fans got a surprise in 2014 when they noticed Vanessa Hudgens was low-key in Ashley Tisdale’s bridal party.”
“Courteney Cox, for example, was Jennifer Aniston’s maid of honor in her wedding to Justin Theroux, and Drew Barrymore was a bridesmaid in Cameron Diaz’s wedding.”
“Williams won’t be the only actress to stand by her costar’s side on her big day.”
“They also have their own hashtag: #Mophie.”
“I love that girl to pieces,” she said.”
“Last year, Turner gushed about Williams in an interview: “She’s my best friend, she’s my soul mate.”
“The two actresses, who play sisters on Game of Thrones, have long maintained a close friendship offscreen.”
“...about how to work in some custom Louis Vuitton...”
“Yeah it s very very exciting The wedding won t be for a while however Williams said that the couple is waiting until the latest season of Game of Thrones is over to start wedding planning although she thinks Turner is already letting her little heart wonder and imagine Perhaps...”


Whenever Turner’s big day does arrive, the only list Arya Stark will be manning is a guest one.
High School Musical fans got a surprise in 2014 when they noticed Vanessa Hudgens was low-key in Ashley Tisdale’s bridal party.
Courteney Cox, for example, was Jennifer Aniston’s maid of honor in her wedding to Justin Theroux, and Drew Barrymore was a bridesmaid in Cameron Diaz’s wedding.
Williams won’t be the only actress to stand by her costar’s side on her big day.
They also have their own hashtag: #Mophie.
I love that girl to pieces,” she said.
Last year, Turner gushed about Williams in an interview: “She’s my best friend, she’s my soul mate.
The two actresses, who play sisters on Game of Thrones, have long maintained a close friendship offscreen.
...about how to work in some custom Louis Vuitton...
Yeah it s very very exciting The wedding won t be for a while however Williams said that the couple is waiting until the latest season of Game of Thrones is over to start wedding planning although she thinks Turner is already letting her little heart wonder and imagine Perhaps...



Number  68
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'Jaclyn I feel really happy that I got the chance to meet you, and through and all of the highs and lows ...”
“Although she didn't look entirely convinced when her husband was speaking about everything he has learned, she also believed their marriage was worth fighting for.”
“Shawniece, who has a history of bursting into tears on the show, started to cry as she thanked the show's experts, explaining that she really prayed about what she should do about their marriage.”
“'I think we are meant for each other, so I'd like to stay married.'”
“'I think you are a great person and you have such a big heart,' he said.”
“...were meant for each other In agreement I want to stay married because I believe in us Shawniece told Jephte There were undoubtedly more than a few fans who thought Jephte was gearing up to end the relationship but the opposite occurred...”
“Distant Jephte admitted that he feared that he would never passionately love his wife Candid Jephte confessed that they had sex before he was emotionally ready and Shawniece acknowledged that he may not ever love her Staying married Despite his fears Jephte said he ultimately believed that he and Shawniece...”
“When asked how she felt about Jephte's reservations, Shawniece admitted that it was a red flag that he might not ever love her, but she refused to dwell on it because she knew it would drive her crazy.”
“That's one of my biggest fears.'”
“'I feel like a love will have to occur but not like a passionate "in love."”


'Jaclyn I feel really happy that I got the chance to meet you, and through and all of the highs and lows ...
Although she didn't look entirely convinced when her husband was speaking about everything he has learned, she also believed their marriage was worth fighting for.
Shawniece, who has a history of bursting into tears on the show, started to cry as she thanked the show's experts, explaining that she really prayed about what she should do about their marriage.
'I think we are meant for each other, so I'd like to stay married.'
'I think you are a great person and you have such a big heart,' he said.
...were meant for each other In agreement I want to stay married because I believe in us Shawniece told Jephte There were undoubtedly more than a few fans who thought Jephte was gearing up to end the relationship but the opposite occurred...
Distant Jephte admitted that he feared that he would never passionately love his wife Candid Jephte confessed that they had sex before he was emotionally ready and Shawniece acknowledged that he may not ever love her Staying married Despite his fears Jephte said he ultimately believed that he and Shawniece...
When asked how she felt about Jephte's reservations, Shawniece admitted that it was a red flag that he might not ever love her, but she refused to dwell on it because she knew it would drive her crazy.
That's one of my biggest fears.'
'I feel like a love will have to occur but not like a passionate "in love."



Number  69
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There are more important things going on.”
“Great.”
“Deal?”
“If you don't like what a celebrity tweets, unfollow their account and go about your life as if it never happened.”
“So let's all just shut the fuck up about it.”
“She also had a message for those still up in arms about the tweet: "If you can't take a joke, feel free to unfollow," she said Thursday.”
“For the record, Brielle is cool with the joke:And she isn't a fan of some publications' coverage methods:Zolciak-Biermann later told TMZ that anyone who regularly pays attention to her account would know that's simply her "sense of humor."”
“I need to take a sighing break.”
“...as a currency BRB”
“...of his shows Teigen replied with a joke of her own telling Zolciak Biermann it s not that good of a show and that tickets could be acquired without the utilization of oral sex Without fail some attempted to criticize the joke as if oral sex were actually being used...”


There are more important things going on.
Great.
Deal?
If you don't like what a celebrity tweets, unfollow their account and go about your life as if it never happened.
So let's all just shut the fuck up about it.
She also had a message for those still up in arms about the tweet: "If you can't take a joke, feel free to unfollow," she said Thursday.
For the record, Brielle is cool with the joke:And she isn't a fan of some publications' coverage methods:Zolciak-Biermann later told TMZ that anyone who regularly pays attention to her account would know that's simply her "sense of humor."
I need to take a sighing break.
...as a currency BRB
...of his shows Teigen replied with a joke of her own telling Zolciak Biermann it s not that good of a show and that tickets could be acquired without the utilization of oral sex Without fail some attempted to criticize the joke as if oral sex were actually being used...



Number  70
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A source told Us exclusively in December that Noah was “doing well,” and Bublé was “ready to think about going back to work.””
“...ended 2017 on a high note...”
“...had a lot of faith in her nephew whom she called a warrior The following February Bublé said in a statement to Us that Noah was progressing well during his treatment and the doctors are very optimistic about the future The Haven t Met You Yet crooner and the model...”
“We have a long journey in front of us and hope that with the support of family friends and fans around the world we will win this battle God willing Lopilato s sister Daniela told the Argentinian magazine Gente later that month that Noah had begun chemotherapy and the family...”
““At this difficult time, we ask only for your prayers and respect for our privacy.”
““Luisana and I have put our careers on hold in order to devote all our time and attention to helping Noah get well,” the four-time Grammy winner said in a statement posted on his Facebook page in November 2016.”
“The arrival of the couple’s new bundle of joy comes nearly two years after their eldest son was diagnosed with liver cancer.”
“They are also the parents of sons Noah, 4, and Elias, 2.”
“We waited for you not only to grow as a family … you gave us light, hope, you are and will be our souls’ life.”Bublé, 42, and Lopilato, 31, who wed in her native Argentina in 2011, announced the actress’ third pregnancy in February.”
““We love you to infinity and beyond.”


A source told Us exclusively in December that Noah was “doing well,” and Bublé was “ready to think about going back to work.”
...ended 2017 on a high note...
...had a lot of faith in her nephew whom she called a warrior The following February Bublé said in a statement to Us that Noah was progressing well during his treatment and the doctors are very optimistic about the future The Haven t Met You Yet crooner and the model...
We have a long journey in front of us and hope that with the support of family friends and fans around the world we will win this battle God willing Lopilato s sister Daniela told the Argentinian magazine Gente later that month that Noah had begun chemotherapy and the family...
“At this difficult time, we ask only for your prayers and respect for our privacy.
“Luisana and I have put our careers on hold in order to devote all our time and attention to helping Noah get well,” the four-time Grammy winner said in a statement posted on his Facebook page in November 2016.
The arrival of the couple’s new bundle of joy comes nearly two years after their eldest son was diagnosed with liver cancer.
They are also the parents of sons Noah, 4, and Elias, 2.
We waited for you not only to grow as a family … you gave us light, hope, you are and will be our souls’ life.”Bublé, 42, and Lopilato, 31, who wed in her native Argentina in 2011, announced the actress’ third pregnancy in February.
“We love you to infinity and beyond.



Number  71
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related: Selena Gomez Goes Braless and Frees the Nipple in London...”
“More hair pics, Selena!”
“She's back together with ex Justin Bieber; she's been putting out new music; and, most recently, she dyed her signature dark hair platinum blonde.”
“And, according to the singer herself, it doesn't seem like her metamorphosis is going to stop any time soon.”
“After Selena debuted the stunning new look at the American Music Awards last month, E!”
“News asked the "Wolves" songstress if the blonde dye was here to stay.”
“"She's not going anywhere," she replied, referring to her (apparently female-identifying) strands.”
“Selena added that she's "still getting to know" her new 'do.”
“It's especially wise of her to keep the dye job a little bit longer, seeing as it took so long to achieve the jaw-dropping look in the first place.”
“In a recent Instagram post, Selena's colorists, Nikki Lee and Riawna Capri, called the color "Nirvana Blonde" and revealed that the transformation took a whopping nine hours.”


Related: Selena Gomez Goes Braless and Frees the Nipple in London...
More hair pics, Selena!
She's back together with ex Justin Bieber; she's been putting out new music; and, most recently, she dyed her signature dark hair platinum blonde.
And, according to the singer herself, it doesn't seem like her metamorphosis is going to stop any time soon.
After Selena debuted the stunning new look at the American Music Awards last month, E!
News asked the "Wolves" songstress if the blonde dye was here to stay.
"She's not going anywhere," she replied, referring to her (apparently female-identifying) strands.
Selena added that she's "still getting to know" her new 'do.
It's especially wise of her to keep the dye job a little bit longer, seeing as it took so long to achieve the jaw-dropping look in the first place.
In a recent Instagram post, Selena's colorists, Nikki Lee and Riawna Capri, called the color "Nirvana Blonde" and revealed that the transformation took a whopping nine hours.



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Take a look below at the complete list of February movie and TV additions.”
“See Netflix’s January 2018 releases here.”
“Missed last month?”
“TV series with new seasons hitting the streaming service include Netflix originals Altered Carbon, Everything Sucks!, Marseille, Seven Seconds, David Chang's Ugly Delicious and the streaming service's Queer Eye reboot.”
“The Joel McHale Show With Joel McHale, Marlon Wayans: Woke-ish, My Next Guest Needs No Introduction With David Letterman: George Clooney, Fred Armisen: Standup For Drummers and more will launch in the coming month.”
“February's lineup is full of comedians and their new shows or specials.”
“1 and 2, Lincoln, Meet the Parents, Men in Black, The Hurt Locker and the Ocean's trilogy will start streaming for Netflix subscribers.”
“Additionally, fan-favorite library titles like American Pie, Goodfellas, Kill Bill: Vols.”
“Also coming to Netflix this month is Duncan Jones' Mute, starring Alexander Skarsgard, Paul Rudd and Justin Theroux.”
“From left to right: Courtesy of Sundance and Netflix (2)Less than a month after premiering at Sundance, Netflix's highly-anticipated Gloria Allred documentary, Seeing Allred, will be released on the streaming platform.”


Take a look below at the complete list of February movie and TV additions.
See Netflix’s January 2018 releases here.
Missed last month?
TV series with new seasons hitting the streaming service include Netflix originals Altered Carbon, Everything Sucks!, Marseille, Seven Seconds, David Chang's Ugly Delicious and the streaming service's Queer Eye reboot.
The Joel McHale Show With Joel McHale, Marlon Wayans: Woke-ish, My Next Guest Needs No Introduction With David Letterman: George Clooney, Fred Armisen: Standup For Drummers and more will launch in the coming month.
February's lineup is full of comedians and their new shows or specials.
1 and 2, Lincoln, Meet the Parents, Men in Black, The Hurt Locker and the Ocean's trilogy will start streaming for Netflix subscribers.
Additionally, fan-favorite library titles like American Pie, Goodfellas, Kill Bill: Vols.
Also coming to Netflix this month is Duncan Jones' Mute, starring Alexander Skarsgard, Paul Rudd and Justin Theroux.
From left to right: Courtesy of Sundance and Netflix (2)Less than a month after premiering at Sundance, Netflix's highly-anticipated Gloria Allred documentary, Seeing Allred, will be released on the streaming platform.



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Reaching out to those in need is a simple and effective preventative measure, experts say.”
“A painful breakup and an illness followed suit and soon Zack found himself behind in school.”
“Rene Luke is known far and wide for offering life learned advice to her 8 3 million late night listeners but now the popular syndicated romance radio star is the one in need of support following the shattering death of her teenage son Zachariah to suicide on Oct 3”
“Speaking out for the first time since sharing the news on Facebook, the mom of 13 opens up to PEOPLE in this week’s issue, offering details of 18-year-old Zack’s life and recent struggle with depression in hopes of raising awareness for other family’s at risk.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““He was my wild child; 13 broken bones, umpteen trips to the hospital with appendicitis, tonsillitis, a fractured skull.”
“He was wild but so so so sweet,” the Port Orchard, Washington-based star, 57, recalls of raising son Zack (one of her three biological children, the other 10 were welcomed through adoption).”
“Image zoom Credit: Courtesy of DelilahAnd like his mom, Zack, who was a senior in high school, had the gift of compassion.”
““He was a faithful friend to the outcast and the troubled.”
“Dozens of his friends have written to me and told me he was like a counselor to them says Delilah adding that in the wake of his death the mom of one of his friends reached out saying he saved her daughter s life when she was battling depression and...”


Reaching out to those in need is a simple and effective preventative measure, experts say.
A painful breakup and an illness followed suit and soon Zack found himself behind in school.
Rene Luke is known far and wide for offering life learned advice to her 8 3 million late night listeners but now the popular syndicated romance radio star is the one in need of support following the shattering death of her teenage son Zachariah to suicide on Oct 3
Speaking out for the first time since sharing the news on Facebook, the mom of 13 opens up to PEOPLE in this week’s issue, offering details of 18-year-old Zack’s life and recent struggle with depression in hopes of raising awareness for other family’s at risk.
Get push notifications with news, features and more.
“He was my wild child; 13 broken bones, umpteen trips to the hospital with appendicitis, tonsillitis, a fractured skull.
He was wild but so so so sweet,” the Port Orchard, Washington-based star, 57, recalls of raising son Zack (one of her three biological children, the other 10 were welcomed through adoption).
Image zoom Credit: Courtesy of DelilahAnd like his mom, Zack, who was a senior in high school, had the gift of compassion.
“He was a faithful friend to the outcast and the troubled.
Dozens of his friends have written to me and told me he was like a counselor to them says Delilah adding that in the wake of his death the mom of one of his friends reached out saying he saved her daughter s life when she was battling depression and...



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“References edit...”
“Dave Farrell bass backing vocals rhythm guitar on Shadow Of The Day With Or Without You and Leave Out All The Rest rhythm acoustic guitar on Sharp Edges not performed on Castle Of Glass Rebellion and What I ve Done 6 Special guests edit Set list edit Linkin Park Encore...”
“...not performed on Sharp Edges...”
“For The End synthesizer on Burn It Down not performed on Castle Of Glass and Rebellion Rob Bourdon drums not performed on Castle Of Glass Sharp Edges One More Light Crawling Rebellion What I ve Done and A Light That Never Comes Joe Hahn turntables samplers keyboards synthesizers backing vocals...”
“4 5 Performers edit Mike Shinoda lead and backing vocals rapping rhythm guitar keyboards piano synthesizers samplers bass on Shadow Of The Day and With Or Without You lead guitar on Waiting For The End Brad Delson lead guitar backing vocals lead acoustic guitar on Sharp Edges keyboards on Waiting...”
“On October 20, it was announced Linkin Park would livestream the concert on their YouTube channel.”
“On September 23, the band announced that the concert had officially sold out.”
“[3] Later, the band confirmed that the concert would take place on October 27 at the Hollywood Bowl, and would feature a number of bands and musicians.”
“[2]On August 22, Linkin Park announced plans to host a tribute concert in Los Angeles to honor Bennington.”
“[1]Background [ edit ]Right after the first leg of Linkin Park's One More Light World Tour, promoting their seventh studio album, One More Light, vocalist Chester Bennington was found dead from suicide by hanging on July 20, 2017, resulting in the cancellation of the rest of the tour.”


References edit...
Dave Farrell bass backing vocals rhythm guitar on Shadow Of The Day With Or Without You and Leave Out All The Rest rhythm acoustic guitar on Sharp Edges not performed on Castle Of Glass Rebellion and What I ve Done 6 Special guests edit Set list edit Linkin Park Encore...
...not performed on Sharp Edges...
For The End synthesizer on Burn It Down not performed on Castle Of Glass and Rebellion Rob Bourdon drums not performed on Castle Of Glass Sharp Edges One More Light Crawling Rebellion What I ve Done and A Light That Never Comes Joe Hahn turntables samplers keyboards synthesizers backing vocals...
4 5 Performers edit Mike Shinoda lead and backing vocals rapping rhythm guitar keyboards piano synthesizers samplers bass on Shadow Of The Day and With Or Without You lead guitar on Waiting For The End Brad Delson lead guitar backing vocals lead acoustic guitar on Sharp Edges keyboards on Waiting...
On October 20, it was announced Linkin Park would livestream the concert on their YouTube channel.
On September 23, the band announced that the concert had officially sold out.
[3] Later, the band confirmed that the concert would take place on October 27 at the Hollywood Bowl, and would feature a number of bands and musicians.
[2]On August 22, Linkin Park announced plans to host a tribute concert in Los Angeles to honor Bennington.
[1]Background [ edit ]Right after the first leg of Linkin Park's One More Light World Tour, promoting their seventh studio album, One More Light, vocalist Chester Bennington was found dead from suicide by hanging on July 20, 2017, resulting in the cancellation of the rest of the tour.



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It certainly has been a great start to 2018 for the former Glee actor, with his new show, Assassination of Gianni Versace: American Crime Story, premiering Wednesday to strong ratings.”
““I didn’t know I was going to be on TV when we started dating.”Swier attended New York University’s Steinhardt School of Media Studies and Television Production, and has worked for networks such as Fox and Showtime.”
““Oh yeah, we’ve been together a long time,” Criss said in a 2013 interview when asked about Swier.”
“Though the date of the proposal is unknown, Criss and Swier, 32, last attended the Los Angeles premiere of the FX series in Hollywood together on Jan. 8 when the writer and producer was spotted without an engagement ring on that finger.”
“Engage,” the former Glee star added.”
“To boldly go where neither of us have gone before.”
“We’re goin for it.”
““And I’m happy to announce that we’re kicking those adventures up a notch.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Mia and I have had seven and a half years of fun, wacky, wonderful, CRAZY adventures together,” Criss wrote along with a photo of the happy couple.”


It certainly has been a great start to 2018 for the former Glee actor, with his new show, Assassination of Gianni Versace: American Crime Story, premiering Wednesday to strong ratings.
“I didn’t know I was going to be on TV when we started dating.”Swier attended New York University’s Steinhardt School of Media Studies and Television Production, and has worked for networks such as Fox and Showtime.
“Oh yeah, we’ve been together a long time,” Criss said in a 2013 interview when asked about Swier.
Though the date of the proposal is unknown, Criss and Swier, 32, last attended the Los Angeles premiere of the FX series in Hollywood together on Jan. 8 when the writer and producer was spotted without an engagement ring on that finger.
Engage,” the former Glee star added.
To boldly go where neither of us have gone before.
We’re goin for it.
“And I’m happy to announce that we’re kicking those adventures up a notch.
Get push notifications with news, features and more.
“Mia and I have had seven and a half years of fun, wacky, wonderful, CRAZY adventures together,” Criss wrote along with a photo of the happy couple.



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kerr's Must-Have Kit...”
“That’s when they come out.”
“I GOT MY DIMPLES FROM... My great-grandmother.”
“Hers had the same placement as mine.”
“My dad has one in his chin.”
“And [my 7-year-old son] Flynn has one in his chin plus another on one side.”
“Sometimes we’ll do a little kiss where he puts his [dimple on] mine.”
“It’s quite cute because it’s as if our dimples are kissing.”
“I’m surrounded by dimples—even [my husband] Evan has one in his chin!”
“[tiImage img-pos="2" image_style="684xflex" align="left"]THE FIRST TIME I GOT ATTENTION FOR MY DIMPLES... Was when I was growing up and someone [told] me that having dimples meant I was a flirt.”


Kerr's Must-Have Kit...
That’s when they come out.
I GOT MY DIMPLES FROM... My great-grandmother.
Hers had the same placement as mine.
My dad has one in his chin.
And [my 7-year-old son] Flynn has one in his chin plus another on one side.
Sometimes we’ll do a little kiss where he puts his [dimple on] mine.
It’s quite cute because it’s as if our dimples are kissing.
I’m surrounded by dimples—even [my husband] Evan has one in his chin!
[tiImage img-pos="2" image_style="684xflex" align="left"]THE FIRST TIME I GOT ATTENTION FOR MY DIMPLES... Was when I was growing up and someone [told] me that having dimples meant I was a flirt.



Number  77
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the video of the game above.”
“Also Read: 'Snatched' Review: Amy Schumer and Goldie Hawn Make an Uneven Duo in Comic Misadventure“Snatched,” marking Hawn’s return to the big screen after 15 years, hits theaters tomorrow.”
“Ike Barinholtz, Wanda Sykes and Joan Cusack also star.”
““Do I win?” Hawn asked, to which Schumer responded, “you’re winning!”“Snatched” stars Hawn and Schumer as a mother and daughter who go on vacation to Ecuador but soon get kidnapped and the pair have to find a way out of their unexpected situation.”
“But once again, it was Russell’s fault.”
“...had...”
“...wrote a book titled The Girl With the Lower Back Tattoo Also Read How an NPR Story Inspired Amy Schumer s Gross Tapeworm Scene in Snatched The big shocker came when DeGeneres asked Never have I ever been caught by the police having sex to which Hawn revealed that she...”
“But Hawn soon revealed it was actually her partner Kurt Russell who took the photo of her naked as she was pretending she was a strong man DeGeneres also asked about whether they had a tattoo that they regret something Schumer has been vocal about in the past she even...”
“The on-screen mother-daughter duo stopped by to promote their upcoming film, “Snatched.” DeGeneres first asked them, “Never have I ever taken a naked selfie,” to which both actresses raised the “I have” paddle.”
“Amy Schumer and Goldie Hawn played a round of “Never Have I Ever” with Ellen DeGeneres on Thursday, and Hawn surprisingly won the round with the most “I have” revelations.”


Watch the video of the game above.
Also Read: 'Snatched' Review: Amy Schumer and Goldie Hawn Make an Uneven Duo in Comic Misadventure“Snatched,” marking Hawn’s return to the big screen after 15 years, hits theaters tomorrow.
Ike Barinholtz, Wanda Sykes and Joan Cusack also star.
“Do I win?” Hawn asked, to which Schumer responded, “you’re winning!”“Snatched” stars Hawn and Schumer as a mother and daughter who go on vacation to Ecuador but soon get kidnapped and the pair have to find a way out of their unexpected situation.
But once again, it was Russell’s fault.
...had...
...wrote a book titled The Girl With the Lower Back Tattoo Also Read How an NPR Story Inspired Amy Schumer s Gross Tapeworm Scene in Snatched The big shocker came when DeGeneres asked Never have I ever been caught by the police having sex to which Hawn revealed that she...
But Hawn soon revealed it was actually her partner Kurt Russell who took the photo of her naked as she was pretending she was a strong man DeGeneres also asked about whether they had a tattoo that they regret something Schumer has been vocal about in the past she even...
The on-screen mother-daughter duo stopped by to promote their upcoming film, “Snatched.” DeGeneres first asked them, “Never have I ever taken a naked selfie,” to which both actresses raised the “I have” paddle.
Amy Schumer and Goldie Hawn played a round of “Never Have I Ever” with Ellen DeGeneres on Thursday, and Hawn surprisingly won the round with the most “I have” revelations.



Number  78
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...kids...”
“In 2011, he attended the festival a week after ending his five-year relationship with model Bar Refaeli.”
“The Oscar winner, 42, was photographed at Diesel’s Child at Heart collection — a collaboration with Fashion for Relief charity to raise money for Save the Children — and it marked his first public outing since splitting with model Nina Agdal after a yearlong relationship.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““He goes to Cannes every year.”
“He’s been a longtime supporter of the festival,” a source close to DiCaprio tells PEOPLE, adding: “He has a busy few days.”
“He is there to support amfAR and has some other meetings around environmental issues The actor has been a steady presence at the festival over the years having previously opened The Great Gatsby there in 2013 and attended numerous charity galas including one in 2015 where he outbid Paris Hilton...”
“...on a Chanel purse...”
“Donning his signature flat cap and a button-up shirt with a jacket, DiCaprio took his seat before the likes of Heidi Klum, Bella Hadid and Kendall Jenner hit the runway.”
“Image zoom Credit: David Fisher/REX/ShutterstockThe actor is no stranger to the festival, both for the films and the party circuit.”


...kids...
In 2011, he attended the festival a week after ending his five-year relationship with model Bar Refaeli.
The Oscar winner, 42, was photographed at Diesel’s Child at Heart collection — a collaboration with Fashion for Relief charity to raise money for Save the Children — and it marked his first public outing since splitting with model Nina Agdal after a yearlong relationship.
Get push notifications with news, features and more.
“He goes to Cannes every year.
He’s been a longtime supporter of the festival,” a source close to DiCaprio tells PEOPLE, adding: “He has a busy few days.
He is there to support amfAR and has some other meetings around environmental issues The actor has been a steady presence at the festival over the years having previously opened The Great Gatsby there in 2013 and attended numerous charity galas including one in 2015 where he outbid Paris Hilton...
...on a Chanel purse...
Donning his signature flat cap and a button-up shirt with a jacket, DiCaprio took his seat before the likes of Heidi Klum, Bella Hadid and Kendall Jenner hit the runway.
Image zoom Credit: David Fisher/REX/ShutterstockThe actor is no stranger to the festival, both for the films and the party circuit.



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...celebs and fans felt the duo were robbed including Perez Hilton and Frankie Grande the brother of pop star Ariana Grande...”
“So to be able to celebrate a little bit of who I am and where I m from and to share with the world and break that language barrier especially after everything that Puerto Rico has been going through Although the two artists kept their post Grammy messages positive some...”
“Being from Puerto Rico, growing up here in the United States, I’ve always been so proud of my roots and my language, and all these artists who are performing, they’ve all influenced me.”
“I’m really proud to be here.”
““Not only for me, but for Latin music in general, to be able to sing a song in Spanish for the big show.”
““This is really big,” he said.”
“Before the ceremony, he spoke to ET about what the evening meant to him.”
“Yankee shared the same image, writing, “Thanks to all #latinos for coming together to see us shine at the #grammys.”Image zoom Credit: Christopher Polk/Getty Images for NARASFor Fonsi, the Grammy nod — and potential win — was all about celebrating his Latin heritage and pride.”
“Thanks for supporting us, this is just the beginning.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Let’s continue sharing our culture and our Latin music with the entire world.”


...celebs and fans felt the duo were robbed including Perez Hilton and Frankie Grande the brother of pop star Ariana Grande...
So to be able to celebrate a little bit of who I am and where I m from and to share with the world and break that language barrier especially after everything that Puerto Rico has been going through Although the two artists kept their post Grammy messages positive some...
Being from Puerto Rico, growing up here in the United States, I’ve always been so proud of my roots and my language, and all these artists who are performing, they’ve all influenced me.
I’m really proud to be here.
“Not only for me, but for Latin music in general, to be able to sing a song in Spanish for the big show.
“This is really big,” he said.
Before the ceremony, he spoke to ET about what the evening meant to him.
Yankee shared the same image, writing, “Thanks to all #latinos for coming together to see us shine at the #grammys.”Image zoom Credit: Christopher Polk/Getty Images for NARASFor Fonsi, the Grammy nod — and potential win — was all about celebrating his Latin heritage and pride.
Thanks for supporting us, this is just the beginning.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.
Let’s continue sharing our culture and our Latin music with the entire world.



Number  80
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For access to exclusive gear videos, celebrity interviews, and more, subscribe on YouTube!”
““Just find a good story and tell it well.” Based on Corben’s criteria, now that you’ve finished bingeing Making a Murderer, here are some suggestions for your next true-crime watch.”
““The job of any good documentary filmmaker is to find a good story and don’t [mess] it up,” says Billy Corben, the mastermind the true-crime classic Cocaine Cowboys and a dozen other slick and stylish documentaries.”
“A distant cousin of reality TV, true-crime cuts through the manufactured drama of scripted entertainment and brings raw and real and riveting stories to life unlike anything else that’s out there.”
“Simpson on FX, it’s not hard to see that the true-crime genre is having a moment.”
“Between the viral Making a Murderer on Netflix to the wildly popular American Crime Story: The People v. O.J.”


For access to exclusive gear videos, celebrity interviews, and more, subscribe on YouTube!
“Just find a good story and tell it well.” Based on Corben’s criteria, now that you’ve finished bingeing Making a Murderer, here are some suggestions for your next true-crime watch.
“The job of any good documentary filmmaker is to find a good story and don’t [mess] it up,” says Billy Corben, the mastermind the true-crime classic Cocaine Cowboys and a dozen other slick and stylish documentaries.
A distant cousin of reality TV, true-crime cuts through the manufactured drama of scripted entertainment and brings raw and real and riveting stories to life unlike anything else that’s out there.
Simpson on FX, it’s not hard to see that the true-crime genre is having a moment.
Between the viral Making a Murderer on Netflix to the wildly popular American Crime Story: The People v. O.J.



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Tracey came out during the O2 gig to perform a mash-up of his hit ‘Pasta’ with 30 Seconds To Mars’ track ‘Walk On Water’.”
“AdvertisementLast week saw AJ Tracey team up with 30 Seconds To Mars at their show in London.”
“See footage of his performances below.”
“During his stop in Austin, Leto performed outside coffee shops while backed by a choir.”
“Watch that clip beneath.”
“Leto appeared on The Tonight Show earlier this week to kick off his journey, which saw A$AP Rocky giving him a ride.”
“AdvertisementLeto has been visiting “unique destinations that showcase the title subject of the band’s album” and, to “further showcase what America is made of”, has given out genetic testing kits along the way.”
“A press release details how Leto has intended to “travel across America” by “any means possible” for a week to promote the release, stating that the actor-turned-singer has been using transport methods ranging from “trains, planes, automobiles, Greyhound bus, Lyft rides, bicycles” to “NASCAR pit stops and more”.”
“It will be released on Friday (April 6).”
“‘America’ is the group’s fifth record to date and follows on from 2013’s ‘Love, Lust, Faith and Dreams’.”


Tracey came out during the O2 gig to perform a mash-up of his hit ‘Pasta’ with 30 Seconds To Mars’ track ‘Walk On Water’.
AdvertisementLast week saw AJ Tracey team up with 30 Seconds To Mars at their show in London.
See footage of his performances below.
During his stop in Austin, Leto performed outside coffee shops while backed by a choir.
Watch that clip beneath.
Leto appeared on The Tonight Show earlier this week to kick off his journey, which saw A$AP Rocky giving him a ride.
AdvertisementLeto has been visiting “unique destinations that showcase the title subject of the band’s album” and, to “further showcase what America is made of”, has given out genetic testing kits along the way.
A press release details how Leto has intended to “travel across America” by “any means possible” for a week to promote the release, stating that the actor-turned-singer has been using transport methods ranging from “trains, planes, automobiles, Greyhound bus, Lyft rides, bicycles” to “NASCAR pit stops and more”.
It will be released on Friday (April 6).
‘America’ is the group’s fifth record to date and follows on from 2013’s ‘Love, Lust, Faith and Dreams’.



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“She also famously wore her mother's retro pink Body Glove swimsuit for her 18th birthday in Mexico in 2015.”
“...in her life her momager Kris Jenner...”
“The 19-year-old beauty mogul has just because the face and creative influence behind Quay Australia's new eyewear line, according to E!”
“News, and the campaign photoshoot served as the perfect opportunity for the reality star to copy her mother's signature look.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“In the campaign shots for the brand, Kylie wears a swimsuit and a short black pixie crop, making her look the spitting image of her mother, Kris.”
“However, this isn't the first time the reality star has taken her mother's style for inspiration, having worn the 61-year-old's vintage thong Chanel swimsuit while playing in the pool last summer.”


You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...
She also famously wore her mother's retro pink Body Glove swimsuit for her 18th birthday in Mexico in 2015.
...in her life her momager Kris Jenner...
The 19-year-old beauty mogul has just because the face and creative influence behind Quay Australia's new eyewear line, according to E!
News, and the campaign photoshoot served as the perfect opportunity for the reality star to copy her mother's signature look.
This content is imported from Instagram.
You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.
In the campaign shots for the brand, Kylie wears a swimsuit and a short black pixie crop, making her look the spitting image of her mother, Kris.
However, this isn't the first time the reality star has taken her mother's style for inspiration, having worn the 61-year-old's vintage thong Chanel swimsuit while playing in the pool last summer.



Number  83
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Not some huge circus that will spook John or make him feel like he’s a performing monkey — something that can be about just the two of them.””
“Other than the actual wedding weekend when they took some space they have been talking WATCH Nikki Bella Wishes John Cena Would ve Called Instead Of Discussing Breakup On The Today Show Sources had previously said that her decision to...”
“More than a month after the pair ended their engagement in mid-April — just three weeks before their destination wedding — a source confirms to PEOPLE that the couple is officially back together.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““They were always going to find their way back to each other,” says the source.”
““It was never going to be permanent.”In the time since Bella, 34, called off their wedding — a decision that she was “heartbroken” about — the two wrestlers have been on the road to reconciliation.”
“Following their breakup, both the Total Bellas star and pro-wrestler have been open about their desire to get back together.”
“Bella previously told PEOPLE that she’s been in “communication” with the pro wrestler and that they were taking steps to get back together.”
“On May 19, the two were spotted out together for the first since their split.”
““They’re basically back together,” a second source close to the situation told PEOPLE at the time.”


Not some huge circus that will spook John or make him feel like he’s a performing monkey — something that can be about just the two of them.”
Other than the actual wedding weekend when they took some space they have been talking WATCH Nikki Bella Wishes John Cena Would ve Called Instead Of Discussing Breakup On The Today Show Sources had previously said that her decision to...
More than a month after the pair ended their engagement in mid-April — just three weeks before their destination wedding — a source confirms to PEOPLE that the couple is officially back together.
Get push notifications with news, features and more.
“They were always going to find their way back to each other,” says the source.
“It was never going to be permanent.”In the time since Bella, 34, called off their wedding — a decision that she was “heartbroken” about — the two wrestlers have been on the road to reconciliation.
Following their breakup, both the Total Bellas star and pro-wrestler have been open about their desire to get back together.
Bella previously told PEOPLE that she’s been in “communication” with the pro wrestler and that they were taking steps to get back together.
On May 19, the two were spotted out together for the first since their split.
“They’re basically back together,” a second source close to the situation told PEOPLE at the time.



Number  84
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She will next star in London Fields, and will play Mera in Justice League and Aquaman.”
“Musk shares twins Griffin and Xavier and triplets Damian, Kai and Saxon with first wife Justine Musk.”
“File Photo by Jim Ruymen/UPI | License PhotoElon Musk speaks at a briefing at the Kennedy Space Center on March 30.”
“File Photo by Joe Marino, Bill Cantrell/UPI | License PhotoAmber Heard attends the Golden Globe Awards on January 10, 2016.”
“The actress spent some quality time with Elon Musk and his sons Tuesday.”
“File Photo by Jim Ruymen/UPI | License PhotoMay 31 (UPI) -- Amber Heard is getting to know new beau Elon Musk's five kids.”
“The 31-year-old actress spent some quality time with the 45-year-old Tesla founder and his sons Tuesday at Sydney Opera House in Australia.”
“Advertisement"Kidding around," she captioned a series of photos from the outing on Instagram.”
“He and Heard were first linked in 2016 after splitting from their respective spouses, Talulah Riley and Johnny Depp.”
“Kidding around A post shared by Amber Heard (@amberheard) on May 30, 2017 at 2:00am PDTHeard filed for divorce from Depp in May 2016 after alleging the actor was abusive during their relationship.”


She will next star in London Fields, and will play Mera in Justice League and Aquaman.
Musk shares twins Griffin and Xavier and triplets Damian, Kai and Saxon with first wife Justine Musk.
File Photo by Jim Ruymen/UPI | License PhotoElon Musk speaks at a briefing at the Kennedy Space Center on March 30.
File Photo by Joe Marino, Bill Cantrell/UPI | License PhotoAmber Heard attends the Golden Globe Awards on January 10, 2016.
The actress spent some quality time with Elon Musk and his sons Tuesday.
File Photo by Jim Ruymen/UPI | License PhotoMay 31 (UPI) -- Amber Heard is getting to know new beau Elon Musk's five kids.
The 31-year-old actress spent some quality time with the 45-year-old Tesla founder and his sons Tuesday at Sydney Opera House in Australia.
Advertisement"Kidding around," she captioned a series of photos from the outing on Instagram.
He and Heard were first linked in 2016 after splitting from their respective spouses, Talulah Riley and Johnny Depp.
Kidding around A post shared by Amber Heard (@amberheard) on May 30, 2017 at 2:00am PDTHeard filed for divorce from Depp in May 2016 after alleging the actor was abusive during their relationship.



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Getty Melania Trump life in pictures: Melania hosted a state dinner with France...”
“Recently the First Lady welcomed French President Emmanuel Macron and his wife Brigitte to the White House and hosted her first state dinner with France.”
“Please see our Privacy Notice for details of your data protection rights.”
“Melania Trump in pictures Sat, July 28, 2018 America's First Lady Melania Trump in pictures.”
“Play slideshow Getty•REUTERS 1 of 100 Melania Trump in picturesThe current FLOTUS was born in Novo Mesto, Slovenia on April 26, 1970.”
“Born Melania Knavs, she began her modelling career at the age of sixteen and attended the University of Ljubljana in Slovenia where she studied architecture.”
“However, she left her studies after a year to pursue a successful career in modelling.”
“Melania has worked as a fashion model for agencies in Milan and Paris and she later moved to New York City in 1996.”
“In 2000, she appeared nude on the cover of British GQ, an achievement she is immensely proud of and is listed on her official biography on the White House website.”
“The website states: “As a model, Melania has appeared in high profile ad campaigns and worked with some of the top photographer in the fashion industry.”


Getty Melania Trump life in pictures: Melania hosted a state dinner with France...
Recently the First Lady welcomed French President Emmanuel Macron and his wife Brigitte to the White House and hosted her first state dinner with France.
Please see our Privacy Notice for details of your data protection rights.
Melania Trump in pictures Sat, July 28, 2018 America's First Lady Melania Trump in pictures.
Play slideshow Getty•REUTERS 1 of 100 Melania Trump in picturesThe current FLOTUS was born in Novo Mesto, Slovenia on April 26, 1970.
Born Melania Knavs, she began her modelling career at the age of sixteen and attended the University of Ljubljana in Slovenia where she studied architecture.
However, she left her studies after a year to pursue a successful career in modelling.
Melania has worked as a fashion model for agencies in Milan and Paris and she later moved to New York City in 1996.
In 2000, she appeared nude on the cover of British GQ, an achievement she is immensely proud of and is listed on her official biography on the White House website.
The website states: “As a model, Melania has appeared in high profile ad campaigns and worked with some of the top photographer in the fashion industry.



**Something goes wrong**
“PA Media...”
“The London-born actress – who has starred in films including Gone Girl and I Feel Pretty – found fame when she danced topless in the video for Robin Thicke’s 2013 single Blurred Lines.”
“They celebrated their honeymoon in Utah where they shared several pictures of their gold wedding rings.”
“Ratajkowski revealed her now-husband did not have an engagement ring when he popped the question and instead used a paper clip to show his commitment.”
“Ratajkowski and Bear-McClard, a film producer, got married at a surprise ceremony in New York in February.”
“The other, a selfie, shows the ring alongside a diamond necklace.”
“One shows her outstretched hand complete with the ring while Bear-McClard, 31, smiles in the background.”
“Ratajkowski shared two pictures.”
“On Tuesday, Ratajkowski took to Instagram to give her 18.4 million followers a glimpse of her engagement ring, which boasts two diamonds – one teardrop cut and one princess cut.”
“The 27-year-old actress married Sebastian Bear-McClard in February but until now had only been seen wearing a discreet gold wedding band.”


PA Media...
The London-born actress – who has starred in films including Gone Girl and I Feel Pretty – found fame when she danced topless in the video for Robin Thicke’s 2013 single Blurred Lines.
They celebrated their honeymoon in Utah where they shared several pictures of their gold wedding rings.
Ratajkowski revealed her now-husband did not have an engagement ring when he popped the question and instead used a paper clip to show his commitment.
Ratajkowski and Bear-McClard, a film producer, got married at a surprise ceremony in New York in February.
The other, a selfie, shows the ring alongside a diamond necklace.
One shows her outstretched hand complete with the ring while Bear-McClard, 31, smiles in the background.
Ratajkowski shared two pictures.
On Tuesday, Ratajkowski took to Instagram to give her 18.4 million followers a glimpse of her engagement ring, which boasts two diamonds – one teardrop cut and one princess cut.
The 27-year-old actress married Sebastian Bear-McClard in February but until now had only been seen wearing a discreet gold wedding band.



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(Exclusive)Lupita Nyong'o and Viola Davis to Star as Mother-Daughter Warriors in 'The Woman King'Lupita Nyong'o's Best 'Black Panther' Fashion LooksRelated Gallery...”
“Getty ImagesBold hues was obviously a major theme of the luncheon, as shining bright in yellow were Orange Is the New Black star Adrienne C. Moore and Lila & Eva actresses Diarra Kilpatrick and Yolonda Ross.”
“Celebrating the leading ladies in Tinseltown at the Beverly Wilshire Four Seasons Hotel on Thursday, Lupita Nyong'o, Tiffany Haddish, Angela Bassett and more packed a punch in every shade of the rainbow.”
“Nyong'o rocked a black-and-pink multi-patterned Ronald Van Der Kemp frock with a plunging neckline, and the Black Panther star wasn't the only one who opted for a rosy hue.”
“Phillip Faraone/Getty ImagesTina Knowles Lawson, La La Anthony and This Is Us star Susan Kelechi Watson showed off their curves in hot pink tones.”
“Getty ImagesWhite was also a statement color, with Danai Gurira in a loose Loewe dress, Bassett in a stellar Yaniv Persy jumpsuit, and Sydelle Noel in a curve-hugging gown.”
“Tessa Thompson also shimmered in a white and silver Ralph & Russo dress and, while Janelle Monae wore black, her chic LBD featured detailed white embroidery.”
“Leon Bennett/Getty Images for EssenceRandy Shropshire/Getty ImagesLooking red hot in bright cherry ensembles were Everything Everything star Amandla Stenberg, Star Trek: Discovery leading lady Sonequa Martin-Green and Parks and Recs actress Retta.”
“Getty ImagesThere were a select few that opted for multi-color ensembles.”
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Tiffany Haddish Dishes on Future Goals -- Which Include a Date With a ‘Black Panther’ Star!”


(Exclusive)Lupita Nyong'o and Viola Davis to Star as Mother-Daughter Warriors in 'The Woman King'Lupita Nyong'o's Best 'Black Panther' Fashion LooksRelated Gallery...
Getty ImagesBold hues was obviously a major theme of the luncheon, as shining bright in yellow were Orange Is the New Black star Adrienne C. Moore and Lila & Eva actresses Diarra Kilpatrick and Yolonda Ross.
Celebrating the leading ladies in Tinseltown at the Beverly Wilshire Four Seasons Hotel on Thursday, Lupita Nyong'o, Tiffany Haddish, Angela Bassett and more packed a punch in every shade of the rainbow.
Nyong'o rocked a black-and-pink multi-patterned Ronald Van Der Kemp frock with a plunging neckline, and the Black Panther star wasn't the only one who opted for a rosy hue.
Phillip Faraone/Getty ImagesTina Knowles Lawson, La La Anthony and This Is Us star Susan Kelechi Watson showed off their curves in hot pink tones.
Getty ImagesWhite was also a statement color, with Danai Gurira in a loose Loewe dress, Bassett in a stellar Yaniv Persy jumpsuit, and Sydelle Noel in a curve-hugging gown.
Tessa Thompson also shimmered in a white and silver Ralph & Russo dress and, while Janelle Monae wore black, her chic LBD featured detailed white embroidery.
Leon Bennett/Getty Images for EssenceRandy Shropshire/Getty ImagesLooking red hot in bright cherry ensembles were Everything Everything star Amandla Stenberg, Star Trek: Discovery leading lady Sonequa Martin-Green and Parks and Recs actress Retta.
Getty ImagesThere were a select few that opted for multi-color ensembles.
Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Tiffany Haddish Dishes on Future Goals -- Which Include a Date With a ‘Black Panther’ Star!



Number  88
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Today I finally get to show you something we’ve been working on for a while… the trailer for the Reputation Stadium Tour!””
““Thanks so much for all the birthday wishes!” Swift tweeted.”
“Reputation, which kicked off in May, broke U.S. records for the highest-grossing domestic tour, having grossed $266.1 million and selling 2,068,399 tickets according to Billboard.”
“According to Netflix the film includes footage from the U.S. tour dates with guest appearances by Charli XCX and Camila Cabello.”
“Taylor Swift reputation Stadium Tour will premiere on the streaming platform on New Year’s Eve at 12:00 a.m. PT on Dec. 31.”
“The mega-star announced the upcoming film will arrive on Netflix before the year is up on social media, and shared a trailer of footage from the upcoming concert film.”
“Taylor Swift Reputation Stadium Tour, a new movie featuring highlights from Swift’s latest monster tour, is coming to Netflix before year’s end.”


“Today I finally get to show you something we’ve been working on for a while… the trailer for the Reputation Stadium Tour!”
“Thanks so much for all the birthday wishes!” Swift tweeted.
Reputation, which kicked off in May, broke U.S. records for the highest-grossing domestic tour, having grossed $266.1 million and selling 2,068,399 tickets according to Billboard.
According to Netflix the film includes footage from the U.S. tour dates with guest appearances by Charli XCX and Camila Cabello.
Taylor Swift reputation Stadium Tour will premiere on the streaming platform on New Year’s Eve at 12:00 a.m. PT on Dec. 31.
The mega-star announced the upcoming film will arrive on Netflix before the year is up on social media, and shared a trailer of footage from the upcoming concert film.
Taylor Swift Reputation Stadium Tour, a new movie featuring highlights from Swift’s latest monster tour, is coming to Netflix before year’s end.



Number  89
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RoseTelevision [ edit ]Music videos [ edit ]Year Title Artist Notes 2011 "Boyfriend" Big Time RushAwards and nominations [ edit ]”
“I'm so honored.”
“[4][5] For this role Morgan was nominated for Daytime Emmy Award for Outstanding Younger Actress in a Drama Series in 2013.”
“[citation needed]On April 17, 2012, TVLine reported that Morgan had been cast as the contract role of Kristina Davis on the American ABC Daytime soap opera General Hospital and would make her debut on May 25, 2012.”
“The film and the campaign were developed in order to empower young people to identify, respond to, and stop the spread of digital abuse in their lives.”
“"DISconnected" was part of the MTV "A Thin Line" campaign.”
“In 2011, she landed the leading role in the MTV film DisCONNECTED (2011) as social media obsessed Maria.”
“Her first real role was in the movie Detention (2011) starring Josh Hutcherson where she played a mean cheerleader named Alexis.”
“Morgan decided to move to Los Angeles to continue her work as an actress.”
“She was cast as an extra on the critically acclaimed series Friday Night Lights.”


RoseTelevision [ edit ]Music videos [ edit ]Year Title Artist Notes 2011 "Boyfriend" Big Time RushAwards and nominations [ edit ]
I'm so honored.
[4][5] For this role Morgan was nominated for Daytime Emmy Award for Outstanding Younger Actress in a Drama Series in 2013.
[citation needed]On April 17, 2012, TVLine reported that Morgan had been cast as the contract role of Kristina Davis on the American ABC Daytime soap opera General Hospital and would make her debut on May 25, 2012.
The film and the campaign were developed in order to empower young people to identify, respond to, and stop the spread of digital abuse in their lives.
"DISconnected" was part of the MTV "A Thin Line" campaign.
In 2011, she landed the leading role in the MTV film DisCONNECTED (2011) as social media obsessed Maria.
Her first real role was in the movie Detention (2011) starring Josh Hutcherson where she played a mean cheerleader named Alexis.
Morgan decided to move to Los Angeles to continue her work as an actress.
She was cast as an extra on the critically acclaimed series Friday Night Lights.



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““It’s not anything that Kylie seems to be focused on,” the insider explained.”
““I’ve never said anything about someone else’s child or family insinuating my involvement; and will never do so,” Tyga tweeted on Tuesday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Stormi couldn’t keep her eyes off her father as he held her and gave her a kiss on the cheek.”
“Another video showed the baby, born Feb. 1, cuddling up in the 25-year-old rapper’s arms.”
“In the first public glimpse of the family all together — a video shared by fan accounts — Scott held Stormi facing him while Jenner cozied up beside her beau and reached out to lovingly stroke their daughter’s head.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Image zoom Travis Scott and daughter Stormi Credit Kylie Jenner Snapchat Image zoom Stormi Credit Kylie Jenner Snapchat The Kardashian Jenner s Easter bash complete with a 10 foot Easter bunny made of flowers as well as a petting zoo featuring baby ducks and rabbits comes shortly after Jenner s...”
“...ex boyfriend Tyga denied that he was Stormi s father...”


“It’s not anything that Kylie seems to be focused on,” the insider explained.
“I’ve never said anything about someone else’s child or family insinuating my involvement; and will never do so,” Tyga tweeted on Tuesday.
Get push notifications with news, features and more.
Stormi couldn’t keep her eyes off her father as he held her and gave her a kiss on the cheek.
Another video showed the baby, born Feb. 1, cuddling up in the 25-year-old rapper’s arms.
In the first public glimpse of the family all together — a video shared by fan accounts — Scott held Stormi facing him while Jenner cozied up beside her beau and reached out to lovingly stroke their daughter’s head.
Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?
Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.
Image zoom Travis Scott and daughter Stormi Credit Kylie Jenner Snapchat Image zoom Stormi Credit Kylie Jenner Snapchat The Kardashian Jenner s Easter bash complete with a 10 foot Easter bunny made of flowers as well as a petting zoo featuring baby ducks and rabbits comes shortly after Jenner s...
...ex boyfriend Tyga denied that he was Stormi s father...



Number  91
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The romantic comedy is yet to receive a release date.”
“We all miss and love him very much.”Allen’s next film, A Rainy Day in New York, faces an uncertain future after stars Timothée Chalamet, Selena Gomez and Rebecca Hall donated their salaries to various charities.”
“In an interview on Argentinian news program Periodismo Para Todos, the writer-director was asked if there was any truth behind the allegation that he sexually abused his daughter, Dylan Farrow.”
““Of course not, this is just so crazy,” he said.”
““This is something that has been thoroughly looked at 25 years ago by all the authorities and everybody came to the conclusion that it was untrue.”
“And that was the end and I’ve gone on with my life.”
“For it to come back now, it’s a terrible thing to accuse a person of.”
“I’m a man with a family and my own children.”The story was resurfaced after allegations were made against Harvey Weinstein and other key figures in Hollywood of sexually predatory behavior.”
“It led to many actors talking about their regret over working with Allen, including Greta Gerwig, Colin Firth and Ellen Page.”
““Everyone wants justice to be done,” Allen said.”


The romantic comedy is yet to receive a release date.
We all miss and love him very much.”Allen’s next film, A Rainy Day in New York, faces an uncertain future after stars Timothée Chalamet, Selena Gomez and Rebecca Hall donated their salaries to various charities.
In an interview on Argentinian news program Periodismo Para Todos, the writer-director was asked if there was any truth behind the allegation that he sexually abused his daughter, Dylan Farrow.
“Of course not, this is just so crazy,” he said.
“This is something that has been thoroughly looked at 25 years ago by all the authorities and everybody came to the conclusion that it was untrue.
And that was the end and I’ve gone on with my life.
For it to come back now, it’s a terrible thing to accuse a person of.
I’m a man with a family and my own children.”The story was resurfaced after allegations were made against Harvey Weinstein and other key figures in Hollywood of sexually predatory behavior.
It led to many actors talking about their regret over working with Allen, including Greta Gerwig, Colin Firth and Ellen Page.
“Everyone wants justice to be done,” Allen said.



Number  92
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She later dated Vince Vaughn and John Mayer after her divorce from Pitt.”
“”The couple announced that they split at the end of the last year, however, they celebrated the New Year together with their annual vacation to Cabo San Lucas, Mexico alongside a handful of close pals including Jason Bateman and his family.”
“She was spotted standing outside the Hollywood venue chatting with Pharrell.”
“On Saturday, Aniston made an appearance at Ellen DeGeneres‘ birthday party without Theroux.”
“They have also had a busy year as Aniston signed on with Reese Witherspoon for a new Apple TV series and filmed Dumplin’ in Atlanta, while Theroux, 46, filmed the comedy The Spy Who Dumped Me in Budapest.”
“Theroux was often spotted in New York City away from their L.A. home.”
“The two spent quite a bit of time apart in recent months raising questions.”
“Image zoom Pharrell and Jennifer Aniston at Ellen DeGeneres’ birthday.”
“Above all, we are determined to maintain the deep respect and love that we have for one another.”
“Aniston celebrated in Malibu, California with a gathering including pals Courteney Cox, Andrea Bendewald, Leigh Kilton-Smith and Kristin Hahn on Sunday.”


She later dated Vince Vaughn and John Mayer after her divorce from Pitt.
”The couple announced that they split at the end of the last year, however, they celebrated the New Year together with their annual vacation to Cabo San Lucas, Mexico alongside a handful of close pals including Jason Bateman and his family.
She was spotted standing outside the Hollywood venue chatting with Pharrell.
On Saturday, Aniston made an appearance at Ellen DeGeneres‘ birthday party without Theroux.
They have also had a busy year as Aniston signed on with Reese Witherspoon for a new Apple TV series and filmed Dumplin’ in Atlanta, while Theroux, 46, filmed the comedy The Spy Who Dumped Me in Budapest.
Theroux was often spotted in New York City away from their L.A. home.
The two spent quite a bit of time apart in recent months raising questions.
Image zoom Pharrell and Jennifer Aniston at Ellen DeGeneres’ birthday.
Above all, we are determined to maintain the deep respect and love that we have for one another.
Aniston celebrated in Malibu, California with a gathering including pals Courteney Cox, Andrea Bendewald, Leigh Kilton-Smith and Kristin Hahn on Sunday.



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Conrad was also in attendance, posing alongside her friend on Instagram Stories and posting a sweet picture of the happy couple on her official account.”
“We love you so much!” he added.”
“Laguna Beach’s Dieter Schmitz is officially a dad.”
“Schmitz, 32, announced on Sunday that he and his wife Isabell Hiebl welcomed their first child, son Nico Josef Schmitz.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Isabel and I welcomed our baby boy, Nico Josef Schmitz, on 9/8/2018 at 9:10 AM!” he excitedly wrote alongside a photo of the new mom giving the couple’s bundle of joy some skin-to-skin contact in the hospital.”
“In the photo, Hiebl proudly smiled at the camera while little Nico appeared to be taking a nap.”
““May you make the world a better place and have a tremendously healthy and fulfilling life.”
“Image zoom Credit: Isabell Schmitz/InstagramFellow MTV reality star Lauren Conrad quickly offered up a warm congratulations to her pal, commenting with numerous yellow heart emojis.”
“...groomsmen including Stephen Colletti Trey Phillips and Loren Polster...”


Conrad was also in attendance, posing alongside her friend on Instagram Stories and posting a sweet picture of the happy couple on her official account.
We love you so much!” he added.
Laguna Beach’s Dieter Schmitz is officially a dad.
Schmitz, 32, announced on Sunday that he and his wife Isabell Hiebl welcomed their first child, son Nico Josef Schmitz.
Get push notifications with news, features and more.
“Isabel and I welcomed our baby boy, Nico Josef Schmitz, on 9/8/2018 at 9:10 AM!” he excitedly wrote alongside a photo of the new mom giving the couple’s bundle of joy some skin-to-skin contact in the hospital.
In the photo, Hiebl proudly smiled at the camera while little Nico appeared to be taking a nap.
“May you make the world a better place and have a tremendously healthy and fulfilling life.
Image zoom Credit: Isabell Schmitz/InstagramFellow MTV reality star Lauren Conrad quickly offered up a warm congratulations to her pal, commenting with numerous yellow heart emojis.
...groomsmen including Stephen Colletti Trey Phillips and Loren Polster...



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tom Coyne a mastering engineer won Album of the Year four times 21 2012 1989 2016 25 2017 24K Magic 2018 Three recording artists four record producers four engineer mixers and two mastering engineers have won the award three times Most Record of the Year wins edit The record for...”
“The record for most Album of the Year wins is four.”
“...soundtrack, which won Album of the Year in 2002.”
“The Peasall Sisters are the youngest Grammy winners, when they were credited artists on the O Brother, Where Art Thou?”
“[4]Rank Engineer / Mixer Awards 1 Al Schmitt 20 2 Tom Elmhirst 14 Serban GheneaYoungest winners [ edit ]LeAnn Rimes is the youngest individual Grammy winner and the youngest to win Best New Artist.”
“Serban Ghenea is second with 14 Grammy Awards.”
“Most Grammys won by an engineer or mixer [ edit ]Al Schmitt, with 20 awards, has won more Grammy Awards than any other engineer or mixer.”
“Some producers have also won awards as engineers, mixers and/or mastering engineers.”
“Jones also received Grammys as an arranger and a performing artist).”
“Most Grammys won by a producer [ edit ]Quincy Jones with 28 awards holds the record for most Grammy Awards won by a producer (and eleven of those were awarded for production duties.”


Tom Coyne a mastering engineer won Album of the Year four times 21 2012 1989 2016 25 2017 24K Magic 2018 Three recording artists four record producers four engineer mixers and two mastering engineers have won the award three times Most Record of the Year wins edit The record for...
The record for most Album of the Year wins is four.
...soundtrack, which won Album of the Year in 2002.
The Peasall Sisters are the youngest Grammy winners, when they were credited artists on the O Brother, Where Art Thou?
[4]Rank Engineer / Mixer Awards 1 Al Schmitt 20 2 Tom Elmhirst 14 Serban GheneaYoungest winners [ edit ]LeAnn Rimes is the youngest individual Grammy winner and the youngest to win Best New Artist.
Serban Ghenea is second with 14 Grammy Awards.
Most Grammys won by an engineer or mixer [ edit ]Al Schmitt, with 20 awards, has won more Grammy Awards than any other engineer or mixer.
Some producers have also won awards as engineers, mixers and/or mastering engineers.
Jones also received Grammys as an arranger and a performing artist).
Most Grammys won by a producer [ edit ]Quincy Jones with 28 awards holds the record for most Grammy Awards won by a producer (and eleven of those were awarded for production duties.



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Xoxo””
“Happy 14th year sobriety birthday, @daxshepard.”
“...surgery every single night the Good Place star wrote in a touching Instagram post to her husband of nearly eight years...”
“Along with a series of photos of Shepard with their babies Bell posted what began as a light hearted ribbing teasing the man who wore baby Bjorn for 2 straight years to show his girls how to be as adventurous as possible Her joking turned to praise and adoration for...”
“...his struggle well fought and continues to fight...”
““I know how much you loved using.”
“I know how much it got in your way,” she wrote.”
“And I know because I saw how hard you worked to live without it Also Read Kristen Bell and Ted Danson Dish on The Good Place and Their Real Life Bad Places Here s her entire tribute To the man mocked me when in our wedding photos because I cried...”
“...too many tears of joy Who wore a baby Bjorn for 2 straight years to show his girls how to be as adventurous as possible who held our dear little shakey mann pup for 8 hrs straight on the day we had to put him down I know how much...”
“...you loved using...”


Xoxo”
Happy 14th year sobriety birthday, @daxshepard.
...surgery every single night the Good Place star wrote in a touching Instagram post to her husband of nearly eight years...
Along with a series of photos of Shepard with their babies Bell posted what began as a light hearted ribbing teasing the man who wore baby Bjorn for 2 straight years to show his girls how to be as adventurous as possible Her joking turned to praise and adoration for...
...his struggle well fought and continues to fight...
“I know how much you loved using.
I know how much it got in your way,” she wrote.
And I know because I saw how hard you worked to live without it Also Read Kristen Bell and Ted Danson Dish on The Good Place and Their Real Life Bad Places Here s her entire tribute To the man mocked me when in our wedding photos because I cried...
...too many tears of joy Who wore a baby Bjorn for 2 straight years to show his girls how to be as adventurous as possible who held our dear little shakey mann pup for 8 hrs straight on the day we had to put him down I know how much...
...you loved using...



Number  96
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“What do you hope people take away from Hannah’s story?”
“It was being able to assist Clay on that journey as Hannah and let Clay have his moment to let Hannah go.”
“...through flashbacks or filtered through the eyes of someone else...”
“I think what everyone learned over the course of shooting and developing her was that you don t see the same Hannah this season and that s for a number of reasons but one of the biggest reasons is that every time we see Hannah this season it s either...”
“...what I was doing was right and their vision...”
“Season 1 was something that I could really sink my teeth into and pour myself into the character whereas this season was challenging as an actor because I had to put a lot of faith and a lot of trust into the writers and the directors in making sure that...”
“How did you find that balance between the character we knew and how others saw her?”
“This year, you were playing Hannah… but not really.”
“...particularly Clay...”
“And particularly for Hannah it was something that was developed over the course of shooting but I think that ultimately it was important to have her back for a second season and assist in continuing the dialogue from season 1 and following a lot of the other characters this season...”


What do you hope people take away from Hannah’s story?
It was being able to assist Clay on that journey as Hannah and let Clay have his moment to let Hannah go.
...through flashbacks or filtered through the eyes of someone else...
I think what everyone learned over the course of shooting and developing her was that you don t see the same Hannah this season and that s for a number of reasons but one of the biggest reasons is that every time we see Hannah this season it s either...
...what I was doing was right and their vision...
Season 1 was something that I could really sink my teeth into and pour myself into the character whereas this season was challenging as an actor because I had to put a lot of faith and a lot of trust into the writers and the directors in making sure that...
How did you find that balance between the character we knew and how others saw her?
This year, you were playing Hannah… but not really.
...particularly Clay...
And particularly for Hannah it was something that was developed over the course of shooting but I think that ultimately it was important to have her back for a second season and assist in continuing the dialogue from season 1 and following a lot of the other characters this season...



Number  97
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Johnny Depp Says President Donald Trump Needs 'Help,' Later Apologizes for Controversial Assassination CommentJohnny Depp's Former Managers File Cross-Complaint, Claim Actor Spent $2M a Month to Maintain Lavish LifestyleRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“In documents obtained by ET, private security professionals Eugene Arreola and Miguel Sanchez say the were employees of the private security firm Premiere Group International and claim they were assigned to protect Depp.”
“When the 54-year-old actor faced a "financial crisis" in 2016, Depp cut ties with the company, but hired both Arreola and Sanchez individually, according to the lawsuit.”
“They claim that they were "told they would be classified as "employees," and would receive all the protections and benefits they were entitled to under the law."”
“The bodyguards who claim that they formed close friendships with Depp s family and friends during their years guarding the movie star allege that between 2016 and 2018 things began to spiral toward chaos and that they found themselves in situations that required more than what a bodyguard would be...”
“...expected to do...”
“The lawsuit alleges that the bodyguards were "asked repeatedly to drive vehicles that contained illegal substances, open containers and minors" and were "asked to monitor unstable individuals in [Depp's] life and entourage."”
“The suit further alleges that Arreola and Sanchez were "forced to protect [Depp] from himself and his vices while in public, becoming caretakers for him."”
“Additionally, the bodyguards claim that they were "exposed to unsafe conditions and situations" and, as a result, they suffered "stress-related injuries created by a hostile and unsafe work environment."”


Johnny Depp Says President Donald Trump Needs 'Help,' Later Apologizes for Controversial Assassination CommentJohnny Depp's Former Managers File Cross-Complaint, Claim Actor Spent $2M a Month to Maintain Lavish LifestyleRelated Gallery...
If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.
In documents obtained by ET, private security professionals Eugene Arreola and Miguel Sanchez say the were employees of the private security firm Premiere Group International and claim they were assigned to protect Depp.
When the 54-year-old actor faced a "financial crisis" in 2016, Depp cut ties with the company, but hired both Arreola and Sanchez individually, according to the lawsuit.
They claim that they were "told they would be classified as "employees," and would receive all the protections and benefits they were entitled to under the law."
The bodyguards who claim that they formed close friendships with Depp s family and friends during their years guarding the movie star allege that between 2016 and 2018 things began to spiral toward chaos and that they found themselves in situations that required more than what a bodyguard would be...
...expected to do...
The lawsuit alleges that the bodyguards were "asked repeatedly to drive vehicles that contained illegal substances, open containers and minors" and were "asked to monitor unstable individuals in [Depp's] life and entourage."
The suit further alleges that Arreola and Sanchez were "forced to protect [Depp] from himself and his vices while in public, becoming caretakers for him."
Additionally, the bodyguards claim that they were "exposed to unsafe conditions and situations" and, as a result, they suffered "stress-related injuries created by a hostile and unsafe work environment."



**Something goes wrong**
“But before we get too excited about this year's pic, let's take a trip down memory lane and look back at every every single one of the Kardashian family's Christmas cards.”
“CUE CHRISTMAS CARD BABY ANNOUCMENT.”
“So what better way than a shoot they can keep super private and have total control over?”
“...must be waiting on a big public debut...”
“Think about it they have already premiered their 10th season of Keeping Up With The Kardashians so they won t be announcing it in that and Kylie has been coy for so long practically fuelling the rumour mill so they...”
“), but the main one that has us HYPED is that potentially both Khloé and Kylie will debut their baby bumps.”
“Will Tristan be in it?”
“Rumours have already been circling as to who will be in it will Scott be cut out again?”
“With Christmas fast approaching, we are all ready and waiting for the family to drop this year's card.”
“And one Kardashian commitment that we are so, so glad they have stuck to is their lavish annual Christmas card.”


But before we get too excited about this year's pic, let's take a trip down memory lane and look back at every every single one of the Kardashian family's Christmas cards.
CUE CHRISTMAS CARD BABY ANNOUCMENT.
So what better way than a shoot they can keep super private and have total control over?
...must be waiting on a big public debut...
Think about it they have already premiered their 10th season of Keeping Up With The Kardashians so they won t be announcing it in that and Kylie has been coy for so long practically fuelling the rumour mill so they...
), but the main one that has us HYPED is that potentially both Khloé and Kylie will debut their baby bumps.
Will Tristan be in it?
Rumours have already been circling as to who will be in it will Scott be cut out again?
With Christmas fast approaching, we are all ready and waiting for the family to drop this year's card.
And one Kardashian commitment that we are so, so glad they have stuck to is their lavish annual Christmas card.



Number  99
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“During an appearance on the show, Keeping Up With The Kardashians, the star said, “I wasn’t planning on drinking,” because her mom appeared to be worried the star would partake in intoxicated festivities.”
“Is it really possible she’s never had a drink in her entire life?”
“The star is looking forward to being old enough to drink.”
“During an interview with BuzzFeed on Friday, the Keeping Up With The Kardashians star was asked about what she’s looking forward to the most about being in her 20’s.”
“The reality star turned 20-years-old just one day before.”
“She claimed, “Probably turning 21.”
“I feel like that’s fun.”
“You know, I’ve never had a drink before so I just wanna know what it’s like.”Something tells us she’s fibbing here.”
“In case you missed it, back in 2013, Kylie and her sister Kendall who were 15 and 17 at the time sparked rumors they were drinking illegally at a nightclub.”
“AdvertisementGood for her!”


During an appearance on the show, Keeping Up With The Kardashians, the star said, “I wasn’t planning on drinking,” because her mom appeared to be worried the star would partake in intoxicated festivities.
Is it really possible she’s never had a drink in her entire life?
The star is looking forward to being old enough to drink.
During an interview with BuzzFeed on Friday, the Keeping Up With The Kardashians star was asked about what she’s looking forward to the most about being in her 20’s.
The reality star turned 20-years-old just one day before.
She claimed, “Probably turning 21.
I feel like that’s fun.
You know, I’ve never had a drink before so I just wanna know what it’s like.”Something tells us she’s fibbing here.
In case you missed it, back in 2013, Kylie and her sister Kendall who were 15 and 17 at the time sparked rumors they were drinking illegally at a nightclub.
AdvertisementGood for her!



Number  100
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Who’s gonna argue with him?”Kushner went even further, calling Trump’s presidency “the Hitler mistake” that put a “borderline psychotic narcissist in the White House.””
“I mean, it’s Robert De Niro.”
““Good for him.”
““I can’t believe De Niro did that,” Kushner said.”
“WATCH: De Niro’s past criticism of Donald TrumpStory continues below advertisement“I agree,” Kushner said when asked about the De Niro moment, dropping an F-bomb of his own in relation to the president.”
“Boy, do we need that now.”The anti-Trump sentiment swept backstage as playwright Tony Kushner and others from “Angels in America” spoke to reporters about its three big wins: best play revival and acting trophies for Andrew Garfield and Nathan Lane.”
“...nobody else and even more importantly in these perilous times you rock the vote always fighting for in your own words truth transparency and integrity in government...”
“Robert De Niro apologizes to Canadians for Trump s idiotic behaviour 0 41 Robert De Niro apologizes to Canadians for Trump s idiotic behaviour Robert De Niro apologizes to Canadians for Trump s idiotic behaviour Jun 11 2018 De Niro said of Springsteen Bruce you can rock the house like...”
“The legendary actor urged the audience to vote in November and lauded Springsteen for his own political commitment before the singer sat at a piano for a moving performance based on his Springsteen on Broadway show that had him singing his classic hit My Hometown Story continues below advertisement WATCH”
“The CBS television audience heard dead silence instead before he raised his arms — twice — and earned a sustained standing ovation.”


Who’s gonna argue with him?”Kushner went even further, calling Trump’s presidency “the Hitler mistake” that put a “borderline psychotic narcissist in the White House.”
I mean, it’s Robert De Niro.
“Good for him.
“I can’t believe De Niro did that,” Kushner said.
WATCH: De Niro’s past criticism of Donald TrumpStory continues below advertisement“I agree,” Kushner said when asked about the De Niro moment, dropping an F-bomb of his own in relation to the president.
Boy, do we need that now.”The anti-Trump sentiment swept backstage as playwright Tony Kushner and others from “Angels in America” spoke to reporters about its three big wins: best play revival and acting trophies for Andrew Garfield and Nathan Lane.
...nobody else and even more importantly in these perilous times you rock the vote always fighting for in your own words truth transparency and integrity in government...
Robert De Niro apologizes to Canadians for Trump s idiotic behaviour 0 41 Robert De Niro apologizes to Canadians for Trump s idiotic behaviour Robert De Niro apologizes to Canadians for Trump s idiotic behaviour Jun 11 2018 De Niro said of Springsteen Bruce you can rock the house like...
The legendary actor urged the audience to vote in November and lauded Springsteen for his own political commitment before the singer sat at a piano for a moving performance based on his Springsteen on Broadway show that had him singing his classic hit My Hometown Story continues below advertisement WATCH
The CBS television audience heard dead silence instead before he raised his arms — twice — and earned a sustained standing ovation.



Number  101
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Or "I will have sex with you."”
“Or "Come home with me."”
“I rebuffed.”
“You pursued me, lightly, on and off, over a course of years, saying you had a thing for a "little yellow girl" (me).”
“You seemed sincere.”
“And you were a fan of my grandmother, respected her, and told me so.”
“Not being in the music business made it possible for me to relax around you.”
“You were charming and funny and charismatic and self-deprecating.”
“I don't recall you and I ever just going out to dinner, or having a one-to-one experience; we were always in groups, and we had many, many mutual friends.”
“Over the next three or four years, I would see you out and about, at a nightclub called Nell's mostly.”


Or "I will have sex with you."
Or "Come home with me."
I rebuffed.
You pursued me, lightly, on and off, over a course of years, saying you had a thing for a "little yellow girl" (me).
You seemed sincere.
And you were a fan of my grandmother, respected her, and told me so.
Not being in the music business made it possible for me to relax around you.
You were charming and funny and charismatic and self-deprecating.
I don't recall you and I ever just going out to dinner, or having a one-to-one experience; we were always in groups, and we had many, many mutual friends.
Over the next three or four years, I would see you out and about, at a nightclub called Nell's mostly.



Number  102
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pin it all in place with a hairpin, and spray some hairspray to keep it from moving.”
“Twist the sections together as one, twist it into a knot, and then tuck the ends under and pin them in place.”
“What’s the harm in just a few more glorious moments of slumber, after all?”
“Well, for one, the state of your hair, which is usually a dead giveaway of a hurried, harried morning.”
“Though model-off-duty strands are having a moment right now, there’s a fine line between artfully tousled and tousled by your pillow; luckily, you don’t have to sacrifice finesse the next time you press snooze (for the third time).”
“Ahead, you’ll find seven quick and easy hairstyles that will take three minutes or less to execute—leaving more time for your sweet, sweet dreams.”
“Keep scrolling to see them all!”
“Triple Twisted PonyGetty Images/Jason LaVeris/ContributorGive your go-to high pony a chic update with this twisted variation.”
“Pull your hair back into a ponytail, separating a small piece to wrap around the hair tie.”
“Split the tail into two parts, and twist each one.”


Pin it all in place with a hairpin, and spray some hairspray to keep it from moving.
Twist the sections together as one, twist it into a knot, and then tuck the ends under and pin them in place.
What’s the harm in just a few more glorious moments of slumber, after all?
Well, for one, the state of your hair, which is usually a dead giveaway of a hurried, harried morning.
Though model-off-duty strands are having a moment right now, there’s a fine line between artfully tousled and tousled by your pillow; luckily, you don’t have to sacrifice finesse the next time you press snooze (for the third time).
Ahead, you’ll find seven quick and easy hairstyles that will take three minutes or less to execute—leaving more time for your sweet, sweet dreams.
Keep scrolling to see them all!
Triple Twisted PonyGetty Images/Jason LaVeris/ContributorGive your go-to high pony a chic update with this twisted variation.
Pull your hair back into a ponytail, separating a small piece to wrap around the hair tie.
Split the tail into two parts, and twist each one.



Number  103
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Contact us at letters@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“...the weekend he finally explained his reasoning...”
“Ferrell — who appeared on the talk show with John Lithgow, Mel Gibson, and Mark Wahlberg — decided he wanted to “inspire” the graduating class, by singing the Houston song to them.”
““I started thinking, ‘Do I sing a couple of lines or do I torture the students and their parents by singing the entire song?’ and I chose the latter,” he explained.”
“In addition to the song Ferrell gave the graduating students sound advice I just told them to keep your feet firmly planted on the ground and reach for the stars which I read on the back of a cereal box The decision may have been spawned in part by nerves...”
“...after all Ferrell isn t typically asked to preside over serious situations...”
““I hadn’t been put in that position before because usually I just make fun of things,” Ferrell said, who graduated from USC in 1990 with a degree in sports information.”
““A program so difficult, so arduous, that they discontinued the major eight years after I left,” he said during the commencement address where he received an honorary USC doctorate, thus requiring that his wife and children address him as “Dr.”
“Ferrell.” “There will be no exceptions,” he joked, noting, “I think my fellow doctorates would agree, based on our achievements, we are all on equal footing.”Get The Brief.”


Contact us at letters@time.com.
If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.
...the weekend he finally explained his reasoning...
Ferrell — who appeared on the talk show with John Lithgow, Mel Gibson, and Mark Wahlberg — decided he wanted to “inspire” the graduating class, by singing the Houston song to them.
“I started thinking, ‘Do I sing a couple of lines or do I torture the students and their parents by singing the entire song?’ and I chose the latter,” he explained.
In addition to the song Ferrell gave the graduating students sound advice I just told them to keep your feet firmly planted on the ground and reach for the stars which I read on the back of a cereal box The decision may have been spawned in part by nerves...
...after all Ferrell isn t typically asked to preside over serious situations...
“I hadn’t been put in that position before because usually I just make fun of things,” Ferrell said, who graduated from USC in 1990 with a degree in sports information.
“A program so difficult, so arduous, that they discontinued the major eight years after I left,” he said during the commencement address where he received an honorary USC doctorate, thus requiring that his wife and children address him as “Dr.
Ferrell.” “There will be no exceptions,” he joked, noting, “I think my fellow doctorates would agree, based on our achievements, we are all on equal footing.”Get The Brief.



Number  104
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He knew what He was doing.”For the latest beauty and style trends subscribe to our new podcast ‘Get Tressed With Us’ below!”
“I have been waiting and wondering but God had a plan all along.”
“Khloe Kardashian is baring it all as she nears the end of her pregnancy.”
“The 33-year-old reality star, who is expecting her first child with boyfriend Tristan Thompson, rocked black lingerie and cradled her bare baby bump in a new pic posted to Instagram on Wednesday, March 21.”
““ @sashasamsonova,” she captioned the shot, tagging her glam squad.”
“While it’s unclear exactly when the photo was taken, Kardashian revealed on January 2 that she was officially six months along.”
“While she traveled to Japan at eight months pregnant late last month, a source exclusively told Us Weekly that the Revenge Body host is set to stay in Cleveland until she gives birth.”
“(Thompson, 27, currently plays for the Cleveland Cavaliers).”
“Kardashian revealed on the March 4 episode of Keeping Up With the Kardashians that she is expecting a baby girl.”
“The Good American Designer celebrated the imminent arrival of her daughter at a pink-themed baby shower on March 11.”


He knew what He was doing.”For the latest beauty and style trends subscribe to our new podcast ‘Get Tressed With Us’ below!
I have been waiting and wondering but God had a plan all along.
Khloe Kardashian is baring it all as she nears the end of her pregnancy.
The 33-year-old reality star, who is expecting her first child with boyfriend Tristan Thompson, rocked black lingerie and cradled her bare baby bump in a new pic posted to Instagram on Wednesday, March 21.
“ @sashasamsonova,” she captioned the shot, tagging her glam squad.
While it’s unclear exactly when the photo was taken, Kardashian revealed on January 2 that she was officially six months along.
While she traveled to Japan at eight months pregnant late last month, a source exclusively told Us Weekly that the Revenge Body host is set to stay in Cleveland until she gives birth.
(Thompson, 27, currently plays for the Cleveland Cavaliers).
Kardashian revealed on the March 4 episode of Keeping Up With the Kardashians that she is expecting a baby girl.
The Good American Designer celebrated the imminent arrival of her daughter at a pink-themed baby shower on March 11.



Number  105
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“SHOP THIS STORY”
“OLAPLEX HAIR PERFECTOR NO 3 REPAIRING TREATMENTOlaplex, which we’ve raved about before, is a miracle product for even the most abused manes.”
“Truth be told, you can’t disguise damage with styling products—that’s a TLC job.”
“Turn your mane’s mood from blue to blissful with one of these ultra-hydrating masks for red carpet-ready shine that’ll steal the spotlight.”
“1.”
“BAMBI & SAMMI NO.1 HAIR MASKNever underestimate the power of a pouched mask.”
“Australian company Bambi & Sammi knew what they were doing when they whipped up this vegan-friendly mask full of hydrating macadamia nut and blend of oils.”
“Let it sit for 10 minutes under a cap while you shower and hop out with super-soft strands.”
“2.”
“OUAI TREATMENT MASQUEWhen you want healthy-looking and feeling hair that smells like heaven, the only thing you need is 5 minutes and a OUAI Treatment Mask, thanks to its star ingredient—artichoke leaf extract.”


SHOP THIS STORY
OLAPLEX HAIR PERFECTOR NO 3 REPAIRING TREATMENTOlaplex, which we’ve raved about before, is a miracle product for even the most abused manes.
Truth be told, you can’t disguise damage with styling products—that’s a TLC job.
Turn your mane’s mood from blue to blissful with one of these ultra-hydrating masks for red carpet-ready shine that’ll steal the spotlight.
1.
BAMBI & SAMMI NO.1 HAIR MASKNever underestimate the power of a pouched mask.
Australian company Bambi & Sammi knew what they were doing when they whipped up this vegan-friendly mask full of hydrating macadamia nut and blend of oils.
Let it sit for 10 minutes under a cap while you shower and hop out with super-soft strands.
2.
OUAI TREATMENT MASQUEWhen you want healthy-looking and feeling hair that smells like heaven, the only thing you need is 5 minutes and a OUAI Treatment Mask, thanks to its star ingredient—artichoke leaf extract.



Number  106
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Kanye and I are going to look into other options and see what we are comfortable with … but I’m definitely leaning towards [surrogacy].”
“'I feel like surrogacy is the only option for me.”
“...as Kim opted to go a different route after health complications during her first two pregnancies Devoted mom Kim who suffered with life threatening placenta accreta during her first two pregnancies is said to have begun searching for a surrogate via an agency The report came after TMZ claimed a...”
“Winter baby Kim and Kanye s third child is due at the end of January after paying 45 000 to a surrogate to carry the baby a report Wednesday claims Another one on the way It was reported in July that Kim 36 and Kanye 40 had found a surrogate...”
“The magazine's insider added the surrogate is 'in her late 20s' and are set to welcome their third child in 'January 2018'.”
“A report by UsWeekly at the time alleged the surrogate was 'three months pregnant'.”
“She is also banned from using hot tubs, hair dye and eating raw fish.”
“TMZ reports that the surrogate is prohibited from smoking, drinking or doing drugs during the pregnancy.”
“'They don’t want any complications and Kim is providing an ideal eating regimen and diet so everyone knows what the baby is consuming before it's born.'”
“...the celebrity couple who are already parents daughter North four and son Saint who is almost two are having a baby girl who is due at the end of January They want everything to be perfect and for the baby to be extremely healthy the insider added...”


Kanye and I are going to look into other options and see what we are comfortable with … but I’m definitely leaning towards [surrogacy].
'I feel like surrogacy is the only option for me.
...as Kim opted to go a different route after health complications during her first two pregnancies Devoted mom Kim who suffered with life threatening placenta accreta during her first two pregnancies is said to have begun searching for a surrogate via an agency The report came after TMZ claimed a...
Winter baby Kim and Kanye s third child is due at the end of January after paying 45 000 to a surrogate to carry the baby a report Wednesday claims Another one on the way It was reported in July that Kim 36 and Kanye 40 had found a surrogate...
The magazine's insider added the surrogate is 'in her late 20s' and are set to welcome their third child in 'January 2018'.
A report by UsWeekly at the time alleged the surrogate was 'three months pregnant'.
She is also banned from using hot tubs, hair dye and eating raw fish.
TMZ reports that the surrogate is prohibited from smoking, drinking or doing drugs during the pregnancy.
'They don’t want any complications and Kim is providing an ideal eating regimen and diet so everyone knows what the baby is consuming before it's born.'
...the celebrity couple who are already parents daughter North four and son Saint who is almost two are having a baby girl who is due at the end of January They want everything to be perfect and for the baby to be extremely healthy the insider added...



Number  107
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I'm on blood thinners."”
“He said, “I have, I think, like 30 in my right hand in arm and I have about 10 in my left, so I'm just waiting for them to clear up.”
“Travis is still recovering from his blood clots, which forced Blink-182 to postpones their upcoming Las Vegas concert residency.”
“...are car was Totaled Waiting for your permission to load the Instagram Media...”
“I have a really big 4x4 G Wagon and if I wasn t in that it might have been different but it held up pretty well Landon wrote on Instagram Life s crazy My dad carl daw and I could have died today our car was struck by school bus...”
“It was insane.”
“A school bus ran a red light.”
“My car is totaled but I pretty much walked away okay, which is awesome.”
“News at Beautycon, “Yesterday, I was in a really bad car accident, but I came out unscathed, which is pretty awesome.”
“On Saturday, he told E!”


I'm on blood thinners."
He said, “I have, I think, like 30 in my right hand in arm and I have about 10 in my left, so I'm just waiting for them to clear up.
Travis is still recovering from his blood clots, which forced Blink-182 to postpones their upcoming Las Vegas concert residency.
...are car was Totaled Waiting for your permission to load the Instagram Media...
I have a really big 4x4 G Wagon and if I wasn t in that it might have been different but it held up pretty well Landon wrote on Instagram Life s crazy My dad carl daw and I could have died today our car was struck by school bus...
It was insane.
A school bus ran a red light.
My car is totaled but I pretty much walked away okay, which is awesome.
News at Beautycon, “Yesterday, I was in a really bad car accident, but I came out unscathed, which is pretty awesome.
On Saturday, he told E!



Number  108
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“NBC issued a statement with the companies that producing the show, Universal Television and Wolf Entertainment, indicating they 'promptly began an investigation' when they were apprised of the situation, have 'already taken action,' and 'continue to monitor very closely to ensure all of our employees feel safe and supported.'”
“I have personally apologized to anyone who I have upset, and I am committed to doing what is necessary to make up any damage that I may have caused.'”
“The 57-year-old Chicago PD star married actress Angie Janu in 2000 and the pair share two children, 14-year-old Bix and 11-year-old Bo.”
“Beghe notes in his filing that he will pay spousal support to his estranged partner, but wishes to keep some assets he inherited out of the divorce proceedings.”
“Jason Beghe filed for divorce from his wife of 17 years on Thursday, citing 'irreconcilable differences,'The Californication actor had recently been 'investigated' by NBC for his behavior on the set of Chicago PD 'that some [cast and crew] said constituted sexual harassment', according to Deadline.”
“According to The Blast, the Thelma And Louise actor 'will pay up spousal support, but does list a few inherited properties he wants to keep separate in the divorce.'”
“He is also applying for joint legal and physical custody of their children.”
“The veteran actor 'has apparently consistently used highly aggressive and sexually suggestive language' on the set of his NBC show, as well as 'intimidating' behavior, according to Deadline.”
“Happier times: Beghe and wife Angie Janu are pictured here in 1997Beghe was investigated by NBC last year over claims he bullied his colleagues on the show's cast and crew.”
“'People felt disrespected, he yelled a tremendous amount, he had a quick fuse and when it was set off, it was unpleasant for everyone around him,' an insider told Variety.”


NBC issued a statement with the companies that producing the show, Universal Television and Wolf Entertainment, indicating they 'promptly began an investigation' when they were apprised of the situation, have 'already taken action,' and 'continue to monitor very closely to ensure all of our employees feel safe and supported.'
I have personally apologized to anyone who I have upset, and I am committed to doing what is necessary to make up any damage that I may have caused.'
The 57-year-old Chicago PD star married actress Angie Janu in 2000 and the pair share two children, 14-year-old Bix and 11-year-old Bo.
Beghe notes in his filing that he will pay spousal support to his estranged partner, but wishes to keep some assets he inherited out of the divorce proceedings.
Jason Beghe filed for divorce from his wife of 17 years on Thursday, citing 'irreconcilable differences,'The Californication actor had recently been 'investigated' by NBC for his behavior on the set of Chicago PD 'that some [cast and crew] said constituted sexual harassment', according to Deadline.
According to The Blast, the Thelma And Louise actor 'will pay up spousal support, but does list a few inherited properties he wants to keep separate in the divorce.'
He is also applying for joint legal and physical custody of their children.
The veteran actor 'has apparently consistently used highly aggressive and sexually suggestive language' on the set of his NBC show, as well as 'intimidating' behavior, according to Deadline.
Happier times: Beghe and wife Angie Janu are pictured here in 1997Beghe was investigated by NBC last year over claims he bullied his colleagues on the show's cast and crew.
'People felt disrespected, he yelled a tremendous amount, he had a quick fuse and when it was set off, it was unpleasant for everyone around him,' an insider told Variety.



Number  109
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image credit: @mirandakerr...”
“If so, share your favourite oil in the comments section below.”
“Do you use facial oils regularly in your skin care routine?”
“Then click here to find out why you need one, where it fits into your routine and why your standard olive oil just won’t do.”
“Want more information on facial oils?”
“...age Ultimately while facial oils are a vital addition in any skin care routine as they work wonders to nourish plump and hydrate the skin using them as a pimple treatment may not deliver the same results as the proven acne treatment duo of benzoyl peroxide and salicylic acid...”
“In fact Barron says While some people report success using oils to banish breakouts mounds of research has shown that gently removing excess oil and controlling acne causing bacteria with benzoyl peroxide and using a leave on exfoliant with salicylic acid is a proven reliable approach for acne at any...”
“And if the advice from Bryan Barron Director of Research and Content at Paula’s Choice, is anything to go by, it isn’t good news.”
“While we’re not debating the effectiveness the oil has on Miranda’s skin, we wanted to check in with a skin care expert to find out if facial oils can work as an effective pimple treatment for the rest of us.”
“I put it on after cleansing, misting, exfoliating and moisturising,” she said.”


Image credit: @mirandakerr...
If so, share your favourite oil in the comments section below.
Do you use facial oils regularly in your skin care routine?
Then click here to find out why you need one, where it fits into your routine and why your standard olive oil just won’t do.
Want more information on facial oils?
...age Ultimately while facial oils are a vital addition in any skin care routine as they work wonders to nourish plump and hydrate the skin using them as a pimple treatment may not deliver the same results as the proven acne treatment duo of benzoyl peroxide and salicylic acid...
In fact Barron says While some people report success using oils to banish breakouts mounds of research has shown that gently removing excess oil and controlling acne causing bacteria with benzoyl peroxide and using a leave on exfoliant with salicylic acid is a proven reliable approach for acne at any...
And if the advice from Bryan Barron Director of Research and Content at Paula’s Choice, is anything to go by, it isn’t good news.
While we’re not debating the effectiveness the oil has on Miranda’s skin, we wanted to check in with a skin care expert to find out if facial oils can work as an effective pimple treatment for the rest of us.
I put it on after cleansing, misting, exfoliating and moisturising,” she said.



Number  110
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Its success also prompted Warner Bros to lighten the tone of Justice League, and that was one of the things about it that were appreciated.”
“Indeed, the immense success of her film showed that there is a huge audience for a well-made female-led superhero movie.”
“Gal Gadot had an incredible 2017.”
“Gal Gadot is really the Hollywood find of 2017.”
“She did appear in a few films before, including a brief appearance in Batman v Superman, but it was in 2017 that she shone.”
“Gal has in a minuscule amount of time risen to become one of the top most actors in Hollywood.”
“Her performance in this summer’s DC blockbuster Wonder Woman helped DC’s cinematic universe get on track and she was adored even in Justice League, which was a failure for Warner Bros and DC.”
“She did only two films this year, but since those films came from a big studio like Warner Bros and were superhero movies that usually earn big bucks, they helped her to become the highest paid actress of 2017, according to Forbes.”
“Oh, and she was pregnant while filming many of her stunts in Justice League.”
“Isn’t she really the Wonder Woman?”


Its success also prompted Warner Bros to lighten the tone of Justice League, and that was one of the things about it that were appreciated.
Indeed, the immense success of her film showed that there is a huge audience for a well-made female-led superhero movie.
Gal Gadot had an incredible 2017.
Gal Gadot is really the Hollywood find of 2017.
She did appear in a few films before, including a brief appearance in Batman v Superman, but it was in 2017 that she shone.
Gal has in a minuscule amount of time risen to become one of the top most actors in Hollywood.
Her performance in this summer’s DC blockbuster Wonder Woman helped DC’s cinematic universe get on track and she was adored even in Justice League, which was a failure for Warner Bros and DC.
She did only two films this year, but since those films came from a big studio like Warner Bros and were superhero movies that usually earn big bucks, they helped her to become the highest paid actress of 2017, according to Forbes.
Oh, and she was pregnant while filming many of her stunts in Justice League.
Isn’t she really the Wonder Woman?



Number  111
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““If they’re giggling more than they’re crying, and if they’re curious and talkative, then I know they’re good.””
“Things will be compromised and you just have to be okay with that.”“I just pray that my kids are happy,” the strong mom said back in 2015.”
““You need to cut yourself some slack and bite off what you can chew.”
““Any mom who all of the sudden has little people that rely heavily on them for survival needs to maintain her own sense of self,” Alba told TODAY.”
“Despite all of her successes, Alba still feels all of the typical pressures of motherhood, impromptu nursing breaks included.”
“Hayes, born on New Year’s Eve, is Alba’s third child with husband Cash Warren, joining daughters Honor Marie, 9, and Haven Garner, 6.”
“The "Dark Angel" actress has been outspoken and proud about breastfeeding her 7-week-old, sharing updates on social media before the Golden Globes, while watching Netflix and even after going to the spa.”
“That's something we'd love to see more of!”
“It's also been reported that Target has been testing out designated nursing stations at some locations.”
“...stores including our fitting rooms even if others are waiting...”


“If they’re giggling more than they’re crying, and if they’re curious and talkative, then I know they’re good.”
Things will be compromised and you just have to be okay with that.”“I just pray that my kids are happy,” the strong mom said back in 2015.
“You need to cut yourself some slack and bite off what you can chew.
“Any mom who all of the sudden has little people that rely heavily on them for survival needs to maintain her own sense of self,” Alba told TODAY.
Despite all of her successes, Alba still feels all of the typical pressures of motherhood, impromptu nursing breaks included.
Hayes, born on New Year’s Eve, is Alba’s third child with husband Cash Warren, joining daughters Honor Marie, 9, and Haven Garner, 6.
The "Dark Angel" actress has been outspoken and proud about breastfeeding her 7-week-old, sharing updates on social media before the Golden Globes, while watching Netflix and even after going to the spa.
That's something we'd love to see more of!
It's also been reported that Target has been testing out designated nursing stations at some locations.
...stores including our fitting rooms even if others are waiting...



Number  112
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...and always intelligent as well...”
“32 33 34 Dan Feinberg of The Hollywood Reporter praised the performances of Paulson and Vance writing As Clark s discomfort grows Paulson s collection of tics seem more and more human Vance s Cochran is sometimes hilarious but he has a dynamic range such that he s occasionally introspective...”
“[18] In February 2015, Courtney B. Vance joined the series as Johnnie Cochran.”
“[17] In January 2015, it was reported that John Travolta had joined the cast as Robert Shapiro; he would also serve as producer.”
“[16] Subsequently, David Schwimmer was cast as Robert Kardashian.”
“[15]Casting [ edit ]Cuba Gooding Jr. and Sarah Paulson were the first to be cast as Simpson and Marcia Clark, respectively.”
“Murphy and others wanted to create an unbiased account of the trial by doing “certain takes guilty, certain takes innocent” according to Cuba Gooding Jr so that they would have a “plethora of emotions to play with”.”
“[1][14] The series was previously in development at Fox but since moved to the company's sibling cable network FX.”
“All 10 episodes were expected to be written by Alexander and Karaszewski.”
“[13] Co-executive producers are Anthony Hemingway and D. V. DeVincentis.”


...and always intelligent as well...
32 33 34 Dan Feinberg of The Hollywood Reporter praised the performances of Paulson and Vance writing As Clark s discomfort grows Paulson s collection of tics seem more and more human Vance s Cochran is sometimes hilarious but he has a dynamic range such that he s occasionally introspective...
[18] In February 2015, Courtney B. Vance joined the series as Johnnie Cochran.
[17] In January 2015, it was reported that John Travolta had joined the cast as Robert Shapiro; he would also serve as producer.
[16] Subsequently, David Schwimmer was cast as Robert Kardashian.
[15]Casting [ edit ]Cuba Gooding Jr. and Sarah Paulson were the first to be cast as Simpson and Marcia Clark, respectively.
Murphy and others wanted to create an unbiased account of the trial by doing “certain takes guilty, certain takes innocent” according to Cuba Gooding Jr so that they would have a “plethora of emotions to play with”.
[1][14] The series was previously in development at Fox but since moved to the company's sibling cable network FX.
All 10 episodes were expected to be written by Alexander and Karaszewski.
[13] Co-executive producers are Anthony Hemingway and D. V. DeVincentis.



Number  113
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch more: 'Stranger Things' actor joins SWMRS onstage...”
“We are all so proud of this season and I would never want this story to negatively impact the show.”The actor's expected to return as Jonathan Byers for the upcoming third season of Stranger Things.”
“I want to work and continue to work.”At the time of the cocaine possession reports, Heaton released an official statement admitting that he was “sorry to all the fans and my Stranger Things family for missing the premiere.”
“All of a sudden it becomes a very big story and it gets really blown out of proportion.” After reporters showed up on his parents' doorstep in Yorkshire, England, the actor says he “just wanted to go back.”
“When something steps in from the work you are doing and breaks into your personal life…you feel kind of vulnerable.”
““Everything happened so fast, and I hadn't come to terms with the fact that I was famous.”
“Hearton admits that his newfound fame from Stranger Things served as an impediment in relation to the drug debacle:“It was hard,” he says.”
“The actor now says the incident is “all sorted,” and he reveals to Flaunt magazine that the public scrutiny he received over the experience was “fucking awful,” as noted by the NME.”
“Heaton, who plays Jonathan Byers on Stranger Things, was returned to London and missed out on the show's L.A. premiere event for the second season.”
“Although he wasn't arrested and no charges were filed, officers at Los Angeles International Airport detected a small amount of cocaine on the actor's belongings after a routine inspection by a customs canine.”


Watch more: 'Stranger Things' actor joins SWMRS onstage...
We are all so proud of this season and I would never want this story to negatively impact the show.”The actor's expected to return as Jonathan Byers for the upcoming third season of Stranger Things.
I want to work and continue to work.”At the time of the cocaine possession reports, Heaton released an official statement admitting that he was “sorry to all the fans and my Stranger Things family for missing the premiere.
All of a sudden it becomes a very big story and it gets really blown out of proportion.” After reporters showed up on his parents' doorstep in Yorkshire, England, the actor says he “just wanted to go back.
When something steps in from the work you are doing and breaks into your personal life…you feel kind of vulnerable.
“Everything happened so fast, and I hadn't come to terms with the fact that I was famous.
Hearton admits that his newfound fame from Stranger Things served as an impediment in relation to the drug debacle:“It was hard,” he says.
The actor now says the incident is “all sorted,” and he reveals to Flaunt magazine that the public scrutiny he received over the experience was “fucking awful,” as noted by the NME.
Heaton, who plays Jonathan Byers on Stranger Things, was returned to London and missed out on the show's L.A. premiere event for the second season.
Although he wasn't arrested and no charges were filed, officers at Los Angeles International Airport detected a small amount of cocaine on the actor's belongings after a routine inspection by a customs canine.



Number  114
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The two subsequently reconciled, split again in February and reconciled again, as Chyna and Rob were seen kissing in a Snapchat video she uploaded in April.”
“I don’t play when it comes to my woman and my baby.'”
“And Rob Kardashian, 30, is every inch the doting dad as he posted a sweet picture of Dream on his Instagram on Friday.”
“Cute as a button, the seven-month-old little girl gazed adoringly at her father who was behind the camera lens.”
“Scroll down for video She is sitting up on her own Proud dad Rob Kardashian 30 gushed about his seven month old daughter Dream as he shared a cute picture on Instagram on Friday Dream wore a simple white jumpsuit and a pink baseball cap as she enjoyed spending quality...”
“...time with Rob...”
“The Keeping Up With The Kardashians star proved to be throwing himself into fatherhood and discussed how proud he was of his daughter on social media.”
“Pleased as punch, he gushed on Instagram: 'Lol my baby.”
“She is sitting up on her own.'”
“(sic)Siblings: Blac Chyna showed off her children King Cairo, four, and Dream, seven months, on Snapchat on SundayThe Rob & Chyna TV personality shares his daughter with his on-off girlfriend Chyna, 29, who is the proud mum to two children.”


The two subsequently reconciled, split again in February and reconciled again, as Chyna and Rob were seen kissing in a Snapchat video she uploaded in April.
I don’t play when it comes to my woman and my baby.'
And Rob Kardashian, 30, is every inch the doting dad as he posted a sweet picture of Dream on his Instagram on Friday.
Cute as a button, the seven-month-old little girl gazed adoringly at her father who was behind the camera lens.
Scroll down for video She is sitting up on her own Proud dad Rob Kardashian 30 gushed about his seven month old daughter Dream as he shared a cute picture on Instagram on Friday Dream wore a simple white jumpsuit and a pink baseball cap as she enjoyed spending quality...
...time with Rob...
The Keeping Up With The Kardashians star proved to be throwing himself into fatherhood and discussed how proud he was of his daughter on social media.
Pleased as punch, he gushed on Instagram: 'Lol my baby.
She is sitting up on her own.'
(sic)Siblings: Blac Chyna showed off her children King Cairo, four, and Dream, seven months, on Snapchat on SundayThe Rob & Chyna TV personality shares his daughter with his on-off girlfriend Chyna, 29, who is the proud mum to two children.



Number  115
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“To the Bone hits Netflix on July 14.”
““I told my publicist that if I could snap my fingers and gain 10 pounds right that second, I would,” she concluded of the experience.”
““The second time I looked over at the end and she was sobbing; it really hit her hard.”The Love, Rosie actress also told The Edit that she couldn’t book photoshoots in magazines because she was too skinny.”
““The first time she was a bit in shock,” Collins added of her mom’s reaction.”
“So when my mom saw the film, she saw Lily’s reaction because she knows me the best.”The scene caused her mom to breakdown.”
““I saw myself in the photo and my heart dropped.”
“I didn’t think she’d actually take one but she did,” Collins recalled.”
““There’s a scene where I’m taking my clothes off to be weighed by Carrie Preston, my stepmom in the movie, who takes a photo on her phone and shows it to me.”
“I want to know what you’re doing, you look great!’ I got into the car with my mom and said, ‘That is why the problem exists.’”The role hit home for Collins, who previously revealed that she suffered an eating disorder.”
““I tried to explain [I lost weight for a role] and she goes, ‘No!”


To the Bone hits Netflix on July 14.
“I told my publicist that if I could snap my fingers and gain 10 pounds right that second, I would,” she concluded of the experience.
“The second time I looked over at the end and she was sobbing; it really hit her hard.”The Love, Rosie actress also told The Edit that she couldn’t book photoshoots in magazines because she was too skinny.
“The first time she was a bit in shock,” Collins added of her mom’s reaction.
So when my mom saw the film, she saw Lily’s reaction because she knows me the best.”The scene caused her mom to breakdown.
“I saw myself in the photo and my heart dropped.
I didn’t think she’d actually take one but she did,” Collins recalled.
“There’s a scene where I’m taking my clothes off to be weighed by Carrie Preston, my stepmom in the movie, who takes a photo on her phone and shows it to me.
I want to know what you’re doing, you look great!’ I got into the car with my mom and said, ‘That is why the problem exists.’”The role hit home for Collins, who previously revealed that she suffered an eating disorder.
“I tried to explain [I lost weight for a role] and she goes, ‘No!



Number  116
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I thought it was a date.”Secure your ideal wedding vision by starting with The Knot’s Style Quiz, here.”
“I wasn’t mature enough.”
““I think we’re both in a good place in our lives,” she said on the radio program.”
“I think we’ve both been through a lot and can really appreciate each other—both the good and the challenges.”Lopez echoed her boyfriend’s notes about their similar life stages in an interview with Cubby and Carolina in the Morning this week.”
“We both have two kids.”
““We both come from Latino backgrounds.”
“We’re both from New York,” he mused on the Today show.”
““We’re in our forties.”
“You know, boys, we got to get our dumbness out of the way.”They Share Similar Life StagesRodriguez also explained how they bond over the parallels in their lives.”
““It was just too much craziness.”


I thought it was a date.”Secure your ideal wedding vision by starting with The Knot’s Style Quiz, here.
I wasn’t mature enough.
“I think we’re both in a good place in our lives,” she said on the radio program.
I think we’ve both been through a lot and can really appreciate each other—both the good and the challenges.”Lopez echoed her boyfriend’s notes about their similar life stages in an interview with Cubby and Carolina in the Morning this week.
We both have two kids.
“We both come from Latino backgrounds.
We’re both from New York,” he mused on the Today show.
“We’re in our forties.
You know, boys, we got to get our dumbness out of the way.”They Share Similar Life StagesRodriguez also explained how they bond over the parallels in their lives.
“It was just too much craziness.



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Since they reconciled in the fall, Bieber and Gomez have been regularly seen by Los Angeles church-goers at Wednesday night service (sometimes kissing) and have been often photographed by paparazzi at the ice rink that same evening.”
“Gomez and Bieber arrived at church in Bieber's Jeep.”
“They entered the building separately, but the same woman in the photo alongside them makes it clear they walked in the door only seconds apart.”
“Justin arriving.”
“BACKGRIDSelena arriving.”
“BACKGRIDChurch-goers also spotted the two—and one filmed Gomez at the front of the church.”
“The back of Bieber's head appears to be visible in the video because of his current Shaggy-esque blond hairstyle.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”


You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...
Since they reconciled in the fall, Bieber and Gomez have been regularly seen by Los Angeles church-goers at Wednesday night service (sometimes kissing) and have been often photographed by paparazzi at the ice rink that same evening.
Gomez and Bieber arrived at church in Bieber's Jeep.
They entered the building separately, but the same woman in the photo alongside them makes it clear they walked in the door only seconds apart.
Justin arriving.
BACKGRIDSelena arriving.
BACKGRIDChurch-goers also spotted the two—and one filmed Gomez at the front of the church.
The back of Bieber's head appears to be visible in the video because of his current Shaggy-esque blond hairstyle.
This content is imported from Instagram.
You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.



Number  118
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For the complete story, visit EOnline.com/News.”
“While in Thailand training for a professional kickboxing tournament, Elba talks to the magazine about work, love and fatherhood.”
“Bless!”
“Dig a little deeper into the issue and you've hit another jackpot—a photo of Elba as he shows off his perfectly sculpted figure in jeans, a peek of his Topman briefs and not much else.”
“The 44-year-old actor strips down for Essence's Global Issue, teasing a slightly unbuttoned shirt on the cover.”
“Idris Elba is making his directorial debut behind the scenes for his new film Yardie, but still proves to be a natural in front of the camera.”


For the complete story, visit EOnline.com/News.
While in Thailand training for a professional kickboxing tournament, Elba talks to the magazine about work, love and fatherhood.
Bless!
Dig a little deeper into the issue and you've hit another jackpot—a photo of Elba as he shows off his perfectly sculpted figure in jeans, a peek of his Topman briefs and not much else.
The 44-year-old actor strips down for Essence's Global Issue, teasing a slightly unbuttoned shirt on the cover.
Idris Elba is making his directorial debut behind the scenes for his new film Yardie, but still proves to be a natural in front of the camera.



Number  119
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I want what I want when I want it, dammit!”
“I’m a grown-up, but surgery, sadness, and immobility had me acting like a child: stomping my feet like Veruca Salt.”
“And like eating too many sweets when you’re on a strict diet, there is a deep shame in spending this way.”
“Always being independent and being on my own has been a point of pride for me.”
“There are very few things I consider hard to admit, but this is one of them.”
“Smart people don’t spend money recklessly.”
“I consider myself to be a smart person.”
“This sounds almost ridiculous as I type it.”
“As a result, my phone is now home to every brand and retail app on the planet, each at the ready for swiping and shopping-cart-filling aplenty.”
“(Well, for me anyway.)”


I want what I want when I want it, dammit!
I’m a grown-up, but surgery, sadness, and immobility had me acting like a child: stomping my feet like Veruca Salt.
And like eating too many sweets when you’re on a strict diet, there is a deep shame in spending this way.
Always being independent and being on my own has been a point of pride for me.
There are very few things I consider hard to admit, but this is one of them.
Smart people don’t spend money recklessly.
I consider myself to be a smart person.
This sounds almost ridiculous as I type it.
As a result, my phone is now home to every brand and retail app on the planet, each at the ready for swiping and shopping-cart-filling aplenty.
(Well, for me anyway.)



Number  120
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...what s coming to Netflix in December and what to watch here...”
“...for Wimps season one America s Funniest Home Videos New Collection D Nincompoop Nation Jeff Dunham Arguing with Myself 2006 December 19th Dance Academy 3 Seasons December 20th Che Two parts December 24th Amores Perros 2000 December 25th Pirates of the Caribbean The Curse of the Black Pearl 2003 See...”
“If you're in the middle of It's Always Sunny In Philadelphia you'll definitely want to binge faster.”
“Every season of that show is leaving Netflix next month.”
“The Man From Snow River, an excellent Australian film with some of the best horse-riding cinematography out there, is also riding off into the sunset (we just watched this and the kids loved it.”
“I watched it as a kid many times.)”
“See what's coming to Netflix in December, and what to watch, here.”
“Holes, Nightcrawler and Lucky Number Slevin are also leaving and are all worth a viewing.”
“And finally, toward the end of the month, the one truly good Pirates of the Caribbean---The Curse of the Black Pearl---will set sail never to be seen on Netflix again.”
“(Soon, all Disney content will be gone from Netflix as it migrates to Disney's own subscription service.)”


...what s coming to Netflix in December and what to watch here...
...for Wimps season one America s Funniest Home Videos New Collection D Nincompoop Nation Jeff Dunham Arguing with Myself 2006 December 19th Dance Academy 3 Seasons December 20th Che Two parts December 24th Amores Perros 2000 December 25th Pirates of the Caribbean The Curse of the Black Pearl 2003 See...
If you're in the middle of It's Always Sunny In Philadelphia you'll definitely want to binge faster.
Every season of that show is leaving Netflix next month.
The Man From Snow River, an excellent Australian film with some of the best horse-riding cinematography out there, is also riding off into the sunset (we just watched this and the kids loved it.
I watched it as a kid many times.)
See what's coming to Netflix in December, and what to watch, here.
Holes, Nightcrawler and Lucky Number Slevin are also leaving and are all worth a viewing.
And finally, toward the end of the month, the one truly good Pirates of the Caribbean---The Curse of the Black Pearl---will set sail never to be seen on Netflix again.
(Soon, all Disney content will be gone from Netflix as it migrates to Disney's own subscription service.)



Number  121
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Serenading the crowd with Flo Rida’s classic “Apple Bottom Jeans,” Efron did a little dance before effortlessly making his body perpendicular to the pole.”
“Taking the bait, Efron approached the pole — this time with his shirt on — and asked for some music to get himself in the mood.”
“...give Efron an opportunity to show off...”
“When Norton asked Efron if the picture had been photoshopped fellow exercise enthusiast Cruise said No he s doing it From Coinage See Where 6 Stars Were Before They Were Famous Just in case there was any doubt the talk show host made sure to have a pole onset to...”
“Efron was goaded into the exhibition after Norton showed the audience a photo of the oft-shirtless actor turning himself into a human flag, using a parking meter as a pole.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Seated alongside Tom Cruise and his The Mummy costar Annabelle Wallis, the Baywatch star showed off his impressive core strength with the help of a stripper pole.”
“Okay, Channing Tatum says a third film isn’t happening — but if it was, Efron would be a shoe-in after his recent visit to the U.K.’s The Graham Norton Show.”
“Zac Efron has just submitted his unofficial audition tape for Magic Mike 3.”
“The Baywatch star showed off his impressive pole dancing skills alongside Tom Cruise on The Graham Norton Show.”


Serenading the crowd with Flo Rida’s classic “Apple Bottom Jeans,” Efron did a little dance before effortlessly making his body perpendicular to the pole.
Taking the bait, Efron approached the pole — this time with his shirt on — and asked for some music to get himself in the mood.
...give Efron an opportunity to show off...
When Norton asked Efron if the picture had been photoshopped fellow exercise enthusiast Cruise said No he s doing it From Coinage See Where 6 Stars Were Before They Were Famous Just in case there was any doubt the talk show host made sure to have a pole onset to...
Efron was goaded into the exhibition after Norton showed the audience a photo of the oft-shirtless actor turning himself into a human flag, using a parking meter as a pole.
Get push notifications with news, features and more.
Seated alongside Tom Cruise and his The Mummy costar Annabelle Wallis, the Baywatch star showed off his impressive core strength with the help of a stripper pole.
Okay, Channing Tatum says a third film isn’t happening — but if it was, Efron would be a shoe-in after his recent visit to the U.K.’s The Graham Norton Show.
Zac Efron has just submitted his unofficial audition tape for Magic Mike 3.
The Baywatch star showed off his impressive pole dancing skills alongside Tom Cruise on The Graham Norton Show.



Number  122
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Season 3 is slated to begin this Sunday at 10:30 p.m. with undoubtedly more scenes for Rae's mom to frown at.”
“As for her critically-acclaimed HBO series Insecure, Rae told Colbert her mom stopped watching after a few racy scenes in season 2.”
“But even she gets a little tongue-tied in front of Rihanna.”
“On The Late Show with Stephen Colbert, Rae explained she ran into Riri at the Met Gala.”
“Although the two have already met, it didn't stop Rae from getting a bit flustered.”
“"I just saw her sitting at the table and I had had a few drinks," explained Rae around the 1:50 mark above.”
“"So I was like 'Rihanna's over there, let me go say hi, she knows me, we homegirls.'”
“And I went up to her and I was like, you know, tapped her.”
“And she was so friendly and nice, I wasn't expecting that, and she was like 'Hey girl, good to see you!'”
“And I was like 'Uh...oh...we're, uh...' and just excused myself and walked away.”


Season 3 is slated to begin this Sunday at 10:30 p.m. with undoubtedly more scenes for Rae's mom to frown at.
As for her critically-acclaimed HBO series Insecure, Rae told Colbert her mom stopped watching after a few racy scenes in season 2.
But even she gets a little tongue-tied in front of Rihanna.
On The Late Show with Stephen Colbert, Rae explained she ran into Riri at the Met Gala.
Although the two have already met, it didn't stop Rae from getting a bit flustered.
"I just saw her sitting at the table and I had had a few drinks," explained Rae around the 1:50 mark above.
"So I was like 'Rihanna's over there, let me go say hi, she knows me, we homegirls.'
And I went up to her and I was like, you know, tapped her.
And she was so friendly and nice, I wasn't expecting that, and she was like 'Hey girl, good to see you!'
And I was like 'Uh...oh...we're, uh...' and just excused myself and walked away.



Number  123
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The judge is fully informed on bothsides of the story and will be making the final decision.””
“On the few days that I have the children Aryn has insisted that my time with the children be limited during the week to approximately two and a half hours per day despite my requests for more time including overnights with the children Drake Lee also cites a July 18”
“In court documents filed on Friday, August 11, and obtained by Us Weekly, the real estate broker claims that she is responsible for the day-to-day care of the kids because of the Grey’s Anatomy star’s busy schedule.”
““Jesse would ‘join in’ when he was available and home, but he rarely took care of the children without my or [the nanny] Martiza’s help and presence,” the documents say.”
““Jesse became distant, secretive and was home less and less, traveling for unexplained reasons while telling the kids, ‘Daddy is at work.’ We tried marriage counseling in the fall of 2016, but were unsuccessful.”
“Jesse eventually moved out at the end of March 2017 Drake Lee claims in the documents that her partner of 13 years has not recognized and prioritized the children s schedule over his own and their need to maintain it daily even on weekends whether or not a parent is...”
“...working She also claims that her ex does not make the children s school pick up and drop off a priority and tries to make the nanny drive the kids although that s not what she was hired to do...”
“Drake-Lee alleges that she’s concerned about what the 36-year-old actor defines as business.”
““His ‘work’ has allegedly included, so far, trips to Paris, New York, Florida and within California, and activities including giving a graduation speech, attending an awards show, attending a celebrity soccer game in Miami, or doing something undisclosed,” the documents say.”
“However, in previous court documents Williams has claimed that Drake-Lee has declined his requests to spend more time with the children.”


The judge is fully informed on bothsides of the story and will be making the final decision.”
On the few days that I have the children Aryn has insisted that my time with the children be limited during the week to approximately two and a half hours per day despite my requests for more time including overnights with the children Drake Lee also cites a July 18
In court documents filed on Friday, August 11, and obtained by Us Weekly, the real estate broker claims that she is responsible for the day-to-day care of the kids because of the Grey’s Anatomy star’s busy schedule.
“Jesse would ‘join in’ when he was available and home, but he rarely took care of the children without my or [the nanny] Martiza’s help and presence,” the documents say.
“Jesse became distant, secretive and was home less and less, traveling for unexplained reasons while telling the kids, ‘Daddy is at work.’ We tried marriage counseling in the fall of 2016, but were unsuccessful.
Jesse eventually moved out at the end of March 2017 Drake Lee claims in the documents that her partner of 13 years has not recognized and prioritized the children s schedule over his own and their need to maintain it daily even on weekends whether or not a parent is...
...working She also claims that her ex does not make the children s school pick up and drop off a priority and tries to make the nanny drive the kids although that s not what she was hired to do...
Drake-Lee alleges that she’s concerned about what the 36-year-old actor defines as business.
“His ‘work’ has allegedly included, so far, trips to Paris, New York, Florida and within California, and activities including giving a graduation speech, attending an awards show, attending a celebrity soccer game in Miami, or doing something undisclosed,” the documents say.
However, in previous court documents Williams has claimed that Drake-Lee has declined his requests to spend more time with the children.



Number  124
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It was not ever an issue.”
“And he was like, “Oh, she’s REALLY pregnant!” But he’d been watching the dailies and everything was coming in fine.”
“When plans for this movie got underway, did you even know you’d be pregnant?”
“Did you know that filming would coincide with the end of your pregnancy?”
“Okay, so talk me through that timeline.”
“Our last day of production was July 1 and I gave birth to Nicholas on July 29.”
“Not even!”
“I read that you gave birth something like a month after you finished shooting.”
“AdvertisementScanlon spoke with ThinkProgress about disclosing her pregnancy to the Netflix powers-that-be (easier than you might expect), hiring so many women behind the scenes (also easier than you might expect), and casting people of color as leads, supporting characters, and extras (harder than you’d think).”
“Which would be an exciting feat no matter what but is an especially impressive one when you learns he shot Set it Up while she was eight months pregnant.”


It was not ever an issue.
And he was like, “Oh, she’s REALLY pregnant!” But he’d been watching the dailies and everything was coming in fine.
When plans for this movie got underway, did you even know you’d be pregnant?
Did you know that filming would coincide with the end of your pregnancy?
Okay, so talk me through that timeline.
Our last day of production was July 1 and I gave birth to Nicholas on July 29.
Not even!
I read that you gave birth something like a month after you finished shooting.
AdvertisementScanlon spoke with ThinkProgress about disclosing her pregnancy to the Netflix powers-that-be (easier than you might expect), hiring so many women behind the scenes (also easier than you might expect), and casting people of color as leads, supporting characters, and extras (harder than you’d think).
Which would be an exciting feat no matter what but is an especially impressive one when you learns he shot Set it Up while she was eight months pregnant.



Number  125
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The reality star, who gave birth to son Saint in November, poured her post-pregnancy body into the plunging black number that she paired with fish net tights and towering heels.”
“Wearing the same ensemble she was snapped in for her Instagram shot, the star paid a visit to a cosmetic dermatology clinic in her daringly low cut dress that revealed her cleavage and the top of a lacy bra.”
“...adjust the hem of the midi length dress narrowly avoiding a wardrobe malfunction Kim marked her social media milestone by heading out and about on Thursday in a revealing outfit...”
“Dressed to the nines The reality star who gave birth to son Saint in November poured her post pregnancy body into the plunging black number that she paired with fish net tights and towering heels Busting out She flashed a look at her ample cleavage as she lent over to...”
“This week it was revealed that the 23-year-old passed her best pal Taylor Swift to become the most followed person on the site with a current tally of 70million, while Taylor is at 69.6million.”
“While Kim's follower count has climbed to 64million, she's still a fair way off reaching the new reigning queen of Instagram - Selena Gomez.”
“#64mil.'”
“I love you guys...”
“See Kim Kardashian updates as she celebrates 64m Instagram followers with sultry selfie One hot mama Kim headed to an appoitment in Beverly Hills on Thursday busting out of her very low cut dress The mum of two captioned the shot with a message of gratitude for her fans writing...”
“The star is wearing an off-the-shoulder black number, flashing her bra straps, while she accessorises with a black choker.”


The reality star, who gave birth to son Saint in November, poured her post-pregnancy body into the plunging black number that she paired with fish net tights and towering heels.
Wearing the same ensemble she was snapped in for her Instagram shot, the star paid a visit to a cosmetic dermatology clinic in her daringly low cut dress that revealed her cleavage and the top of a lacy bra.
...adjust the hem of the midi length dress narrowly avoiding a wardrobe malfunction Kim marked her social media milestone by heading out and about on Thursday in a revealing outfit...
Dressed to the nines The reality star who gave birth to son Saint in November poured her post pregnancy body into the plunging black number that she paired with fish net tights and towering heels Busting out She flashed a look at her ample cleavage as she lent over to...
This week it was revealed that the 23-year-old passed her best pal Taylor Swift to become the most followed person on the site with a current tally of 70million, while Taylor is at 69.6million.
While Kim's follower count has climbed to 64million, she's still a fair way off reaching the new reigning queen of Instagram - Selena Gomez.
#64mil.'
I love you guys...
See Kim Kardashian updates as she celebrates 64m Instagram followers with sultry selfie One hot mama Kim headed to an appoitment in Beverly Hills on Thursday busting out of her very low cut dress The mum of two captioned the shot with a message of gratitude for her fans writing...
The star is wearing an off-the-shoulder black number, flashing her bra straps, while she accessorises with a black choker.



Number  126
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I’m sure she’s going to build a beautiful house with all her pigs and dogs and she’ll turn it into something magical.””
““She’s like the phoenix.”
““She is such a positive person,” Ronson told the U.K. website.”
“Since recording the track, Cyrus lost the Malibu home she shared with her fiancé, Liam Hemsworth, in the devastating wildfires that swept through Southern California earlier this month.”
“Then a few months ago, I sent a little idea for the chorus of this song and she wrote right back,” the “Uptown Funk” producer recently told Official Charts.”
““I had my manager reach out to her, but we never hooked up.”
“The Hannah Montana alum and Ronson, 43, are set to perform the tune, which will appear on his upcoming fifth album, during the December 15 episode of Saturday Night Live.”
“This is the first time that Cyrus, 26, has dropped new music since her 2017 album, Younger Now, which featured the hit single “Malibu.” She started teasing “Nothing Breaks Like a Heart” on social media on Monday, November 26, and continued to share video clips leading up to the release.”
“The pop star and Mark Ronson released their new single and music video, “Nothing Breaks Like a Heart,” on Thursday, November 29.”
“Miley Cyrus is back with another banger!”


I’m sure she’s going to build a beautiful house with all her pigs and dogs and she’ll turn it into something magical.”
“She’s like the phoenix.
“She is such a positive person,” Ronson told the U.K. website.
Since recording the track, Cyrus lost the Malibu home she shared with her fiancé, Liam Hemsworth, in the devastating wildfires that swept through Southern California earlier this month.
Then a few months ago, I sent a little idea for the chorus of this song and she wrote right back,” the “Uptown Funk” producer recently told Official Charts.
“I had my manager reach out to her, but we never hooked up.
The Hannah Montana alum and Ronson, 43, are set to perform the tune, which will appear on his upcoming fifth album, during the December 15 episode of Saturday Night Live.
This is the first time that Cyrus, 26, has dropped new music since her 2017 album, Younger Now, which featured the hit single “Malibu.” She started teasing “Nothing Breaks Like a Heart” on social media on Monday, November 26, and continued to share video clips leading up to the release.
The pop star and Mark Ronson released their new single and music video, “Nothing Breaks Like a Heart,” on Thursday, November 29.
Miley Cyrus is back with another banger!



Number  127
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She was excited to spend time with her fans.””
““Not that I even need anything, but I always like to see what stores have in different countries, or if there are special pieces.”As she browses the racks and picks out matching purses for her and daughter North West, 3, her friends begin to notice her unease.”
“ET) on E!”
“The trauma from Kim Kardashian West‘s Paris robbery is still lingering.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In the clip, first shared by E!”
“News, Kardashian West is in the midst of a shopping trip with her friends and crew when an overwhelming crowd of fans and photographers begins to form at the entrance to the store.”
““Honestly, I haven’t been shopping in months,” she says.”
““Are you nervous about that crowd?” asks hairstylist Jen Atkin.”
““She was nervous before she left, but says it was the right decision.”


She was excited to spend time with her fans.”
“Not that I even need anything, but I always like to see what stores have in different countries, or if there are special pieces.”As she browses the racks and picks out matching purses for her and daughter North West, 3, her friends begin to notice her unease.
ET) on E!
The trauma from Kim Kardashian West‘s Paris robbery is still lingering.
Get push notifications with news, features and more.
In the clip, first shared by E!
News, Kardashian West is in the midst of a shopping trip with her friends and crew when an overwhelming crowd of fans and photographers begins to form at the entrance to the store.
“Honestly, I haven’t been shopping in months,” she says.
“Are you nervous about that crowd?” asks hairstylist Jen Atkin.
“She was nervous before she left, but says it was the right decision.



Number  128
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Contributing: The Associated Press...”
“Kate Spade New York announced plans to donate $1 million to support suicide prevention and mental health awareness causes.”
“Hundreds of mourners gathered at Our Lady of Perpetual Help Parish Redemptorist Church, with many clutching their Kate Spade bags in tribute, according to the Kansas City Star.”
“Tragically, Spade's father, Earl F. Brosnahan, Jr. died Wednesday night at the age of 89.”
“A family spokesman said he had been "in failing health of late and was heartbroken over the recent death of his beloved daughter."”
“Actress Rachel Brosnahan, his granddaughter, paid tribute to him in an Instagram post late Thursday that also mentioned Spade.”
“"He was a man of few words, but when he spoke a whole room leaned in.”
“He was tough as nails but gentle as can be, stubborn as a mule, and had a wicked sense of humor," she wrote.”
“"He will be deeply, deeply missed.”
“I’d like to think that he and Katy are out there somewhere singing an off key rendition of 'Danny Boy' and sharing a pint."”


Contributing: The Associated Press...
Kate Spade New York announced plans to donate $1 million to support suicide prevention and mental health awareness causes.
Hundreds of mourners gathered at Our Lady of Perpetual Help Parish Redemptorist Church, with many clutching their Kate Spade bags in tribute, according to the Kansas City Star.
Tragically, Spade's father, Earl F. Brosnahan, Jr. died Wednesday night at the age of 89.
A family spokesman said he had been "in failing health of late and was heartbroken over the recent death of his beloved daughter."
Actress Rachel Brosnahan, his granddaughter, paid tribute to him in an Instagram post late Thursday that also mentioned Spade.
"He was a man of few words, but when he spoke a whole room leaned in.
He was tough as nails but gentle as can be, stubborn as a mule, and had a wicked sense of humor," she wrote.
"He will be deeply, deeply missed.
I’d like to think that he and Katy are out there somewhere singing an off key rendition of 'Danny Boy' and sharing a pint."



**Something goes wrong**
“Check out her morning routine, steal her smoothie recipe or get inspired by how she overcame this major health crisis.”
“...makeup routine is best described as minimal...”
“The ones that you’ve spent entire brunches/text threads/email chains telling your friends about?”
“They’re the best of the best…so amazing that you’d never risk putting them in a piece of checked luggage.”
“At Well+Good, we call those our Beauty VIPs (you know, Very Important Products).”
“In this series, we ask women in wellness and the public eye what beauty products they use every single day and why—with an entire Internet of options to choose from—these items stand out.”
“Would it surprise you to learn that Julianne Hough swears by essentially the same beauty routine you did as a teenager?”
“This is more or less what I discover while grilling the newly minted redhead for all the deets surrounding her forever-flawless face, which always seems to be gracing either the stage or screen.”
“To get that glow, the down-to-earth Hough relies heavily upon a teen-beloved skincare line (more on that below), drugstore makeup, and something my mom always nagged me about when I was younger: hydration.”
““Most people aren’t well hydrated, and drinking regular water isn’t enough,” she tells me from a Propel event in Los Angeles.”


Check out her morning routine, steal her smoothie recipe or get inspired by how she overcame this major health crisis.
...makeup routine is best described as minimal...
The ones that you’ve spent entire brunches/text threads/email chains telling your friends about?
They’re the best of the best…so amazing that you’d never risk putting them in a piece of checked luggage.
At Well+Good, we call those our Beauty VIPs (you know, Very Important Products).
In this series, we ask women in wellness and the public eye what beauty products they use every single day and why—with an entire Internet of options to choose from—these items stand out.
Would it surprise you to learn that Julianne Hough swears by essentially the same beauty routine you did as a teenager?
This is more or less what I discover while grilling the newly minted redhead for all the deets surrounding her forever-flawless face, which always seems to be gracing either the stage or screen.
To get that glow, the down-to-earth Hough relies heavily upon a teen-beloved skincare line (more on that below), drugstore makeup, and something my mom always nagged me about when I was younger: hydration.
“Most people aren’t well hydrated, and drinking regular water isn’t enough,” she tells me from a Propel event in Los Angeles.



Number  130
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“Instagram StoriesBut Warner Bros. Television released a statement to ET, direct addressing some of those claims.”
“After Riverdale lead KJ Apa was involved in a car crash last Thursday, fans were concerned for the actor’s safety.”
“But his close-knit co-stars have taken to social media to reassure the CW show’s stans that Apa, 20, is doing just fine.”
“Instagram Stories RELATED Riverdale Star KJ Apa Crashes Car After 14 Hour Work Day Studio Issues Statement Camila Mendes who plays Veronica Lodge posted a photo of Apa lying on the ground looking at his phone to Instagram Stories late Thursday night writing kjapa u good And Cole Sprouse who...”
“...plays Archie s bestie Jughead Jones also shared a close up shot of Apa s face...”
“The red-headed actor appeared to be in costume, rocking Jugheads signature hat, as the cast films season two.”
“Apa himself posted to Instagram Stories on Thursday from the set, filming his co-star Martin Cummins, who plays Sheriff Keller, at the police station.”
“Apa’s car accident happened last week in Vancouver, Canada, where the show is filmed.”
“The Hollywood Reporter said that Apa had fallen asleep behind the wheel after working a 16-hour day and was then taken the hospital for his injuries in the crash.”


Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...
Instagram StoriesBut Warner Bros. Television released a statement to ET, direct addressing some of those claims.
After Riverdale lead KJ Apa was involved in a car crash last Thursday, fans were concerned for the actor’s safety.
But his close-knit co-stars have taken to social media to reassure the CW show’s stans that Apa, 20, is doing just fine.
Instagram Stories RELATED Riverdale Star KJ Apa Crashes Car After 14 Hour Work Day Studio Issues Statement Camila Mendes who plays Veronica Lodge posted a photo of Apa lying on the ground looking at his phone to Instagram Stories late Thursday night writing kjapa u good And Cole Sprouse who...
...plays Archie s bestie Jughead Jones also shared a close up shot of Apa s face...
The red-headed actor appeared to be in costume, rocking Jugheads signature hat, as the cast films season two.
Apa himself posted to Instagram Stories on Thursday from the set, filming his co-star Martin Cummins, who plays Sheriff Keller, at the police station.
Apa’s car accident happened last week in Vancouver, Canada, where the show is filmed.
The Hollywood Reporter said that Apa had fallen asleep behind the wheel after working a 16-hour day and was then taken the hospital for his injuries in the crash.



Number  131
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Anyway, I was really proud of the ring and thought it was so beautiful that I asked if I could keep one and they said I could.””
““The costume designer saw that I had one which my mom had given me, and she was like, ‘Can I design one for Belle?’ because Belle’s mother dies when she’s really young,” Watson told the outlet.”
“‘GAME OF THRONES’ DIRECTOR SPEAKS OUT ABOUT ED SHEERAN’S CAMEO IN SEASON PREMIEREWatson said her mother’s ring helped inspire jewelry she wore in the Disney live-action film "Beauty and the Beast," according to Buzzfeed.”
“The actress also included a picture of the rings including a close-up of her mother’s ring.”
“I wear this ring everyday, it is my most meaningful and special possession.”Watson then wrote that if anyone has any information to email: findthering@outlook.com.”
““She bought it the day after I was born and wore it for 18 years, never taking it off, and then gave it to me for my 18th birthday.”
“BEN AFFLECK’S MALE KISSING SCENE MADE HIM A ‘SERIOUS ACTOR,’ KEVIN SMITH SAYS“Were these just any rings I could accept this, but one of them was gift from my Mum,” the 27-year-old wrote.”
“Watson called the spa and was told the jewelry was not in the locker.”
“Watson said she took them off before her appointment but forgot to retrieve them afterward.”
“London on Sunday...”


“Anyway, I was really proud of the ring and thought it was so beautiful that I asked if I could keep one and they said I could.”
“The costume designer saw that I had one which my mom had given me, and she was like, ‘Can I design one for Belle?’ because Belle’s mother dies when she’s really young,” Watson told the outlet.
‘GAME OF THRONES’ DIRECTOR SPEAKS OUT ABOUT ED SHEERAN’S CAMEO IN SEASON PREMIEREWatson said her mother’s ring helped inspire jewelry she wore in the Disney live-action film "Beauty and the Beast," according to Buzzfeed.
The actress also included a picture of the rings including a close-up of her mother’s ring.
I wear this ring everyday, it is my most meaningful and special possession.”Watson then wrote that if anyone has any information to email: findthering@outlook.com.
“She bought it the day after I was born and wore it for 18 years, never taking it off, and then gave it to me for my 18th birthday.
BEN AFFLECK’S MALE KISSING SCENE MADE HIM A ‘SERIOUS ACTOR,’ KEVIN SMITH SAYS“Were these just any rings I could accept this, but one of them was gift from my Mum,” the 27-year-old wrote.
Watson called the spa and was told the jewelry was not in the locker.
Watson said she took them off before her appointment but forgot to retrieve them afterward.
London on Sunday...



Number  132
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Although the split has been painful for Wilkinson, she’s been embracing the new chapter that she’s found herself in: the single life.”
“We are both amazing parents and our kids will be happy n never know the difference other than seeing mama smile,” she continued.”
“The reality star and former NFL player have settled the details of their divorce, according to The Blast.”
“The new filing includes details about custody, support and property and has been submitted for approval to the judge.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Earlier this month, Wilkinson, 33, gave an update on the status of their split, saying she signed her “last divorce paper.”“Signed my last divorce paper Friday.”
“Brutal,” she tweeted Oct. 15.”
““I gave it all I got.”
“Truly did.”
“I’m beyond proud of myself!!”


Although the split has been painful for Wilkinson, she’s been embracing the new chapter that she’s found herself in: the single life.
We are both amazing parents and our kids will be happy n never know the difference other than seeing mama smile,” she continued.
The reality star and former NFL player have settled the details of their divorce, according to The Blast.
The new filing includes details about custody, support and property and has been submitted for approval to the judge.
Get push notifications with news, features and more.
Earlier this month, Wilkinson, 33, gave an update on the status of their split, saying she signed her “last divorce paper.”“Signed my last divorce paper Friday.
Brutal,” she tweeted Oct. 15.
“I gave it all I got.
Truly did.
I’m beyond proud of myself!!



Number  133
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But something was wrong at the airport, or it was just Los Angeles being Los Angeles, and the bus didn’t move.”
“I finished my waters and headed to the airport, where I dropped my rental car and boarded the Hertz bus.”
“I became buoyant with hope.”
“I sat on a bench as I drank them.”
“I had a long trip home ahead of me, and now I was someone who said “self-care.”I walked down to the beach with my waters.”
“It started now.”
“Wellness.”
“Self-care.”
“I thought, for maybe the first time in my life, that work could wait.”
“I still had a bottle of Madame Dry Rose Water, which is “botanically infused, positively charged” water that is filtered through rose-quartz crystals, and a bottle of Lifewtr, which is just water without vowels.”


But something was wrong at the airport, or it was just Los Angeles being Los Angeles, and the bus didn’t move.
I finished my waters and headed to the airport, where I dropped my rental car and boarded the Hertz bus.
I became buoyant with hope.
I sat on a bench as I drank them.
I had a long trip home ahead of me, and now I was someone who said “self-care.”I walked down to the beach with my waters.
It started now.
Wellness.
Self-care.
I thought, for maybe the first time in my life, that work could wait.
I still had a bottle of Madame Dry Rose Water, which is “botanically infused, positively charged” water that is filtered through rose-quartz crystals, and a bottle of Lifewtr, which is just water without vowels.



Number  134
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Moving on: Last week, Dewan returned to social media having dropped Tatum from her name and without her wedding band posing in lingerie photos...”
“Last week, Dewan returned to social media having dropped Tatum from her name and without her wedding band.”
“And on Sunday Channing Tatum made his first public appearance since the separation at the Honda Indy Grand Prix in Birmingham, Alabama.”
“The actor who has ditched his wedding ring was hanging out at the race track with The Bachelor s Arie Luyendyk Jr Scroll down for video Hanging out Channing Tatum made his first public appearance since his split from Jenna Dewan at the Honda Indy Grand Prix in Alabama Sunday...”
“...with The Bachelor s Arie Luyendyk Jr Tatum served as grand marshal for the event and took a spin with Luyendyk in the official pace car that led the field to the start...”
“'Such a great dude!'”
“Luyendyk Jr., 36, said of the actor, 37, as he posted pics of them in their matching red and black Honda racing suits to his Instagram.”
“Tatum also posted several snaps to his Instagram, returning to the platform for the first time since his marriage breakup.”
“'Crazy fast couple laps in the rain!!”
“Thanks @ariejr!'”


Moving on: Last week, Dewan returned to social media having dropped Tatum from her name and without her wedding band posing in lingerie photos...
Last week, Dewan returned to social media having dropped Tatum from her name and without her wedding band.
And on Sunday Channing Tatum made his first public appearance since the separation at the Honda Indy Grand Prix in Birmingham, Alabama.
The actor who has ditched his wedding ring was hanging out at the race track with The Bachelor s Arie Luyendyk Jr Scroll down for video Hanging out Channing Tatum made his first public appearance since his split from Jenna Dewan at the Honda Indy Grand Prix in Alabama Sunday...
...with The Bachelor s Arie Luyendyk Jr Tatum served as grand marshal for the event and took a spin with Luyendyk in the official pace car that led the field to the start...
'Such a great dude!'
Luyendyk Jr., 36, said of the actor, 37, as he posted pics of them in their matching red and black Honda racing suits to his Instagram.
Tatum also posted several snaps to his Instagram, returning to the platform for the first time since his marriage breakup.
'Crazy fast couple laps in the rain!!
Thanks @ariejr!'



Number  135
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'Little road trip today....' Mrs. Jay Cutler wrote in her caption, chucking in the hashtags: '#DetoxWeekend #WhyDoWeDoThisToOurselves #JustGiveMeAMargarita'.”
“'I've talked to her since she's had the baby and she sounds like she's just loving life.'”
“More: The beauty also posed in these open-toe, lace-up bootsKristin says having kids is a lot of work because her sons are so rambunctious.”
“As far as Heidi, who is married to Spencer Pratt, she said: 'I put together a little list of different products and toys that I've loved and sent that over to her.'”
“But I did tell Audrina that both my boys will be in school in the fall, so when I bring Saylor out, I would love to make that happen.'”
“It's just so hard because we're in Nashville and everyone's out there.”
“'Audrina and I talked about getting the kids together.”
“The ladies: (L to R) Whitney Port, Lauren Contad, Audrina Patridge and Heidi MontagShe added they want to meet up.”
“'When Audrina was pregnant, she reached out a lot and asked me some questions, like what pregnancy jeans I liked, and that kind of stuff,' said Kristin.”
“'They get very violent with each other...I think just right now, that's the hardest part.”


'Little road trip today....' Mrs. Jay Cutler wrote in her caption, chucking in the hashtags: '#DetoxWeekend #WhyDoWeDoThisToOurselves #JustGiveMeAMargarita'.
'I've talked to her since she's had the baby and she sounds like she's just loving life.'
More: The beauty also posed in these open-toe, lace-up bootsKristin says having kids is a lot of work because her sons are so rambunctious.
As far as Heidi, who is married to Spencer Pratt, she said: 'I put together a little list of different products and toys that I've loved and sent that over to her.'
But I did tell Audrina that both my boys will be in school in the fall, so when I bring Saylor out, I would love to make that happen.'
It's just so hard because we're in Nashville and everyone's out there.
'Audrina and I talked about getting the kids together.
The ladies: (L to R) Whitney Port, Lauren Contad, Audrina Patridge and Heidi MontagShe added they want to meet up.
'When Audrina was pregnant, she reached out a lot and asked me some questions, like what pregnancy jeans I liked, and that kind of stuff,' said Kristin.
'They get very violent with each other...I think just right now, that's the hardest part.



Number  136
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...beaches in British Columbia Canada and Washington state in the last decade...”
“Oh wow death said Spencer 47 while Kruger 41 responded Just the bones Cranston 61 added some humor by joking And she uses it as a doorstop Oddly finding a severed food is not as unusual as it sounds with more than a dozen detached human feet washing up on...”
““I once found — and no one guessed that this was me — I found a human foot on the beach in Nicaragua,” she said much to the surprise of the others, later adding, “Just a little souvenir.”Robbie visited Nicaragua in 2014.”
“Everyone has a story.”Image zoom Credit: Dave So what’s the Australian actress’ story?”
““It just reminds you there are fascinating stories everywhere.”
““I recently did a film, and the director asked if everyone could write down the craziest thing that has happened to them in their lives,” Robbie said when she was asked about the most interesting people she’s met on the job.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Margot Robbie once found a severed human foot at a beach – no big deal.”


...beaches in British Columbia Canada and Washington state in the last decade...
Oh wow death said Spencer 47 while Kruger 41 responded Just the bones Cranston 61 added some humor by joking And she uses it as a doorstop Oddly finding a severed food is not as unusual as it sounds with more than a dozen detached human feet washing up on...
“I once found — and no one guessed that this was me — I found a human foot on the beach in Nicaragua,” she said much to the surprise of the others, later adding, “Just a little souvenir.”Robbie visited Nicaragua in 2014.
Everyone has a story.”Image zoom Credit: Dave So what’s the Australian actress’ story?
“It just reminds you there are fascinating stories everywhere.
“I recently did a film, and the director asked if everyone could write down the craziest thing that has happened to them in their lives,” Robbie said when she was asked about the most interesting people she’s met on the job.
Get push notifications with news, features and more.
Margot Robbie once found a severed human foot at a beach – no big deal.



Number  137
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If you’re not a celebrity, vote on which celebrity tell-all books you would want to read.”
“We’re putting all of these unwritten celebrity tell-alls on our Christmas list – if you’re a celebrity and you’re reading this, close your computer, pick up the pen, and get to work!”
“Put on your reading glasses and crack open this list of celebrities who NEED to write a tell-all.”
“The stories trapped inside the minds of the famous people on this are the larger-than-life ones we definitely want to read.”
“The best chance you have to get to know anyone is through either having a one-on-one conversation or by reading their tell-all book, should they be so nice as to write one.”
“The inner workings of the human mind are a mystery, and there are tons of celebrities who should write a tell-all so we can have a little peek inside.”


If you’re not a celebrity, vote on which celebrity tell-all books you would want to read.
We’re putting all of these unwritten celebrity tell-alls on our Christmas list – if you’re a celebrity and you’re reading this, close your computer, pick up the pen, and get to work!
Put on your reading glasses and crack open this list of celebrities who NEED to write a tell-all.
The stories trapped inside the minds of the famous people on this are the larger-than-life ones we definitely want to read.
The best chance you have to get to know anyone is through either having a one-on-one conversation or by reading their tell-all book, should they be so nice as to write one.
The inner workings of the human mind are a mystery, and there are tons of celebrities who should write a tell-all so we can have a little peek inside.



**Something goes wrong**
“People are still taking color sides in that photo today.”
“LIKE ITS GREY AND LIGHT BLUE/TEAL LIKE WTFF,” another user said.”
“The internet is reeling over the color of a sneaker after Twitter user @TFILDOLANS posted a photo of the shoe that appear gray with teal accents to some people, while others see pink with white accents.”
“The user wrote in the tweet on Wednesday: “What colour is this,” igniting a lengthy debate that amounted to thousands of people chipping in their input.”
“Many people are perplexed on what color the shoe is actually supposed to be.”
““So is it actually grey and teal or pink and white[?”
“]” one user asked.”
““PEOPLE R SAYING ITS PINK N WHITE???”
“One person got a little confrontational, too, writing, “ITS [sic] PINK & WHITE FIGHT ME.”The user later admitted she didn’t own the sneaker.”
“Come back & you might see the colors change.”The photo resurrected the color debate that overtook the internet in 2015 with “the dress.” That controversial picture, which was posted on Tumblr, appeared black and blue to some people, but white and gold to others.”


People are still taking color sides in that photo today.
LIKE ITS GREY AND LIGHT BLUE/TEAL LIKE WTFF,” another user said.
The internet is reeling over the color of a sneaker after Twitter user @TFILDOLANS posted a photo of the shoe that appear gray with teal accents to some people, while others see pink with white accents.
The user wrote in the tweet on Wednesday: “What colour is this,” igniting a lengthy debate that amounted to thousands of people chipping in their input.
Many people are perplexed on what color the shoe is actually supposed to be.
“So is it actually grey and teal or pink and white[?
]” one user asked.
“PEOPLE R SAYING ITS PINK N WHITE???
One person got a little confrontational, too, writing, “ITS [sic] PINK & WHITE FIGHT ME.”The user later admitted she didn’t own the sneaker.
Come back & you might see the colors change.”The photo resurrected the color debate that overtook the internet in 2015 with “the dress.” That controversial picture, which was posted on Tumblr, appeared black and blue to some people, but white and gold to others.



Number  139
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to Us Weekly’s YouTube Page.”
“ET.”
“Things are returning to normal.”Dancing With the Stars airs on ABC Mondays at 8 p.m.”
“It’s water under the bridge.”
“Things are good.”
“...on Monday October 9 saying They have already rehearsed this week...”
“They refuse to give into one another before adding They re playing nice for the cameras but both are miserable paired with each other there is a lot of fighting going on behind the scenes However an insider exclusively told Us the pair will appear on the upcoming DWTS episode...”
“We are both looking forward to dancing for our fans next week!”As Us Weekly exclusively revealed, the DWTS fan favorite and Lachey’s partnership was “not going well.”A source told Us, “Their personalities are very similar so they disagree about everything.”
“I take full responsibility for my absence and want to apologize to my partner Vanessa.”
“He later apologized to the former Total Request Live cohost, 36, on Wednesday, October 4, with a tweet that said, “As you are all aware, I had to leave the show last week to take care of some personal issues.”


For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to Us Weekly’s YouTube Page.
ET.
Things are returning to normal.”Dancing With the Stars airs on ABC Mondays at 8 p.m.
It’s water under the bridge.
Things are good.
...on Monday October 9 saying They have already rehearsed this week...
They refuse to give into one another before adding They re playing nice for the cameras but both are miserable paired with each other there is a lot of fighting going on behind the scenes However an insider exclusively told Us the pair will appear on the upcoming DWTS episode...
We are both looking forward to dancing for our fans next week!”As Us Weekly exclusively revealed, the DWTS fan favorite and Lachey’s partnership was “not going well.”A source told Us, “Their personalities are very similar so they disagree about everything.
I take full responsibility for my absence and want to apologize to my partner Vanessa.
He later apologized to the former Total Request Live cohost, 36, on Wednesday, October 4, with a tweet that said, “As you are all aware, I had to leave the show last week to take care of some personal issues.



Number  140
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I needed to see where I was in my head and it’s a beautiful thing because I just feel better.”Reporting by Brody Brown...”
““It was rough, but it was a necessary thing to do,” Portwood told Us.”
“The final straw was when Baier, a recovered drug addict, offered Teen Mom OG cast member Catelynn Lowell a Xanax during the show’s press day in NYC.”
“I feel like it’s a new chapter of my life.”Portwood and Baier officially ended their relationship in August two months after calling off their wedding.”
“”We’re both very happy.”
“Having a new baby is new likes, new wants, new needs, so it’s very nerve-racking,” Portwood exclusively told Us earlier this month.”
“I don’t know what to expect.”
““When I first found out I was a little scared.”
“(Portwood is already mom to 9-year-old daughter Leah with ex Gary Shirley).”
“Portwood, meanwhile, is expecting with her boyfriend of five months Andrew Glennon.”


“I needed to see where I was in my head and it’s a beautiful thing because I just feel better.”Reporting by Brody Brown...
“It was rough, but it was a necessary thing to do,” Portwood told Us.
The final straw was when Baier, a recovered drug addict, offered Teen Mom OG cast member Catelynn Lowell a Xanax during the show’s press day in NYC.
I feel like it’s a new chapter of my life.”Portwood and Baier officially ended their relationship in August two months after calling off their wedding.
”We’re both very happy.
Having a new baby is new likes, new wants, new needs, so it’s very nerve-racking,” Portwood exclusively told Us earlier this month.
I don’t know what to expect.
“When I first found out I was a little scared.
(Portwood is already mom to 9-year-old daughter Leah with ex Gary Shirley).
Portwood, meanwhile, is expecting with her boyfriend of five months Andrew Glennon.



Number  141
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“Meanwhile, Lookinland recalled that Henderson had the ability to brighten up a sometimes tense set.”
“Barry Williams (Greg), Christopher Knight (Peter), Mike Lookinland (Bobby) and Susan Olsen (Cindy) appeared on the Today show on Tuesday, where they talked about the impact the family sitcom still has today 48 years after its debut.”
“The foursome also opened up about losing their beloved TV mom, Florence Henderson (Carol), who died in November.”
“"Everyone she met felt better about themselves, and about the world around them after having spent a moment with Florence," Knight said about the legendary actress.”
“WATCH: EXCLUSIVE: Maureen McCormick Tears Up Remembering Florence Henderson, Her TV Mom and Best Friend"She was a mentor, a friend," Williams added.”
“"We learned from her, we learned how to interact with the public.”
“She was so gracious with her fans, and we all learned how to do that graciously.”
“Mostly, she loved to make people laugh.”
“... She would do anything -- she would fall down, she would say off-color jokes.”


Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...
Meanwhile, Lookinland recalled that Henderson had the ability to brighten up a sometimes tense set.
Barry Williams (Greg), Christopher Knight (Peter), Mike Lookinland (Bobby) and Susan Olsen (Cindy) appeared on the Today show on Tuesday, where they talked about the impact the family sitcom still has today 48 years after its debut.
The foursome also opened up about losing their beloved TV mom, Florence Henderson (Carol), who died in November.
"Everyone she met felt better about themselves, and about the world around them after having spent a moment with Florence," Knight said about the legendary actress.
WATCH: EXCLUSIVE: Maureen McCormick Tears Up Remembering Florence Henderson, Her TV Mom and Best Friend"She was a mentor, a friend," Williams added.
"We learned from her, we learned how to interact with the public.
She was so gracious with her fans, and we all learned how to do that graciously.
Mostly, she loved to make people laugh.
... She would do anything -- she would fall down, she would say off-color jokes.



**Something goes wrong**
“In 2014, a fan asked Griffin to call out the “biggest douche celebrity.” She responded, “Probably Debbie Lovato.””
“This isn’t the first time Lovato and the stand-up comic have taken their feud to social media.”
““Trust me, if I could redo the whole thing, I’d have a blow-up doll and no ketchup,” Griffin told the audience on Friday.”
“...ddlovato for going into treatment During her tearful press conference Griffin 56 accused Trump 70 and his family of bullying her after she shared a photo of herself holding a prop intended to represent the president s decapitated bloody head...”
“I spilled my tea Eagle eyed fans also noticed that Lovato liked her mom Dianna De La Garza s tweet which read So kathygriffin states she will continue making fun of people kinda like she made fun of my daughter...”
“A few minutes later, she added, “Oops.”
““I find it funny when bullies play the victim,” the singer, 24, tweeted.”
“Demi Lovato seemingly threw shade at Kathy Griffin on Twitter on Friday, June 2, after the comedian’s press conference about her controversial Donald Trump photo shoot.”
“Could it be?”


In 2014, a fan asked Griffin to call out the “biggest douche celebrity.” She responded, “Probably Debbie Lovato.”
This isn’t the first time Lovato and the stand-up comic have taken their feud to social media.
“Trust me, if I could redo the whole thing, I’d have a blow-up doll and no ketchup,” Griffin told the audience on Friday.
...ddlovato for going into treatment During her tearful press conference Griffin 56 accused Trump 70 and his family of bullying her after she shared a photo of herself holding a prop intended to represent the president s decapitated bloody head...
I spilled my tea Eagle eyed fans also noticed that Lovato liked her mom Dianna De La Garza s tweet which read So kathygriffin states she will continue making fun of people kinda like she made fun of my daughter...
A few minutes later, she added, “Oops.
“I find it funny when bullies play the victim,” the singer, 24, tweeted.
Demi Lovato seemingly threw shade at Kathy Griffin on Twitter on Friday, June 2, after the comedian’s press conference about her controversial Donald Trump photo shoot.
Could it be?



**Something goes wrong**
“Check out photos from the parents-to-be from their 2014 wedding, below.”
“And she'll definitely have the perfect little room to call her own.”
“Their little girl is due sometime this fall.”
“This is the first child for Cameran and her husband, Jason Wimberly.”
“Cameran, this moment is all yours!”
“And then added, "Edit yes duh I know the baby will p--- and sh-- all over the place just let me have my moment Gahhhhhhhdddd!!"”
“BY ME," she wrote, before spilling all of the details of where she bought all the items.”
“And, yes, she didn't leave out the side of sass in the caption: "Nursery all done.”
“The Southern Charm mom previewed the unborn tot's bedroom on Instagram.”
“That's really the only way to describe the dreamy and feminine nursery that Cameran Eubanks has put together for her daughter, who will arriving very soon.”


Check out photos from the parents-to-be from their 2014 wedding, below.
And she'll definitely have the perfect little room to call her own.
Their little girl is due sometime this fall.
This is the first child for Cameran and her husband, Jason Wimberly.
Cameran, this moment is all yours!
And then added, "Edit yes duh I know the baby will p--- and sh-- all over the place just let me have my moment Gahhhhhhhdddd!!"
BY ME," she wrote, before spilling all of the details of where she bought all the items.
And, yes, she didn't leave out the side of sass in the caption: "Nursery all done.
The Southern Charm mom previewed the unborn tot's bedroom on Instagram.
That's really the only way to describe the dreamy and feminine nursery that Cameran Eubanks has put together for her daughter, who will arriving very soon.



**Something goes wrong**
“Lifetime, which declined to comment on Miller's departure, has kept the show going with guest choreographers, including former "Dancing With the Stars" pro Cheryl Burke.”
“She later said she stepped away from the show because it had taken a toll on her mental health after years of "being manipulated, disrespected, and used day in and day out by men."”
“Miller was known for her strong personality and fiery interactions with her students and their parents before quitting the Lifetime reality show in March.”
“Prosecutors wanted Miller to spend 2.5 years in prison, while her attorneys were hoping for probation because all of her creditors were made whole after the fraud was discovered.”
“She also pleaded guilty to an unrelated charge of sneaking $120,000 in foreign currency into the United States from Australia, which, according to The Associated Press, she agreed to forfeit.”
“Last June, she pleaded guilty to purposely hiding that income.”
“Miller was indicted on fraud charges in 2015 for allegedly hiding from a bankruptcy court $775,000 in income she earned after filing a petition to reorganize her Pittsburgh dance studio in 2010.”
“She must report to prison in 45 days.”
“Conti told Miller she could transition to a halfway house after serving 10 months of her sentence.”
“Miller, 51, apologized to the judge for her actions and said she regrets them every day.”


Lifetime, which declined to comment on Miller's departure, has kept the show going with guest choreographers, including former "Dancing With the Stars" pro Cheryl Burke.
She later said she stepped away from the show because it had taken a toll on her mental health after years of "being manipulated, disrespected, and used day in and day out by men."
Miller was known for her strong personality and fiery interactions with her students and their parents before quitting the Lifetime reality show in March.
Prosecutors wanted Miller to spend 2.5 years in prison, while her attorneys were hoping for probation because all of her creditors were made whole after the fraud was discovered.
She also pleaded guilty to an unrelated charge of sneaking $120,000 in foreign currency into the United States from Australia, which, according to The Associated Press, she agreed to forfeit.
Last June, she pleaded guilty to purposely hiding that income.
Miller was indicted on fraud charges in 2015 for allegedly hiding from a bankruptcy court $775,000 in income she earned after filing a petition to reorganize her Pittsburgh dance studio in 2010.
She must report to prison in 45 days.
Conti told Miller she could transition to a halfway house after serving 10 months of her sentence.
Miller, 51, apologized to the judge for her actions and said she regrets them every day.



Number  145
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“The professional dancer, also 37, shared an equally seductive shot to her Instagram Stories, accompanied with four pink heart emojis.”
“After separating from Jenna Dewan Tatum earlier this month after eight years of marriage, the 37-year-old actor was spotted out and about in London, England, on Thursday, ringless.”
“Channing was seemingly trying to keep a low profile after hopping off a flight at Heathrow Airport, clad in a white Harvard Business School hoodie with maroon lettering.”
“He shaded his face with a black baseball cap and appeared to be on the phone.”
“BackgridOne day earlier, Jenna -- who was photographed without her ring two weekends ago in Los Angeles -- shared a sexy, lingerie-clad pic to Instagram.”
“The snap garnered over 212,000 likes, including one from Channing!”
“"A little R&R in my favorite @danskinapparel intimates," Jenna captioned it.”
“InstagramAs for the couple's actual separation, multiple sources have told ET that it was a long time coming.”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”


Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...
The professional dancer, also 37, shared an equally seductive shot to her Instagram Stories, accompanied with four pink heart emojis.
After separating from Jenna Dewan Tatum earlier this month after eight years of marriage, the 37-year-old actor was spotted out and about in London, England, on Thursday, ringless.
Channing was seemingly trying to keep a low profile after hopping off a flight at Heathrow Airport, clad in a white Harvard Business School hoodie with maroon lettering.
He shaded his face with a black baseball cap and appeared to be on the phone.
BackgridOne day earlier, Jenna -- who was photographed without her ring two weekends ago in Los Angeles -- shared a sexy, lingerie-clad pic to Instagram.
The snap garnered over 212,000 likes, including one from Channing!
"A little R&R in my favorite @danskinapparel intimates," Jenna captioned it.
InstagramAs for the couple's actual separation, multiple sources have told ET that it was a long time coming.
If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.



Number  146
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“All the attention they were getting online led to a second post from Wright about their being in the friend zone.”
“...situation...”
“...wait Letitia Wright and John Boyega are really together?”
“The main one being: Yes, they’re a pair on the red carpet, but are they also a romantic pair?”
“A DUO I DIDNT KNOW I NEEDED BUT I FUCKING LOVE #METgala pic.twitter.com/wc93geOFsO — bell ✩⋆ in mourning (@SpiderlingTom) May 8, 2018Though rightfully there were questions.”
“LETITIA WRIGHT”
“Story continues letitia wright and john boyega at the met gala 2018 oil on canvas artist god himself pic twitter com PtH7DSlIFM thor s gf pau tomshuri May 8 2018 john boyega and letitia wright that s it that s the tweet nazifa walIylinda May 8 2018 JOHN BOYEGA AND”
“Part two of black excellence #metgala A post shared by letitiawright (@letitiawright) on May 7, 2018 at 11:06pm PDTBut really before they even made their way up the staircase, the internet had basically already fallen in love with the pairing we didn’t even know we needed.”
“Note: You may need sunglasses before hitting Play, ’cause there’s a lot of star power in these videos.”
“They partied together inside, with Wright marveling at all the “black excellence” at the event.”


All the attention they were getting online led to a second post from Wright about their being in the friend zone.
...situation...
...wait Letitia Wright and John Boyega are really together?
The main one being: Yes, they’re a pair on the red carpet, but are they also a romantic pair?
A DUO I DIDNT KNOW I NEEDED BUT I FUCKING LOVE #METgala pic.twitter.com/wc93geOFsO — bell ✩⋆ in mourning (@SpiderlingTom) May 8, 2018Though rightfully there were questions.
LETITIA WRIGHT
Story continues letitia wright and john boyega at the met gala 2018 oil on canvas artist god himself pic twitter com PtH7DSlIFM thor s gf pau tomshuri May 8 2018 john boyega and letitia wright that s it that s the tweet nazifa walIylinda May 8 2018 JOHN BOYEGA AND
Part two of black excellence #metgala A post shared by letitiawright (@letitiawright) on May 7, 2018 at 11:06pm PDTBut really before they even made their way up the staircase, the internet had basically already fallen in love with the pairing we didn’t even know we needed.
Note: You may need sunglasses before hitting Play, ’cause there’s a lot of star power in these videos.
They partied together inside, with Wright marveling at all the “black excellence” at the event.



**Something goes wrong**
“ET.”
“Would you be happy to have a little brother too?” Nova smiles and says, “Yes” before continuing to decorate the cupcakes.”
“In a new sneak peek of Teen Mom OG, Catelynn Lowell and her husband, Tyler Baltierra, announce to their 3-year-old daughter that they are expecting a third child.”
““Do you know why we’re making pink and blue cupcakes?” Lowell, 26, asks Nova ahead of the MTV personality’s baby gender reveal celebration.”
““Why are we having a party tomorrow?”
“Wanna know why?”When the little girl looks over at dad Baltierra, 26, he makes a funny face and shrugs his shoulders.”
““Mommy has a baby in her belly,” Lowell reveals.”
““And tomorrow, the party is ‘cause we’re gonna find out if it’s gonna be a little girl or a little boy.”
“Would you want a little brother or a little sister?”Without hesitation, Nova responds, “A little sister,” to which her mom asks, “What if it’s a boy?”
“The couple, who wed in August 2015, warn their daughter that “babies cry a lot,” but she already has a solution.”


ET.
Would you be happy to have a little brother too?” Nova smiles and says, “Yes” before continuing to decorate the cupcakes.
In a new sneak peek of Teen Mom OG, Catelynn Lowell and her husband, Tyler Baltierra, announce to their 3-year-old daughter that they are expecting a third child.
“Do you know why we’re making pink and blue cupcakes?” Lowell, 26, asks Nova ahead of the MTV personality’s baby gender reveal celebration.
“Why are we having a party tomorrow?
Wanna know why?”When the little girl looks over at dad Baltierra, 26, he makes a funny face and shrugs his shoulders.
“Mommy has a baby in her belly,” Lowell reveals.
“And tomorrow, the party is ‘cause we’re gonna find out if it’s gonna be a little girl or a little boy.
Would you want a little brother or a little sister?”Without hesitation, Nova responds, “A little sister,” to which her mom asks, “What if it’s a boy?
The couple, who wed in August 2015, warn their daughter that “babies cry a lot,” but she already has a solution.



Number  148
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ask her why she wants to watch the show and what her friends have been saying about it.”
“If you are going to allow your daughter to watch it, discuss some of the themes beforehand.”
“The intense emotions, confusion, and behaviors of the show’s characters can be disturbing to any viewer.”
“Because of the normal stage of development at age 13, the decision whether and how your daughter should watch 13 Reasons Why is an important one.”
“And selling an admittedly TV-MA show to a YA readership is just as concerning as cross-marketing children’s action figures based on R-rated movies like Deadpool.”
“There is a real difference between your 13-year-old daughter reading the book and watching an adult filmmaker’s graphic recreation of the book.”
“Younger kids’ media consumption is aspirational, meaning that they look to older kids, including media representations, to see how they should act, dress, and behave in the strange new worlds of high school, summer camp, and college.”
“As you’ve seen with your own daughter, media made for older adolescents and adults are attractive to younger kids.”
“Although it is based on a popular YA novel (for readers 12-18), 13 Reasons Why is rated TV-MA (unsuitable for viewers under 17) and several episodes are preceded by an onscreen “graphic content” warning.”
“The problem is that she and her peers may not yet be neurodevelopmentally capable of processing that “drama” in healthy, safe ways.”


Ask her why she wants to watch the show and what her friends have been saying about it.
If you are going to allow your daughter to watch it, discuss some of the themes beforehand.
The intense emotions, confusion, and behaviors of the show’s characters can be disturbing to any viewer.
Because of the normal stage of development at age 13, the decision whether and how your daughter should watch 13 Reasons Why is an important one.
And selling an admittedly TV-MA show to a YA readership is just as concerning as cross-marketing children’s action figures based on R-rated movies like Deadpool.
There is a real difference between your 13-year-old daughter reading the book and watching an adult filmmaker’s graphic recreation of the book.
Younger kids’ media consumption is aspirational, meaning that they look to older kids, including media representations, to see how they should act, dress, and behave in the strange new worlds of high school, summer camp, and college.
As you’ve seen with your own daughter, media made for older adolescents and adults are attractive to younger kids.
Although it is based on a popular YA novel (for readers 12-18), 13 Reasons Why is rated TV-MA (unsuitable for viewers under 17) and several episodes are preceded by an onscreen “graphic content” warning.
The problem is that she and her peers may not yet be neurodevelopmentally capable of processing that “drama” in healthy, safe ways.



Number  149
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I told her, “Your daddy didn’t die.”
“(Pg 362)“I told Lulabelle the truth.”
“...maid s quarters...”
“I tell her what else I put in that pie for her Minny revealing the Terrible Awful secret to Miss Celia Pg 339 Mother I want to be with girls as much as you d like to be with Jameso Skeeter Pg 75 All these houses they re building without...”
“– Skeeter (Pg 83)“I say ‘ That good vanilla from Mexico’ and then I go head.”
“Are you having unnatural thoughts about…girls or-or women?” –Charlotte Phelan (Pg 75)I am neither thrilled nor disappointed by the news that they might let a colored man into Ole Miss, just surprised.”
“I ain’t driving you to no country club in the pouring rain.” – Minny Jackson (Pg 17)“Are you…do you find …find men attractive?”
“A chauffeur?”
“I’ve even notified the surgeon general of Mississippi to see if he’ll endorse the idea.” Hilly Holbrook (Pg 9)“What you think I am?”
“Something you believe in” –Stuart Whitworth speaking to Skeeter (Pg 171)“It’s called the Home Help Sanitation Initiative- ” Hilly Holbrook (Pg 60)“A bill that requires every white home to have a separate bathroom for the colored help.”


I told her, “Your daddy didn’t die.
(Pg 362)“I told Lulabelle the truth.
...maid s quarters...
I tell her what else I put in that pie for her Minny revealing the Terrible Awful secret to Miss Celia Pg 339 Mother I want to be with girls as much as you d like to be with Jameso Skeeter Pg 75 All these houses they re building without...
– Skeeter (Pg 83)“I say ‘ That good vanilla from Mexico’ and then I go head.
Are you having unnatural thoughts about…girls or-or women?” –Charlotte Phelan (Pg 75)I am neither thrilled nor disappointed by the news that they might let a colored man into Ole Miss, just surprised.
I ain’t driving you to no country club in the pouring rain.” – Minny Jackson (Pg 17)“Are you…do you find …find men attractive?
A chauffeur?
I’ve even notified the surgeon general of Mississippi to see if he’ll endorse the idea.” Hilly Holbrook (Pg 9)“What you think I am?
Something you believe in” –Stuart Whitworth speaking to Skeeter (Pg 171)“It’s called the Home Help Sanitation Initiative- ” Hilly Holbrook (Pg 60)“A bill that requires every white home to have a separate bathroom for the colored help.



Number  150
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know what you think of her white and black outfit in the comment section below.”
“The Morrocan-American rapper said it wasn’t “easy access.”AdvertisementMargaret Cho said, “well, it might be crotch-less, you don’t know.” French responded with a hearty, “I like your style!” That’s a bit raunchy is it not?”
“The host claimed it was not a “$5,500 well spent.”He added that it was a “mess, a mess.”And finally, French Montana came in with a critique that was off-the-wall, to say the least.”
“@vmas A post shared by Alessandra Ambrosio (@alessandraambrosio) on Aug 27, 2017 at 7:55pm PDTBrad was also vocal in his critique of the ensemble.”
“NeNe went on to say, “I don’t care what you say, but she can’t do this.”?⚡️ M T V ⚡️?”
“Ouch!”
“She said, “It may all match, but this doesn’t work for me.”The star said she could “rock it,” but Alessandra doesn’t, unfortunately.”
“Reality star NeNe Leakes was one of the people who was just not feeling the outfit one bit.”
“And while we didn’t think her look was too bad, considering it shows how bold she is, the hosts of the MTV show were not quite as nice.”
“This indeed proved to be the case with the supermodel, Alessandra Ambrosio, who’s outfit was something totally out of this world.”


Let us know what you think of her white and black outfit in the comment section below.
The Morrocan-American rapper said it wasn’t “easy access.”AdvertisementMargaret Cho said, “well, it might be crotch-less, you don’t know.” French responded with a hearty, “I like your style!” That’s a bit raunchy is it not?
The host claimed it was not a “$5,500 well spent.”He added that it was a “mess, a mess.”And finally, French Montana came in with a critique that was off-the-wall, to say the least.
@vmas A post shared by Alessandra Ambrosio (@alessandraambrosio) on Aug 27, 2017 at 7:55pm PDTBrad was also vocal in his critique of the ensemble.
NeNe went on to say, “I don’t care what you say, but she can’t do this.”?⚡️ M T V ⚡️?
Ouch!
She said, “It may all match, but this doesn’t work for me.”The star said she could “rock it,” but Alessandra doesn’t, unfortunately.
Reality star NeNe Leakes was one of the people who was just not feeling the outfit one bit.
And while we didn’t think her look was too bad, considering it shows how bold she is, the hosts of the MTV show were not quite as nice.
This indeed proved to be the case with the supermodel, Alessandra Ambrosio, who’s outfit was something totally out of this world.



Number  151
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out more from Iggy on WWHL, below.”
“FYI, expect more intel in the future since Iggy hinted, "I'm having another [girls' night] soon."”
“Create a free profile to get unlimited access to exclusive videos, sweepstakes, and more!”
“Remember that time Katy Perry, Miley Cyrus, Bella Thorne, and Iggy Azalea all had a girls' night at Paris Hilton's abode?”
“Well, we do.”
“And since we didn't get an invite, Iggy spilled all about that fabulous evening during Sunday's Watch What Happens Live with Andy Cohen.”
“It was there that she revealed some of the secrets of Paris' house.”
“"It's just like all fabulous pictures of Paris Hilton.”
“My favorite like the best thing in her house I promise she has this gigantic well there s a lot of pictures of herself which I love and there should be but the best picture of herself is this giant...”
“...picture of Paris Hilton and she s wearing a Guess shirt and it says Can you afford me...”


Check out more from Iggy on WWHL, below.
FYI, expect more intel in the future since Iggy hinted, "I'm having another [girls' night] soon."
Create a free profile to get unlimited access to exclusive videos, sweepstakes, and more!
Remember that time Katy Perry, Miley Cyrus, Bella Thorne, and Iggy Azalea all had a girls' night at Paris Hilton's abode?
Well, we do.
And since we didn't get an invite, Iggy spilled all about that fabulous evening during Sunday's Watch What Happens Live with Andy Cohen.
It was there that she revealed some of the secrets of Paris' house.
"It's just like all fabulous pictures of Paris Hilton.
My favorite like the best thing in her house I promise she has this gigantic well there s a lot of pictures of herself which I love and there should be but the best picture of herself is this giant...
...picture of Paris Hilton and she s wearing a Guess shirt and it says Can you afford me...



**Something goes wrong**
“Statista Inc.. Accessed: February 04, 2021.”
“Statista .”
“Change statistics options You need at least a Single Account to use this feature.”
“...and make my research life easier.”
“Yes, save as favorite!”
“Bookmark statistics As soon as this statistic is updated, you will immediately be notified via e-mail.”
“Show details about this statistic As a Premium user you get access to background information and details about the release of this statistic.”
“Show source references As a Premium user you get access to the detailed source references and background information about this statistic.”
“Save statistic in .PDF format You can only download this statistic as a Premium user.”
“Save statistic in .PNG format You can only download this statistic as a Premium user.”


Statista Inc.. Accessed: February 04, 2021.
Statista .
Change statistics options You need at least a Single Account to use this feature.
...and make my research life easier.
Yes, save as favorite!
Bookmark statistics As soon as this statistic is updated, you will immediately be notified via e-mail.
Show details about this statistic As a Premium user you get access to background information and details about the release of this statistic.
Show source references As a Premium user you get access to the detailed source references and background information about this statistic.
Save statistic in .PDF format You can only download this statistic as a Premium user.
Save statistic in .PNG format You can only download this statistic as a Premium user.



Number  153
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It's unclear why he thinks the guy was racist.”
“Play video content 4/5/17 TMZ.comThe person he's calling a "racist" was the bartender.”
“French fries.”
“We've obtained additional video that shows Shia was going off about a bartender refusing to serve him french fries.”
“We're told Shia got rowdy in Jerry's Deli, which is connected to Pinz, and got into a verbal altercation when the staff told him to leave.”
“Shia was at Pinz in Studio City and according to one eyewitness, he was there for 3 hours pounding back beers.”
“Play video content EXCLUSIVE TMZ.comShia LaBeouf got kicked out of an L.A. bowling alley Wednesday night after freaking out on a bartender, calling him a "f***ing racist."”


It's unclear why he thinks the guy was racist.
Play video content 4/5/17 TMZ.comThe person he's calling a "racist" was the bartender.
French fries.
We've obtained additional video that shows Shia was going off about a bartender refusing to serve him french fries.
We're told Shia got rowdy in Jerry's Deli, which is connected to Pinz, and got into a verbal altercation when the staff told him to leave.
Shia was at Pinz in Studio City and according to one eyewitness, he was there for 3 hours pounding back beers.
Play video content EXCLUSIVE TMZ.comShia LaBeouf got kicked out of an L.A. bowling alley Wednesday night after freaking out on a bartender, calling him a "f***ing racist."



Number  154
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'But the idea that you were a person before you were a mom, and that sometimes you really hope that your kids know who you are as an individual.'”
“The 40-year-old actress proved her age-defying looks and appeared as though she could have been twins with her teen daughterHer own best advert!”
“And the 40-year-old A-lister proved her age-defying looks even more so when she stepped out for lunch in Santa Monica with teen daughter Ava, 17, on Tuesday.”
“The Wild star and her eldest appeared as though they could be twin sisters while grabbing a bite at Blue Plate with their adorable French bulldog Pepper.”
“Scroll down for videoMidday meal: Reese Witherspoon stepped out with daughter Ava, 17, for lunch at Blue Plate in Santa Monica on TuesdayThe Academy Award-winning actress donned the Dunaway Vines top from her own southern-inspired Draper James line which retails for $195.”
“She teamed the feminine printed blouse with dark denim jeans that encased her slender pins.”
“A pair of dark shades sat neatly on her nose and shielded her piercing blue eyes from the southern California rays.”
“Mother-daughter doppelgangers!”
“The Academy Award-winning actress donned the Dunaway Vines top from her own southern-inspired Draper James line which retails for $195The Walk The Line actress swept her signature golden blonde tresses up in a relaxed bun and skipped the cosmetics, allowing her natural beauty to shine through.”
“She told the outlet: 'I have three kids of my own - sometimes it feels like 25,' when comparing her life to her animated character Rosita.”


'But the idea that you were a person before you were a mom, and that sometimes you really hope that your kids know who you are as an individual.'
The 40-year-old actress proved her age-defying looks and appeared as though she could have been twins with her teen daughterHer own best advert!
And the 40-year-old A-lister proved her age-defying looks even more so when she stepped out for lunch in Santa Monica with teen daughter Ava, 17, on Tuesday.
The Wild star and her eldest appeared as though they could be twin sisters while grabbing a bite at Blue Plate with their adorable French bulldog Pepper.
Scroll down for videoMidday meal: Reese Witherspoon stepped out with daughter Ava, 17, for lunch at Blue Plate in Santa Monica on TuesdayThe Academy Award-winning actress donned the Dunaway Vines top from her own southern-inspired Draper James line which retails for $195.
She teamed the feminine printed blouse with dark denim jeans that encased her slender pins.
A pair of dark shades sat neatly on her nose and shielded her piercing blue eyes from the southern California rays.
Mother-daughter doppelgangers!
The Academy Award-winning actress donned the Dunaway Vines top from her own southern-inspired Draper James line which retails for $195The Walk The Line actress swept her signature golden blonde tresses up in a relaxed bun and skipped the cosmetics, allowing her natural beauty to shine through.
She told the outlet: 'I have three kids of my own - sometimes it feels like 25,' when comparing her life to her animated character Rosita.



**Something goes wrong**
“If they are to wed, there are suggestions it would take place at St. George’s Chapel at Windsor Castle.”
““If Harry asks for something, she would say yes as she adores him,” the source says.”
“...about securing his grandmother s approval one inside source tells PEOPLE he would be in the clear...”
“Before the games Markle had spoken in a way that no other royal girlfriend or boyfriend had done so before saying they were two people who are really happy and in love Image zoom Credit Karwai Tang WireImage And if there is any doubt that Harry would need to worry...”
“Last month, Harry, 33, and Meghan, 36, made their public debut as a couple at the Invictus Games in Toronto, where they held hands at a wheelchair tennis event and spent time with her mom, Doria.”
“There had been rumors that the Suits star and the Queen may have met earlier — during a visit to Balmoral Castle in Scotland.”
“Harry is fifth in the line of succession (he’ll be pushed to sixth after William and Kate welcome their third baby this spring), meaning he has to have the monarch’s permission to wed.”
“There is critical significance in Markle’s meeting with the Queen.”
“Spokespeople at Kensington Palace and Buckingham Palace declined to comment on the report.”
“Image zoom Credit: Splash News OnlineLater that evening, Harry was in top form as he accepted a posthumous award honoring the HIV/AIDS activism of his mother, Princess Diana, at the Attitude magazine awards.”


If they are to wed, there are suggestions it would take place at St. George’s Chapel at Windsor Castle.
“If Harry asks for something, she would say yes as she adores him,” the source says.
...about securing his grandmother s approval one inside source tells PEOPLE he would be in the clear...
Before the games Markle had spoken in a way that no other royal girlfriend or boyfriend had done so before saying they were two people who are really happy and in love Image zoom Credit Karwai Tang WireImage And if there is any doubt that Harry would need to worry...
Last month, Harry, 33, and Meghan, 36, made their public debut as a couple at the Invictus Games in Toronto, where they held hands at a wheelchair tennis event and spent time with her mom, Doria.
There had been rumors that the Suits star and the Queen may have met earlier — during a visit to Balmoral Castle in Scotland.
Harry is fifth in the line of succession (he’ll be pushed to sixth after William and Kate welcome their third baby this spring), meaning he has to have the monarch’s permission to wed.
There is critical significance in Markle’s meeting with the Queen.
Spokespeople at Kensington Palace and Buckingham Palace declined to comment on the report.
Image zoom Credit: Splash News OnlineLater that evening, Harry was in top form as he accepted a posthumous award honoring the HIV/AIDS activism of his mother, Princess Diana, at the Attitude magazine awards.



Number  156
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I had never been as happy as i was when i was with you.””
“Mourning his beloved dog, Vergara shared a touching tribute on social media, posting a photo of the dog and writing, “I love you mamacita.”
“...adoption...”
“Mamacita died RELATED Sofia Vergara Celebrates Son s College Graduation On Instagram The Modern Family star s son had adopted the pup just a few days earlier introducing Mamacita to his Instagram followers in a video in which he and his new pet drive in his car shortly after the...”
““We were walking to the vet, and she got startled, and she ran away and got hit by a car,” Manolo Vergara, 25, says in the emotional video, sobbing over the loss of his dog.”
“The son of Sofia Vergara shared some sad news on Instagram Story, revealing that his recently adopted dog, Mamacita, was hit by a car and killed.”


I had never been as happy as i was when i was with you.”
Mourning his beloved dog, Vergara shared a touching tribute on social media, posting a photo of the dog and writing, “I love you mamacita.
...adoption...
Mamacita died RELATED Sofia Vergara Celebrates Son s College Graduation On Instagram The Modern Family star s son had adopted the pup just a few days earlier introducing Mamacita to his Instagram followers in a video in which he and his new pet drive in his car shortly after the...
“We were walking to the vet, and she got startled, and she ran away and got hit by a car,” Manolo Vergara, 25, says in the emotional video, sobbing over the loss of his dog.
The son of Sofia Vergara shared some sad news on Instagram Story, revealing that his recently adopted dog, Mamacita, was hit by a car and killed.



Number  157
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Similarly, the royals mingled with Paul and Adelaide Joseph, anti-Apartheid activists and close friends of Mandela and Winnie Mandela.”
“After being released 27 years later, he served as a member of parliament for the African National Congress.”
“The couple also met 92-year-old Andrew Mlangeni, a close friend of Mandela's who was sentenced to life in prison on Robben Island at the Rivonia Trial.”
“Princess Diana had indeed become an Ambassador for victims of landmines, war orphans, the sick and needy throughout the world."”
“"I vividly recall our meeting when she visited South Africa last year and her burning desire to assist HIV positive children in Africa.”
“"She will be sadly missed as a warm, compassionate and caring person," Mandela said at the time of her death.”
“In 2015 during his own trip to South Africa, the royal met with his widow Graca Machel and visited his Robben Island cell and Johannesburg office, where a photo of Mandela's meeting with Diana was on display.”
“AP Photo/Sasa Kral This isn't the first time Prince Harry has crossed paths with members of Mandela's family.”
“It appears both women had buttons in mind for the occasions.”
“Whether unintentional or otherwise, Markle even seemed to channel the former Princess of Wales sartorially, donning a sleeveless double-breasted blush trench dress by Canadian label, NONIE—a modern version of the button-down dress Diana opted for all those years ago.”


Similarly, the royals mingled with Paul and Adelaide Joseph, anti-Apartheid activists and close friends of Mandela and Winnie Mandela.
After being released 27 years later, he served as a member of parliament for the African National Congress.
The couple also met 92-year-old Andrew Mlangeni, a close friend of Mandela's who was sentenced to life in prison on Robben Island at the Rivonia Trial.
Princess Diana had indeed become an Ambassador for victims of landmines, war orphans, the sick and needy throughout the world."
"I vividly recall our meeting when she visited South Africa last year and her burning desire to assist HIV positive children in Africa.
"She will be sadly missed as a warm, compassionate and caring person," Mandela said at the time of her death.
In 2015 during his own trip to South Africa, the royal met with his widow Graca Machel and visited his Robben Island cell and Johannesburg office, where a photo of Mandela's meeting with Diana was on display.
AP Photo/Sasa Kral This isn't the first time Prince Harry has crossed paths with members of Mandela's family.
It appears both women had buttons in mind for the occasions.
Whether unintentional or otherwise, Markle even seemed to channel the former Princess of Wales sartorially, donning a sleeveless double-breasted blush trench dress by Canadian label, NONIE—a modern version of the button-down dress Diana opted for all those years ago.



Number  158
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As the Telegraph says, Sheen “sounds a little wistful” about politics coming before love.”
“...journalism...”
“But we both acknowledge that each of us had to do what we needed to do Sheen has since been working with a range of grassroots groups in his hometown in Wales aiming to combat inequality which includes supporting credit unions and paying for research into ways of funding local...”
““I felt a responsibility to do something, but it did mean coming back here—which was difficult for us, because we were very important to each other.”
“That led to her doing her show I Love You, America, and it led to me wanting to address the issues that I thought led some people to vote the way they did about Brexit, in the area I come from and others like it.”
““After the Brexit vote, and the election where Trump became president, we both felt in different ways we wanted to get more involved.”
““We both had very similar drives, and yet to act on those drives pulled us in different directions—because she is American and I’m Welsh.”
“At the time, he and Silverman were living together in the U.S., but the votes signaled the end of their four-year relationship.”
“...campaigns in the U K Sheen who has previously compared the rise of populism to the rise of Nazism in Germany in the 30s told the Daily Telegraph that he was inspired to become more politically active by the Brexit referendum...”
“Both in fact hold similarly anti populist views but in a new interview Sheen says that he and Silverman parted ways because she wanted to spend more time in America engaged in her I Love You America project which challenges Trumpism and he wanted to be engaged in anti Brexit...”


As the Telegraph says, Sheen “sounds a little wistful” about politics coming before love.
...journalism...
But we both acknowledge that each of us had to do what we needed to do Sheen has since been working with a range of grassroots groups in his hometown in Wales aiming to combat inequality which includes supporting credit unions and paying for research into ways of funding local...
“I felt a responsibility to do something, but it did mean coming back here—which was difficult for us, because we were very important to each other.
That led to her doing her show I Love You, America, and it led to me wanting to address the issues that I thought led some people to vote the way they did about Brexit, in the area I come from and others like it.
“After the Brexit vote, and the election where Trump became president, we both felt in different ways we wanted to get more involved.
“We both had very similar drives, and yet to act on those drives pulled us in different directions—because she is American and I’m Welsh.
At the time, he and Silverman were living together in the U.S., but the votes signaled the end of their four-year relationship.
...campaigns in the U K Sheen who has previously compared the rise of populism to the rise of Nazism in Germany in the 30s told the Daily Telegraph that he was inspired to become more politically active by the Brexit referendum...
Both in fact hold similarly anti populist views but in a new interview Sheen says that he and Silverman parted ways because she wanted to spend more time in America engaged in her I Love You America project which challenges Trumpism and he wanted to be engaged in anti Brexit...



Number  159
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ ,” she wrote on Instagram alongside an image of Burnell’s original novel.”
“I couldn’t be more excited to be bringing this incredible and complex  hero to life.”
“Yes!!!”
“Yes.”
““Yes.”
“In July, Lively expressed her excitement to be working on the project.”
“And in order to solve the case, she has to adopt the identity of the assassin responsible for the killings.”
“Image zoom Credit: WENN.comTHR reported that the movie is about Patrick — played by Lively — a woman who is forced to uncover the truth about her family’s deaths once she learns that the plane crash that killed them was not an accident.”
“RELATED VIDEO: How It’s Done: Blake Lively’s Beachy BraidAccording to The Hollywood Reporter, The Rhythm Section is a modern adaptation of the first of British thriller writer Mark Burnell’s Stephanie Patrick series.”
“...streaks...”


 ,” she wrote on Instagram alongside an image of Burnell’s original novel.
I couldn’t be more excited to be bringing this incredible and complex  hero to life.
Yes!!!
Yes.
“Yes.
In July, Lively expressed her excitement to be working on the project.
And in order to solve the case, she has to adopt the identity of the assassin responsible for the killings.
Image zoom Credit: WENN.comTHR reported that the movie is about Patrick — played by Lively — a woman who is forced to uncover the truth about her family’s deaths once she learns that the plane crash that killed them was not an accident.
RELATED VIDEO: How It’s Done: Blake Lively’s Beachy BraidAccording to The Hollywood Reporter, The Rhythm Section is a modern adaptation of the first of British thriller writer Mark Burnell’s Stephanie Patrick series.
...streaks...



Number  160
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The constant press attention Rose has garnered in print and on national TV led to Harvey Weinstein releasing two documents.”
“Rose's most recent round of press to promote her book has included new stories involving Jill.”
“She supported every woman finally coming forward to share their dark truths and expose those who had committed previously unspeakable deeds.”
“Jill believed in the Movement.”
“She became collateral damage in an already horrific story.”
“The speed of disseminating information has carried mistruths about Jill as a person, which she was unable and unwilling to challenge.”
“Jill was victimized by our new culture of unlimited information sharing and a willingness to accept statement as fact.”
“Jill took her own life.”
“Today she did not survive.”
“She was also a survivor, privately battling depression, which had been her nemesis for years.”


The constant press attention Rose has garnered in print and on national TV led to Harvey Weinstein releasing two documents.
Rose's most recent round of press to promote her book has included new stories involving Jill.
She supported every woman finally coming forward to share their dark truths and expose those who had committed previously unspeakable deeds.
Jill believed in the Movement.
She became collateral damage in an already horrific story.
The speed of disseminating information has carried mistruths about Jill as a person, which she was unable and unwilling to challenge.
Jill was victimized by our new culture of unlimited information sharing and a willingness to accept statement as fact.
Jill took her own life.
Today she did not survive.
She was also a survivor, privately battling depression, which had been her nemesis for years.



Number  161
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Star Best Fandom and Cast on Social Media Best New 2017 2018 Show Most Anticipated New Show Saddest Cancellation and Best Series Finale...”
“Here s the full list of polls Best Comedy and Best Drama Best Drama Acting Best Comedy Acting Best Breakout Stars Best Couple and Sexiest Moment Best Reality Show and Star Best and Worst Shocker Best Fight and Musical Moment Saddest Death and Actor Exit Best Villain and Best Guest...”
“Others nominated include Charmed, Sharp Objects, Shadowhunters, Will & Grace, New Girl, Kerry Washington (Scandal), James Corden, Jimmy Fallon, Jimmel Kimmel and Michelle Wolf.”
“Pretty Little Liars: The Perfectionists is up for 'Most Anticipated Show' of 2018/2019.”
“Any show that aired between June 9 2017 and June 8 2018 is eligible.”
“News' TV Scoop Awards.”
“Shortlink to this content: http://bit.ly/2Nbz1iLFriday, June 29, 2018 7:37am ET by PresspartyVoting closes at 5pm PT today (June 29) for this year's E!”


Star Best Fandom and Cast on Social Media Best New 2017 2018 Show Most Anticipated New Show Saddest Cancellation and Best Series Finale...
Here s the full list of polls Best Comedy and Best Drama Best Drama Acting Best Comedy Acting Best Breakout Stars Best Couple and Sexiest Moment Best Reality Show and Star Best and Worst Shocker Best Fight and Musical Moment Saddest Death and Actor Exit Best Villain and Best Guest...
Others nominated include Charmed, Sharp Objects, Shadowhunters, Will & Grace, New Girl, Kerry Washington (Scandal), James Corden, Jimmy Fallon, Jimmel Kimmel and Michelle Wolf.
Pretty Little Liars: The Perfectionists is up for 'Most Anticipated Show' of 2018/2019.
Any show that aired between June 9 2017 and June 8 2018 is eligible.
News' TV Scoop Awards.
Shortlink to this content: http://bit.ly/2Nbz1iLFriday, June 29, 2018 7:37am ET by PresspartyVoting closes at 5pm PT today (June 29) for this year's E!



Number  162
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: Farrah Abraham/InstagramImage zoom Credit: Farrah Abraham/InstagramThe reality star also snapped a photo with businessman Mark Cuban.”
“She was joined by her 9-year-old daughter Sophia and shared snaps of the two lounging by the pool.”
““On June 13, 2018, at approximately 1:19 a.m., Beverly Hills Police officers responded to the Beverly Hills Hotel for a report of a disturbance inside the hotel restaurant.”
“Officers arrived shortly thereafter and made contact with the person complained of, Farrah Abraham,” a spokesperson for the Beverly Hills Police Department tells PEOPLE.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““A male adult hotel security officer reported that he asked Abraham to leave the hotel after she refused to disengage from a verbal altercation with hotel guests,” says the spokesperson.”
““The security officer reported that Abraham struck him in the face with her forearm, grabbed his ear and pushed him in the face as he attempted to prevent her from re-entering the hotel.”
“Officers noted that Abraham exhibited signs of intoxication during the investigation.”According to the spokesperson, the victim “sustained minor injury and was not transported to a hospital.”Abraham was arrested for misdemeanor battery and trespassing pursuant to a private person’s arrest.”
“She was booked at the Beverly Hills Jail and is being held on $500 bail.”
““We can confirm there was an incident involving a patron in the Polo Lounge this morning,” a spokesperson for the hotel tells PEOPLE.”


Image zoom Credit: Farrah Abraham/InstagramImage zoom Credit: Farrah Abraham/InstagramThe reality star also snapped a photo with businessman Mark Cuban.
She was joined by her 9-year-old daughter Sophia and shared snaps of the two lounging by the pool.
“On June 13, 2018, at approximately 1:19 a.m., Beverly Hills Police officers responded to the Beverly Hills Hotel for a report of a disturbance inside the hotel restaurant.
Officers arrived shortly thereafter and made contact with the person complained of, Farrah Abraham,” a spokesperson for the Beverly Hills Police Department tells PEOPLE.
Get push notifications with news, features and more.
“A male adult hotel security officer reported that he asked Abraham to leave the hotel after she refused to disengage from a verbal altercation with hotel guests,” says the spokesperson.
“The security officer reported that Abraham struck him in the face with her forearm, grabbed his ear and pushed him in the face as he attempted to prevent her from re-entering the hotel.
Officers noted that Abraham exhibited signs of intoxication during the investigation.”According to the spokesperson, the victim “sustained minor injury and was not transported to a hospital.”Abraham was arrested for misdemeanor battery and trespassing pursuant to a private person’s arrest.
She was booked at the Beverly Hills Jail and is being held on $500 bail.
“We can confirm there was an incident involving a patron in the Polo Lounge this morning,” a spokesperson for the hotel tells PEOPLE.



Number  163
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“MORE : Beyonce and Jay-Z are over the infidelity drama in loved-up picsMORE : Ed Sheeran and Anne-Marie cover The Pogues’ Fairytale Of New York and it’s a thing of beauty...”
“Boom.”
“A fan theory is doing the rounds online that we are so here for – we could have a Destiny’s Child reunion on our hands.”
“Original members LaToya and LaTavia could well be teaming up with Bey, Michelle Williams and Kelly Rowland, if this is all to be believed.”
“The theory goes that Destiny’s Child are reuniting for Coachella 2018 and it would appear they have each been dropping hints to suggest it.”
“AND WE ALL KNOW BEYONCE LOVES A HINT DROP.”
“Example one: the album hint.”
“Example two: The twins hint.”
“Beyoncé told us in Dec. she was having twins ?.”
“She was holding up two fingers.”


MORE : Beyonce and Jay-Z are over the infidelity drama in loved-up picsMORE : Ed Sheeran and Anne-Marie cover The Pogues’ Fairytale Of New York and it’s a thing of beauty...
Boom.
A fan theory is doing the rounds online that we are so here for – we could have a Destiny’s Child reunion on our hands.
Original members LaToya and LaTavia could well be teaming up with Bey, Michelle Williams and Kelly Rowland, if this is all to be believed.
The theory goes that Destiny’s Child are reuniting for Coachella 2018 and it would appear they have each been dropping hints to suggest it.
AND WE ALL KNOW BEYONCE LOVES A HINT DROP.
Example one: the album hint.
Example two: The twins hint.
Beyoncé told us in Dec. she was having twins ?.
She was holding up two fingers.



**Something goes wrong**
“Watch Serena Williams Absolutely Tear Up an Airport Runway:”
“I want her to be very humble, and I want to start that at an early age.” Ohanian added, “I am so proud and in awe of my wife!”Venus agreed with Serena on her sister’s greatest accomplishment: “She’s a tennis champion and an unbelievable mom.”
“She’s a tennis master, entrepreneur, fashion designer, and philanthropist.”
“Her most recent and proudest accolade agreed upon by all, including Serena herself, was the birth of her daughter, Olympia.”
“On the red carpet, Serena told Vogue: “The one thing I’m most proud of is becoming a mom.”
“That is everything, hands down.” On what she has not yet accomplished but would love to, Serena said, “Becoming a multi-mom.”
“I have some records I want to break, but having more kids is my goal.” Olympia is already proving to be a stylish baby thanks to Serena’s good taste.”
“When dressing her, often in mommy-and-me matching style, Williams said, “I just think about things that are comfortable and easy to change a diaper.”
“I get most of her clothes on Amazon.”
“They have great, fun clothes.”


Watch Serena Williams Absolutely Tear Up an Airport Runway:
I want her to be very humble, and I want to start that at an early age.” Ohanian added, “I am so proud and in awe of my wife!”Venus agreed with Serena on her sister’s greatest accomplishment: “She’s a tennis champion and an unbelievable mom.
She’s a tennis master, entrepreneur, fashion designer, and philanthropist.
Her most recent and proudest accolade agreed upon by all, including Serena herself, was the birth of her daughter, Olympia.
On the red carpet, Serena told Vogue: “The one thing I’m most proud of is becoming a mom.
That is everything, hands down.” On what she has not yet accomplished but would love to, Serena said, “Becoming a multi-mom.
I have some records I want to break, but having more kids is my goal.” Olympia is already proving to be a stylish baby thanks to Serena’s good taste.
When dressing her, often in mommy-and-me matching style, Williams said, “I just think about things that are comfortable and easy to change a diaper.
I get most of her clothes on Amazon.
They have great, fun clothes.



Number  165
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...the truth FOLLOW US ON FACEBOOK FOR MORE FOX LIFESTYLE NEWS”
“And I am here on a winter morning at the woodsy snow covered Bündchen Brady home outside Boston nestled on a couch looking directly into the blue eyes of one of the world s most recognizable women and I believe with all of my heart that she is telling me...”
““I am a Massachusetts kid — my bloodstream is still one-third Dunkaccino.”
““Reader, I need you to trust my judgment,” he writes in the interview.”
“Though it may seem unbelievable that the ultra health-conscious clan actually eats Munchkins, WSJ’s Jason Gay says it must be true.”
“WAITER FIRED FOR BEING 'AGGRESSIVE' CLAIMS IT IS HIS FRENCH PERSONALITY“It’s become a thing that we bring it,” she said.”
“According to People, Bündchen was won over after Brady suggested they bring boxes of Munchkins to their 8-year-old son Benjamin’s hockey practice.”
“Even still, the mother of two further divulged that she became a Munchkin enthusiast in the most family-friendly way possible.”
“England Patriots quarterback Tom Brady...”
“It s a guilty pleasure KFC CANADA DEBUTS WAFFLE DOUBLE DOWN SANDWICH The shocking news seemingly contradicts everything about the former Victoria Secret superstar s much buzzed about 80 percent vegetable diet that forbids white sugar white flour MSG caffeine fungus and dairy that she follows alongside her husband New...”


...the truth FOLLOW US ON FACEBOOK FOR MORE FOX LIFESTYLE NEWS
And I am here on a winter morning at the woodsy snow covered Bündchen Brady home outside Boston nestled on a couch looking directly into the blue eyes of one of the world s most recognizable women and I believe with all of my heart that she is telling me...
“I am a Massachusetts kid — my bloodstream is still one-third Dunkaccino.
“Reader, I need you to trust my judgment,” he writes in the interview.
Though it may seem unbelievable that the ultra health-conscious clan actually eats Munchkins, WSJ’s Jason Gay says it must be true.
WAITER FIRED FOR BEING 'AGGRESSIVE' CLAIMS IT IS HIS FRENCH PERSONALITY“It’s become a thing that we bring it,” she said.
According to People, Bündchen was won over after Brady suggested they bring boxes of Munchkins to their 8-year-old son Benjamin’s hockey practice.
Even still, the mother of two further divulged that she became a Munchkin enthusiast in the most family-friendly way possible.
England Patriots quarterback Tom Brady...
It s a guilty pleasure KFC CANADA DEBUTS WAFFLE DOUBLE DOWN SANDWICH The shocking news seemingly contradicts everything about the former Victoria Secret superstar s much buzzed about 80 percent vegetable diet that forbids white sugar white flour MSG caffeine fungus and dairy that she follows alongside her husband New...



**Something goes wrong**
“On paper, they are truly the perfect match but life got in the way.”Though the duo certainly had many sweet moments as newlyweds, they also butted heads over their future together, with Vilchez often feeling insecure about her husband’s commitment to their marriage.”
“They can love you in a way you have never been loved and still not join you on the bridge.”
“This was not an easy decision for either of us because we do love each other very much but sometimes God has other plans,” the pair tell PEOPLE in an exclusive statement.”
““This is the route we have decided to take, and all we request is that you respect our privacy in this delicate matter.”
“Divorce is never easy for anyone, especially not such a public one.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Image zoom Credit: Courtesy A&EThe pair add that they “remain best of friends and will always be there for each other even if we are not married.”
“We plan to continue to grow our relationship, just without a piece of paper binding us together.”
“We appreciate all the love and support you have all shown us during our marriage and hope you continue to support us during this time Image zoom Credit Courtesy A E After their split was announced Vilchez shared the couple s joint statement to Instagram where she added tomyachts Still...”
“...love you though and also opened up about their decision to call it quits...”
““Someone can be madly in love with you and still not be ready.”


On paper, they are truly the perfect match but life got in the way.”Though the duo certainly had many sweet moments as newlyweds, they also butted heads over their future together, with Vilchez often feeling insecure about her husband’s commitment to their marriage.
They can love you in a way you have never been loved and still not join you on the bridge.
This was not an easy decision for either of us because we do love each other very much but sometimes God has other plans,” the pair tell PEOPLE in an exclusive statement.
“This is the route we have decided to take, and all we request is that you respect our privacy in this delicate matter.
Divorce is never easy for anyone, especially not such a public one.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.
Image zoom Credit: Courtesy A&EThe pair add that they “remain best of friends and will always be there for each other even if we are not married.
We plan to continue to grow our relationship, just without a piece of paper binding us together.
We appreciate all the love and support you have all shown us during our marriage and hope you continue to support us during this time Image zoom Credit Courtesy A E After their split was announced Vilchez shared the couple s joint statement to Instagram where she added tomyachts Still...
...love you though and also opened up about their decision to call it quits...
“Someone can be madly in love with you and still not be ready.



Number  167
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'I try to make a rule let's not talk about the kids, but it's impossible.'”
“Perfect face: The wife of Brian Austin Green also had her makeup nicely done with black eye liner and neutral tones on her lids and lips.”
“The temptress from Tennessee modeled a black lace bra with a cross in front as well as tiny lace panties that pulled up over her hips.”
“The mother of three was laying down on a wood porch as she stared up at the camera.”
“In another set, the New Girl star was wearing black.”
“Her hair was worn down in soft beach waves.”
“The wife of Brian Austin Green also had her makeup nicely done with black eye liner and neutral tones on her lids and lips.”
“At one point the Crimes Of Fashion star put a white lace fringed wrap around her arms...”
“Her hair was worn down in soft beach waves A little covered up At one point the Crimes Of Fashion star put a white lace fringed wrap around her arms Just lazing about in Southern California The star looked relaxed for the shoot which may have taken place in Malibu...”
“The Ocean Ave vet also had on high-waisted lace undies which has been the style these days for young women who want to avoid pantie lines on the hips.”


'I try to make a rule let's not talk about the kids, but it's impossible.'
Perfect face: The wife of Brian Austin Green also had her makeup nicely done with black eye liner and neutral tones on her lids and lips.
The temptress from Tennessee modeled a black lace bra with a cross in front as well as tiny lace panties that pulled up over her hips.
The mother of three was laying down on a wood porch as she stared up at the camera.
In another set, the New Girl star was wearing black.
Her hair was worn down in soft beach waves.
The wife of Brian Austin Green also had her makeup nicely done with black eye liner and neutral tones on her lids and lips.
At one point the Crimes Of Fashion star put a white lace fringed wrap around her arms...
Her hair was worn down in soft beach waves A little covered up At one point the Crimes Of Fashion star put a white lace fringed wrap around her arms Just lazing about in Southern California The star looked relaxed for the shoot which may have taken place in Malibu...
The Ocean Ave vet also had on high-waisted lace undies which has been the style these days for young women who want to avoid pantie lines on the hips.



Number  168
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Both would make for interesting seasons.”
“Rumors say it will be Sean, but don’t count Arie out.”
“My two bets would be Arie and Sean Lowe, the insurance agent who made it all the way to the final three in Curacao only to be let go.”
“With another season of The Bachelorette in the record books, who will be the next man chosen to be on The Bachelor?”
“If she had chosen Arie, their relationship would most likely have suffered.”
“Jef, on the other hand, is the much safer bet: not only does his job seem very flexible, but also he expressed his feelings to Emily whereas Arie demonstrated them physically and sexually.”
“But, I can tell you that they definitely have a better shot at working out than she would have had with Arie, whose fast-paced racecar driver lifestyle would be difficult to juggle with a family.”
“Only time will tell.”
“Will Jef and Emily last?”
“However, Emily has not yet read the diary, and she revealed as much last night on the live portion of the show when she took out the diary which was still inside a sealed envelope.”


Both would make for interesting seasons.
Rumors say it will be Sean, but don’t count Arie out.
My two bets would be Arie and Sean Lowe, the insurance agent who made it all the way to the final three in Curacao only to be let go.
With another season of The Bachelorette in the record books, who will be the next man chosen to be on The Bachelor?
If she had chosen Arie, their relationship would most likely have suffered.
Jef, on the other hand, is the much safer bet: not only does his job seem very flexible, but also he expressed his feelings to Emily whereas Arie demonstrated them physically and sexually.
But, I can tell you that they definitely have a better shot at working out than she would have had with Arie, whose fast-paced racecar driver lifestyle would be difficult to juggle with a family.
Only time will tell.
Will Jef and Emily last?
However, Emily has not yet read the diary, and she revealed as much last night on the live portion of the show when she took out the diary which was still inside a sealed envelope.



Number  169
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The conclusion was that The most important thing is the balancing act...”
“Instead, you have to work that out for yourself so that your family will get enough attention and quality time together.”
“AdvertisementThis whole thing is about finding that and about regularly not make yourself feel guilty.”
“She said that it’s pretty much like checks and balances kind of thing where you put in the good quality time, so you will feel a little bit better about working the next day.”
“She also stated that for her this is absorbing because of the fact that it will be really busy and then she will have a bit of time where it isn’t quite as busy.”
“But the weekends is really when I get to spend the time with them.’Jenna said that the most important thing is the balancing act and the process of learning the complete balance act.”
“Even the everyday little things like picking them up from school are a big deal, so I drop them off at school most mornings and try to get home for bedtime.”
“‘Some of those milestones or moments, you want to be there for every single one and it’s not realistic when you’re working, but for me, that’s what gets me.”
“Jessica stated that feeling like you are missing some critical moment will lead to some nasty conclusions such as the fact that a mother might not even realize that her kid’s shoes are now too small for him or her.”
“The two women discussed balancing work with family time at a beach party celebrating the launch of their new Havaianas Mommy & Me flip-flops collection which is sponsored by the Baby2baby charity.”


The conclusion was that The most important thing is the balancing act...
Instead, you have to work that out for yourself so that your family will get enough attention and quality time together.
AdvertisementThis whole thing is about finding that and about regularly not make yourself feel guilty.
She said that it’s pretty much like checks and balances kind of thing where you put in the good quality time, so you will feel a little bit better about working the next day.
She also stated that for her this is absorbing because of the fact that it will be really busy and then she will have a bit of time where it isn’t quite as busy.
But the weekends is really when I get to spend the time with them.’Jenna said that the most important thing is the balancing act and the process of learning the complete balance act.
Even the everyday little things like picking them up from school are a big deal, so I drop them off at school most mornings and try to get home for bedtime.
‘Some of those milestones or moments, you want to be there for every single one and it’s not realistic when you’re working, but for me, that’s what gets me.
Jessica stated that feeling like you are missing some critical moment will lead to some nasty conclusions such as the fact that a mother might not even realize that her kid’s shoes are now too small for him or her.
The two women discussed balancing work with family time at a beach party celebrating the launch of their new Havaianas Mommy & Me flip-flops collection which is sponsored by the Baby2baby charity.



Number  170
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do you want to see Melo and La La get back together, HollywoodLifers?”
“Laura annulled Kim’s marriage with Kris Humphries, 32, so if and when La La does feel like she’s ready to pull the plug on her marriage, she has the right professional to help her out.”
“One of the first people celebrating the ‘Power’ star’s special day was her estranged husband, Carmelo Anthony.”
“Melo called her ‘beautiful’ and despite the split, she was still his everything.”
“Carmelo Anthony, 33, and La La Anthony may have split, but that wasn’t going to stop the New York Knicks star from celebrating La La’s 38th birthday on June 26.”
“Right after the clock turned 12:00 AM ET, Melo hit up Instagram to be one of the first to wish his estranged wife (and mother of his son) a happy day.”
“Melo posted a picture of La La looking gorgeous, writing ‘HAPPY BDAY’ on the pic.”
“Yet, it was the post’s caption that contained his truly heartfelt message.”
““I look at you on this birthday and it is hard to believe another year has passed.”
“You are as beautiful now as ever before!!”


Do you want to see Melo and La La get back together, HollywoodLifers?
Laura annulled Kim’s marriage with Kris Humphries, 32, so if and when La La does feel like she’s ready to pull the plug on her marriage, she has the right professional to help her out.
One of the first people celebrating the ‘Power’ star’s special day was her estranged husband, Carmelo Anthony.
Melo called her ‘beautiful’ and despite the split, she was still his everything.
Carmelo Anthony, 33, and La La Anthony may have split, but that wasn’t going to stop the New York Knicks star from celebrating La La’s 38th birthday on June 26.
Right after the clock turned 12:00 AM ET, Melo hit up Instagram to be one of the first to wish his estranged wife (and mother of his son) a happy day.
Melo posted a picture of La La looking gorgeous, writing ‘HAPPY BDAY’ on the pic.
Yet, it was the post’s caption that contained his truly heartfelt message.
“I look at you on this birthday and it is hard to believe another year has passed.
You are as beautiful now as ever before!!



Number  171
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Look back on Danielle and Marty's destination wedding trip, below.”
“Sure in New York City.”
“Danielle Staub's road to the altar hasn't exactly been a smooth one, as we've seen this season of The Real Housewives of New Jersey.”
“Not only has her wedding prep put a strain on her friendship with Margaret Josephs, but it has also put a microscope on some of the challenges in her relationship with her groom, Marty Caffrey.”
“Specifically, Danielle's revelation in Wednesday night's episode of RHONJ that she doesn't get along with Marty's three children left the rest of the Garden State crew speechless.”
“"I command respect," Danielle shared during the episode.”
“"If you're not going to respect me, stay out of my space."”
“Marty then said that no one is responsible for how this situation turned out, and he concluded the conversation by expressing how painful it has been to see his kids and his future wife at odds.”
“"I chose you at the detriment of them and my relationship with them," he said to Danielle on RHONJ.”
“"And therefore, we have to move on.”


Look back on Danielle and Marty's destination wedding trip, below.
Sure in New York City.
Danielle Staub's road to the altar hasn't exactly been a smooth one, as we've seen this season of The Real Housewives of New Jersey.
Not only has her wedding prep put a strain on her friendship with Margaret Josephs, but it has also put a microscope on some of the challenges in her relationship with her groom, Marty Caffrey.
Specifically, Danielle's revelation in Wednesday night's episode of RHONJ that she doesn't get along with Marty's three children left the rest of the Garden State crew speechless.
"I command respect," Danielle shared during the episode.
"If you're not going to respect me, stay out of my space."
Marty then said that no one is responsible for how this situation turned out, and he concluded the conversation by expressing how painful it has been to see his kids and his future wife at odds.
"I chose you at the detriment of them and my relationship with them," he said to Danielle on RHONJ.
"And therefore, we have to move on.



Number  172
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Car rules are being laid down tonight!””
“Not so much…“[She] thought it was ok to drive home and take her sister out for ice cream without asking,” Beador said.”
“So did the teen take her first spin as a legal driver to check in on her mom?”
“...now As for Sophie well she ended up staying at the DMV and passing her tests to get her license...”
“I was sitting in the DMV parking lot with blood spewing out everywhere RELATED VIDEO RHOC s Shannon Beador Reveals She Lost 15 Pounds and Has 25 Pounds to Go After an afternoon of medical attention the reality star was able to heal and assured her followers everything is okay...”
““Sophie had to call 911.”
“I feel horrible for traumatizing her today,” Beador said.”
““Poor Sophie.”
“Image zoom Shannon Beador | Credit: Jerod Harris/WireImageIt couldn’t have happened at a worse time for the mother of three either, as she was driving her eldest daughter Sophie to the Department of Motor Vehicles where the teen was taking her road test.”
““It started gushing out of my nose, down my throat, and out of my left eye,” Beador, 53, explained on Instagram of her condition, captioning a photo taken of her from the hospital.”


“Car rules are being laid down tonight!”
Not so much…“[She] thought it was ok to drive home and take her sister out for ice cream without asking,” Beador said.
So did the teen take her first spin as a legal driver to check in on her mom?
...now As for Sophie well she ended up staying at the DMV and passing her tests to get her license...
I was sitting in the DMV parking lot with blood spewing out everywhere RELATED VIDEO RHOC s Shannon Beador Reveals She Lost 15 Pounds and Has 25 Pounds to Go After an afternoon of medical attention the reality star was able to heal and assured her followers everything is okay...
“Sophie had to call 911.
I feel horrible for traumatizing her today,” Beador said.
“Poor Sophie.
Image zoom Shannon Beador | Credit: Jerod Harris/WireImageIt couldn’t have happened at a worse time for the mother of three either, as she was driving her eldest daughter Sophie to the Department of Motor Vehicles where the teen was taking her road test.
“It started gushing out of my nose, down my throat, and out of my left eye,” Beador, 53, explained on Instagram of her condition, captioning a photo taken of her from the hospital.



Number  173
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'Basically, I have an eating disorder.'”
“A statement at the time read: 'Aaron has decided to enter a facility to improve his health and work on his overall wellness.”
“The I Want Candy hitmaker checked into a treatment facility in September to 'improve his health and work on his overall wellness,' and E!”
“News reports he has left the centre after completing a two month program.”
“Aaron, 29, appears to already be back making music as he took to Instagram on Thursday to share a snap of himself looking at his computer from inside the recording studio.”
“Scroll down for video Checked out Aaron Carter has reportedly left rehab after two months and appears to already be back making music as he shared a snap of himself in the studio on Thursday He captioned the black and white image focused as fans wished him well in the...”
“...comments section and begged him to release more singles...”
“Earlier this month, the star shared a shirtless before and after picture as he revealed he was happier, healthier and determined to get back into the studio.”
“He captioned the image: 'This is my before and after pics.”
“I went from 115 to 160 pounds in two months I feel amazing.”


'Basically, I have an eating disorder.'
A statement at the time read: 'Aaron has decided to enter a facility to improve his health and work on his overall wellness.
The I Want Candy hitmaker checked into a treatment facility in September to 'improve his health and work on his overall wellness,' and E!
News reports he has left the centre after completing a two month program.
Aaron, 29, appears to already be back making music as he took to Instagram on Thursday to share a snap of himself looking at his computer from inside the recording studio.
Scroll down for video Checked out Aaron Carter has reportedly left rehab after two months and appears to already be back making music as he shared a snap of himself in the studio on Thursday He captioned the black and white image focused as fans wished him well in the...
...comments section and begged him to release more singles...
Earlier this month, the star shared a shirtless before and after picture as he revealed he was happier, healthier and determined to get back into the studio.
He captioned the image: 'This is my before and after pics.
I went from 115 to 160 pounds in two months I feel amazing.



Number  174
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““They’re just taking it slow and enjoying their time together.””
“Christina El Moussa: I Leaned on My Kids and Friends Through the Divorce“Christina respects that he is a great father; he’s always present when it comes to his children and isn’t distracted by his phone and social media,” the source added.”
“For more on Christina, pick up the latest issue of PEOPLE, on newsstands FridayEl Moussa has daughter Taylor, 6, and son Brayden, who turns 2 in August, with her ex, while Spedding is a dad of six.”
“Image zoom Credit: Mr Plow/BACKGRID“Their children are only a few years apart, so they’ve been doing a lot of activities with the kids: ice skating, swimming, BBQs, just low-key stuff at home,” a source told PEOPLE.”
“The Flip or Flop star was all smiles during the mini-getaway as she reconnected with her former flame – El Moussa was linked to Spedding before her marriage to Tarek.”
“Photos of the sweet display showed El Moussa in a tiny, striped bikini as she cuddled up to Spedding, who wore a t-shirt and jeans, on the deck of her boat in Newport Beach, California.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“And things seemed to be heating up between the new couple earlier this week, as they were spotted enjoying a romantic boat outing on Independence Day.”
“The reality star has been dating 55-year-old businessman Doug Spedding since splitting from her now-ex-husband, Tarek.”
“Christina El Moussa just can't get enough of her new beau Doug SpeddingBikini-Clad Christina El Moussa and Her New Man Celebrate Fourth of July with Romantic Boat TripChristina El Moussa just can’t get enough of her new beau.”


“They’re just taking it slow and enjoying their time together.”
Christina El Moussa: I Leaned on My Kids and Friends Through the Divorce“Christina respects that he is a great father; he’s always present when it comes to his children and isn’t distracted by his phone and social media,” the source added.
For more on Christina, pick up the latest issue of PEOPLE, on newsstands FridayEl Moussa has daughter Taylor, 6, and son Brayden, who turns 2 in August, with her ex, while Spedding is a dad of six.
Image zoom Credit: Mr Plow/BACKGRID“Their children are only a few years apart, so they’ve been doing a lot of activities with the kids: ice skating, swimming, BBQs, just low-key stuff at home,” a source told PEOPLE.
The Flip or Flop star was all smiles during the mini-getaway as she reconnected with her former flame – El Moussa was linked to Spedding before her marriage to Tarek.
Photos of the sweet display showed El Moussa in a tiny, striped bikini as she cuddled up to Spedding, who wore a t-shirt and jeans, on the deck of her boat in Newport Beach, California.
Get push notifications with news, features and more.
And things seemed to be heating up between the new couple earlier this week, as they were spotted enjoying a romantic boat outing on Independence Day.
The reality star has been dating 55-year-old businessman Doug Spedding since splitting from her now-ex-husband, Tarek.
Christina El Moussa just can't get enough of her new beau Doug SpeddingBikini-Clad Christina El Moussa and Her New Man Celebrate Fourth of July with Romantic Boat TripChristina El Moussa just can’t get enough of her new beau.



Number  175
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED CONTENT:5 Coat Trends That Are Huge For FallPriyanka Chopra Proves You Can Wear Fall's It Trend to the AirportMeghan Markle's Favorite Footwear Line & Cindy Crawford Designed the Only Travel Shoes You NeedRelated Gallery...”
“Prices listed are subject to change by the retailer.”
“Embed Code RestartEach product has been selected, and each product’s style has been reviewed, by our editorial team; however, we may receive affiliate commissions from some links to products on this page.”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“...because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors...”
“Shine Down Puffer Coat 228 Universal Standard Universal Standard Kanda Puffer 230 The North Face The North Face 1996 Retro Season Nuptse Jacket 249 Shopbop Hunter Boots Original Puffer Jacket 250 For more celebrity fashion see below How To Wear Boots As Inspired by Selena Gomez This video is unavailable...”
“GET THE LOOK Aritzia Tna The Super Puff 228 H M H M x Tiffany Young Padded Jacket 40 Uniqlo Uniqlo Women Seamless Down Parka 130 Urban Outfitters Fila UO Nariko Cropped Puffer Jacket 150 J Crew J Crew Metallic Short Puffer Jacket With Primaloft 198 Gap Gap Long High...”
“Shop the It girl's exact one ahead -- available in 14 other colors from black to lavender -- along with our other favorite picks.”
“So if you're looking for a coat that'll actually do the job in freezing temps, but will still look fashion-forward, take note from the KUWTK star and try the voluminous puffer on for size.”
“Fellow celebs Bella Hadid, Emma Roberts and Karlie Kloss have added the $228 piece to their fall/winter wardrobe.”


RELATED CONTENT:5 Coat Trends That Are Huge For FallPriyanka Chopra Proves You Can Wear Fall's It Trend to the AirportMeghan Markle's Favorite Footwear Line & Cindy Crawford Designed the Only Travel Shoes You NeedRelated Gallery...
Prices listed are subject to change by the retailer.
Embed Code RestartEach product has been selected, and each product’s style has been reviewed, by our editorial team; however, we may receive affiliate commissions from some links to products on this page.
If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.
...because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors...
Shine Down Puffer Coat 228 Universal Standard Universal Standard Kanda Puffer 230 The North Face The North Face 1996 Retro Season Nuptse Jacket 249 Shopbop Hunter Boots Original Puffer Jacket 250 For more celebrity fashion see below How To Wear Boots As Inspired by Selena Gomez This video is unavailable...
GET THE LOOK Aritzia Tna The Super Puff 228 H M H M x Tiffany Young Padded Jacket 40 Uniqlo Uniqlo Women Seamless Down Parka 130 Urban Outfitters Fila UO Nariko Cropped Puffer Jacket 150 J Crew J Crew Metallic Short Puffer Jacket With Primaloft 198 Gap Gap Long High...
Shop the It girl's exact one ahead -- available in 14 other colors from black to lavender -- along with our other favorite picks.
So if you're looking for a coat that'll actually do the job in freezing temps, but will still look fashion-forward, take note from the KUWTK star and try the voluminous puffer on for size.
Fellow celebs Bella Hadid, Emma Roberts and Karlie Kloss have added the $228 piece to their fall/winter wardrobe.



**Something goes wrong**
“Sabbag also mentioned unspecified recordings but says she had nothing to do with them.”
“She says she's a recording artist and actress, and hasn't broken any laws.”
“Sabbag says that since her involvement with Hart, her name and pictures have become public and lies have been written about her.”
“He also said someone was trying to seek financial gain from his mistake and he'd rather confess than let that happen.”
“...judgment...”
“Montia Sabbag mahn tee uh suh bahg spoke to reporters at her lawyer s Los Angeles office Wednesday following Hart s weekend apology to his pregnant wife and children via an Instagram video for what he called an error in...”
“...an extortionist...”
“Montia Sabbag at a press conference called to discuss Kevin Hart extortion scandal Frederick M Brown Stringer LOS ANGELES AP A woman has come forward to say she was involved with Kevin Hart a month ago but she is not...”
“LOS ANGELES (AP) — A woman has come forward to say she was involved with Kevin Hart a month ago but she is not an extortionist.”


Sabbag also mentioned unspecified recordings but says she had nothing to do with them.
She says she's a recording artist and actress, and hasn't broken any laws.
Sabbag says that since her involvement with Hart, her name and pictures have become public and lies have been written about her.
He also said someone was trying to seek financial gain from his mistake and he'd rather confess than let that happen.
...judgment...
Montia Sabbag mahn tee uh suh bahg spoke to reporters at her lawyer s Los Angeles office Wednesday following Hart s weekend apology to his pregnant wife and children via an Instagram video for what he called an error in...
...an extortionist...
Montia Sabbag at a press conference called to discuss Kevin Hart extortion scandal Frederick M Brown Stringer LOS ANGELES AP A woman has come forward to say she was involved with Kevin Hart a month ago but she is not...
LOS ANGELES (AP) — A woman has come forward to say she was involved with Kevin Hart a month ago but she is not an extortionist.



Number  177
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read more from Yahoo Entertainment:”
“...is a ratings hit, but we’re sure Palin’s free publicity didn’t hurt.”
“— and the network is firmly supporting its star.”
“Sarah Palin was one of the many political figures duped by the comedian, and she alleged that Cohen posed as a veteran for their awkward sit-down.”
“The actor via his character, Billy Wayne Ruddick Jr., PhD, denied saying he was a “war vet” to gain access to the former Republican vice presidential candidate, and Showtime is backing Cohen up, pointing to Sunday’s premiere episode as proof.”
““There has been widespread misinformation over the past week about the character of Billy Wayne Ruddick Jr., Ph.D., performed by Sacha Baron Cohen on the SHOWTIME comedy series WHO IS AMERICA?” the statement begins.”
““Baron Cohen did not present himself as a disabled veteran, and viewers nationwide who watched the premiere on Sunday can now attest to that.”
“In Sunday s episode during an interview with Senator Bernie Sanders Baron Cohen in character as Dr Ruddick was asked by the Senator if he is disabled and he stated that he is not and uses a mobility scooter to conserve his energy It s true Sanders blatantly asked Cohen...”
“...who was in disguise if he has a disability Cohen replied No I don t...”
“This here scooter is to conserve my body s finite energy Showtime s statement continues In addition Baron Cohen never presented himself as a veteran of the U S military to former Alaska Governor Sarah Palin during the booking process or during the filming of her interview and contrary to...”


Read more from Yahoo Entertainment:
...is a ratings hit, but we’re sure Palin’s free publicity didn’t hurt.
— and the network is firmly supporting its star.
Sarah Palin was one of the many political figures duped by the comedian, and she alleged that Cohen posed as a veteran for their awkward sit-down.
The actor via his character, Billy Wayne Ruddick Jr., PhD, denied saying he was a “war vet” to gain access to the former Republican vice presidential candidate, and Showtime is backing Cohen up, pointing to Sunday’s premiere episode as proof.
“There has been widespread misinformation over the past week about the character of Billy Wayne Ruddick Jr., Ph.D., performed by Sacha Baron Cohen on the SHOWTIME comedy series WHO IS AMERICA?” the statement begins.
“Baron Cohen did not present himself as a disabled veteran, and viewers nationwide who watched the premiere on Sunday can now attest to that.
In Sunday s episode during an interview with Senator Bernie Sanders Baron Cohen in character as Dr Ruddick was asked by the Senator if he is disabled and he stated that he is not and uses a mobility scooter to conserve his energy It s true Sanders blatantly asked Cohen...
...who was in disguise if he has a disability Cohen replied No I don t...
This here scooter is to conserve my body s finite energy Showtime s statement continues In addition Baron Cohen never presented himself as a veteran of the U S military to former Alaska Governor Sarah Palin during the booking process or during the filming of her interview and contrary to...



Number  178
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ellie KemperFrazer Harrison / Getty ImagesThe "Unbreakable Kimmy Schmidt" star is known for being adorable, but this beaded navy dress is downright sexy!”
“"Modern Family" star Ariel Winter is never afraid to push the boundaries and that includes this outfit.”
“Jessica BielFrazer Harrison / Getty ImagesIs Jessica Biel a Grecian goddess?”
“We love how she matched her eye makeup as well.”
“Chrissy MetzJordan Strauss / APThis deep teal color was made for Chrissy Metz!”
“And the "Saturday Night Live" star owns it!”
“Kate McKinnonFrazer Harrison / Getty ImagesThis minimalist black-and-white dress has more than meets the eye; the cool cut-out bodice for one.”
“And check out that rocking new haircut!”
“The "Top Chef" host looks lovely in this mermaid-style gown with a sweetheart neckline.”
“Padma LakshmiFrazer Harrison / Getty ImagesThis color should be renamed Padma Pink!”


Ellie KemperFrazer Harrison / Getty ImagesThe "Unbreakable Kimmy Schmidt" star is known for being adorable, but this beaded navy dress is downright sexy!
"Modern Family" star Ariel Winter is never afraid to push the boundaries and that includes this outfit.
Jessica BielFrazer Harrison / Getty ImagesIs Jessica Biel a Grecian goddess?
We love how she matched her eye makeup as well.
Chrissy MetzJordan Strauss / APThis deep teal color was made for Chrissy Metz!
And the "Saturday Night Live" star owns it!
Kate McKinnonFrazer Harrison / Getty ImagesThis minimalist black-and-white dress has more than meets the eye; the cool cut-out bodice for one.
And check out that rocking new haircut!
The "Top Chef" host looks lovely in this mermaid-style gown with a sweetheart neckline.
Padma LakshmiFrazer Harrison / Getty ImagesThis color should be renamed Padma Pink!



Number  179
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...it anymore...”
“And I feel like it s either going to succeed or not and if it succeeds again a whole new generation will be exposed to the beauty of what Charmed was able to be for people and if it doesn t succeed then we don t have to hear about...”
“Now the third sister is sharing her thoughts.”
““I wish that they would have come to us and we would have been involved since the beginning,” Alyssa Milano said during an interview with Entertainment Tonight.”
“But having said that I do hope that it reaches the newer generation and impacts that generation the way ours was able to do for its generation The CW greenlit the self described fierce funny feminist reboot with Sarah Jeffery Melonie Diaz and Madeleine Mantock as three sisters who discover...”
“...they re actually witches...”
“They must then try to balance their life in a college town with supernatural demon-hunting.”
“Milano costarred with Combs and Doherty in the original series.”
“Rose McGowan came on as long-lost half sister Paige when Doherty’s Prue character was killed off.”
“Combs, especially, has been very vocal about the reboot.”


...it anymore...
And I feel like it s either going to succeed or not and if it succeeds again a whole new generation will be exposed to the beauty of what Charmed was able to be for people and if it doesn t succeed then we don t have to hear about...
Now the third sister is sharing her thoughts.
“I wish that they would have come to us and we would have been involved since the beginning,” Alyssa Milano said during an interview with Entertainment Tonight.
But having said that I do hope that it reaches the newer generation and impacts that generation the way ours was able to do for its generation The CW greenlit the self described fierce funny feminist reboot with Sarah Jeffery Melonie Diaz and Madeleine Mantock as three sisters who discover...
...they re actually witches...
They must then try to balance their life in a college town with supernatural demon-hunting.
Milano costarred with Combs and Doherty in the original series.
Rose McGowan came on as long-lost half sister Paige when Doherty’s Prue character was killed off.
Combs, especially, has been very vocal about the reboot.



Number  180
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“"When it's not funny, she calls me out.”
“The 46-year-old actor has revealed that he actually had the opportunity to audition for Friends, the sitcom that made his wife a household name, more than 20 years ago.”
“His reason for skipping the audition that could have changed his life?”
“He wanted a lie in.”
“Theroux told Mr Porter that he "didn't bother" to turn up, admitting: "I slept in that day."”
“He then went on to add that it was probably for the best because, had he got the gig, he "wouldn't have been prepared for [the fame]".”
“ImaxtreeThe actor, screenwriter and director (he co-wrote Tropic Thunder and Zoolander 2 with friend Ben Stiller) also revealed how Aniston often sense checks his jokes.”
“She says, 'That's not funny'," he said.”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”


You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...
"When it's not funny, she calls me out.
The 46-year-old actor has revealed that he actually had the opportunity to audition for Friends, the sitcom that made his wife a household name, more than 20 years ago.
His reason for skipping the audition that could have changed his life?
He wanted a lie in.
Theroux told Mr Porter that he "didn't bother" to turn up, admitting: "I slept in that day."
He then went on to add that it was probably for the best because, had he got the gig, he "wouldn't have been prepared for [the fame]".
ImaxtreeThe actor, screenwriter and director (he co-wrote Tropic Thunder and Zoolander 2 with friend Ben Stiller) also revealed how Aniston often sense checks his jokes.
She says, 'That's not funny'," he said.
This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.



Number  181
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“However, people on Twitter were mostly unimpressed with his justification, and it was enough to prompt the network to completely sever ties with him.”
“He also speculated as to the capability of a child to make decisions about their gender identity.”
“Today was no different.”Dillard continued to respond to his latest statements, saying that he’s just trying to have a mature discussion about his concerns as a Christian.”
“Gender is not fluid; it’s ordained by God.”Jennings, who hasn’t directly responded to Dillard’s latest comments, said at the time:“Every day I experience cyber-bullying, but I keep sharing my story.”
“'Transgender' is a myth.”
“As previously reported, Dillard, who came to fame alongside his wife Jill Duggar on TLC, previously took issue with Jennings saying that gender is “ordained by God.”“What an oxymoron… a 'reality' show which follows a non-reality.”
“Again, nothing against him, just unfortunate what’s on tv these days,” he wrote in response to another commenter who brought up his older comments about Jennings.”
“It’s sad that ppl would use a juvenile this way.”
““I pity Jazz, 4 those who take advantage of him in order 2 promote their agenda, including the parents who allow these kinds of decisions 2 be made by a child.”
“...use feminine pronouns when discussing Jennings...”


However, people on Twitter were mostly unimpressed with his justification, and it was enough to prompt the network to completely sever ties with him.
He also speculated as to the capability of a child to make decisions about their gender identity.
Today was no different.”Dillard continued to respond to his latest statements, saying that he’s just trying to have a mature discussion about his concerns as a Christian.
Gender is not fluid; it’s ordained by God.”Jennings, who hasn’t directly responded to Dillard’s latest comments, said at the time:“Every day I experience cyber-bullying, but I keep sharing my story.
'Transgender' is a myth.
As previously reported, Dillard, who came to fame alongside his wife Jill Duggar on TLC, previously took issue with Jennings saying that gender is “ordained by God.”“What an oxymoron… a 'reality' show which follows a non-reality.
Again, nothing against him, just unfortunate what’s on tv these days,” he wrote in response to another commenter who brought up his older comments about Jennings.
It’s sad that ppl would use a juvenile this way.
“I pity Jazz, 4 those who take advantage of him in order 2 promote their agenda, including the parents who allow these kinds of decisions 2 be made by a child.
...use feminine pronouns when discussing Jennings...



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I think Meghan's the one who'll bring them into the 21st Century, if they'll let her."”
“She was still very much one of them.”
“He then added, "Princess Diana is credited with changing the Royal Family, but she wasn't perfect.”
“That's not what Diana stood for," he told the newspaper.”
“"[The Royal Family] have Meghan treating her father in a way that Harry's mother, Princess Diana, would have loathed.”
“In addition, he said he didn't care if Harry ever spoke to him again and said his mother, the late , would have been against the treatment he's alleged he's received.”
“"How cold is that?"”
“She doesn't even speak to me now," he said.”
“Any thanks?”
“"And did I get any recognition for it?”


I think Meghan's the one who'll bring them into the 21st Century, if they'll let her."
She was still very much one of them.
He then added, "Princess Diana is credited with changing the Royal Family, but she wasn't perfect.
That's not what Diana stood for," he told the newspaper.
"[The Royal Family] have Meghan treating her father in a way that Harry's mother, Princess Diana, would have loathed.
In addition, he said he didn't care if Harry ever spoke to him again and said his mother, the late , would have been against the treatment he's alleged he's received.
"How cold is that?"
She doesn't even speak to me now," he said.
Any thanks?
"And did I get any recognition for it?



Number  183
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“So put Bathe and Brown up there with celebrity couples who make marriage look pretty darn good.”
“Getty Images | Frazer Harrison2.”
“Just check out his moves below in a video Brown shared on Instagram!”
“Bathe and Brown have shared cute stories about their sons, like how Andrew wants to be a scientist and has quite a personality.”
“But, instead of two girls, they have two boys: 6-year-old Andrew and 2-year-old Amare.”
“They Have Two Cute KidsLike his character, Randall Pearson, from NBC’s “This Is Us,” Brown has two kids with his college-sweetheart wife.”
“3.”
“When Brown decided to finally try to win her back, he did things including chasing after her while she was jogging so he could convince her she was the love his life.”
“She Was Hard To GetAccording to what Brown told “The Talk,” he and Bathe “dated off and on” for a while before breaking up for more than three years at one point.”
“The pair went on to grad school together at New York University.”


So put Bathe and Brown up there with celebrity couples who make marriage look pretty darn good.
Getty Images | Frazer Harrison2.
Just check out his moves below in a video Brown shared on Instagram!
Bathe and Brown have shared cute stories about their sons, like how Andrew wants to be a scientist and has quite a personality.
But, instead of two girls, they have two boys: 6-year-old Andrew and 2-year-old Amare.
They Have Two Cute KidsLike his character, Randall Pearson, from NBC’s “This Is Us,” Brown has two kids with his college-sweetheart wife.
3.
When Brown decided to finally try to win her back, he did things including chasing after her while she was jogging so he could convince her she was the love his life.
She Was Hard To GetAccording to what Brown told “The Talk,” he and Bathe “dated off and on” for a while before breaking up for more than three years at one point.
The pair went on to grad school together at New York University.



Number  184
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s not about that.”Watch her latest explanation of “Swish Swish” on The Tonight Show above.”
“You have to follow your [heart emoji],” Rose wrote in a series of tweets.”
“Perry was even asked by Jimmy Fallon on The Tonight Show Friday whether this song, off her upcoming Witness album, was about “anyone we know.” While the pop diva remained cryptic, she explained the meaning of “Swish Swish” is “liberation” from bullies.”
““I think it’s a great anthem for people to use whenever someone’s trying to hold you down or bully you,” she said.”
“That s kind of what this record is about it s just like a 360 degree liberation If Chained to the Rhythm was about political liberation and Bon Appétit was a sexual liberation then Perry calls Swish Swish the liberation from all the negative that doesn t serve you Perry...”
“...directed her fans to the segment on social media Saturday morning...”
““Here’s some of the tea and a biscuit,” she tweeted.”
“Since “Swish Swish” dropped on Thursday, listeners, including Swift pal Ruby Rose, pointed to the lyrics as a diss track.”
““I’ve always stood up for the people I love and against things I think are cheap or mean spirited.”
“That’s not new.”


It’s not about that.”Watch her latest explanation of “Swish Swish” on The Tonight Show above.
You have to follow your [heart emoji],” Rose wrote in a series of tweets.
Perry was even asked by Jimmy Fallon on The Tonight Show Friday whether this song, off her upcoming Witness album, was about “anyone we know.” While the pop diva remained cryptic, she explained the meaning of “Swish Swish” is “liberation” from bullies.
“I think it’s a great anthem for people to use whenever someone’s trying to hold you down or bully you,” she said.
That s kind of what this record is about it s just like a 360 degree liberation If Chained to the Rhythm was about political liberation and Bon Appétit was a sexual liberation then Perry calls Swish Swish the liberation from all the negative that doesn t serve you Perry...
...directed her fans to the segment on social media Saturday morning...
“Here’s some of the tea and a biscuit,” she tweeted.
Since “Swish Swish” dropped on Thursday, listeners, including Swift pal Ruby Rose, pointed to the lyrics as a diss track.
“I’ve always stood up for the people I love and against things I think are cheap or mean spirited.
That’s not new.



Number  185
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““[He’s] an incredibly nice guy.””
“#miami #alllove #respect.”Lopez was married to Anthony for seven years and the former couple share nine-year-old twins Max and Emme.”
“A Truly captivating performer!”
“Thanks for taking care of my people and I @marcanthony much appreciated!”
“#miami #alllove #respect A post shared by Beau Smart (@beaucaspersmart) on Nov 19, 2017 at 11:26am PSTJ.Lo’s ears must be burning!”
“Two of Jennifer Lopez’s exes, Marc Anthony and Casper Smart, hung out after Anthony’s concert in Miami at the American Airlines Arena over the weekend.”
““If you’ve never seen his show you are really missing out,” the 30-year-old dancer captioned a selfie with the two-time Grammy winner, 49, on Sunday, November 19.”
““A Truly captivating performer!”
“They separated in 2011, and their divorce was finalized in 2014.”


“[He’s] an incredibly nice guy.”
#miami #alllove #respect.”Lopez was married to Anthony for seven years and the former couple share nine-year-old twins Max and Emme.
A Truly captivating performer!
Thanks for taking care of my people and I @marcanthony much appreciated!
#miami #alllove #respect A post shared by Beau Smart (@beaucaspersmart) on Nov 19, 2017 at 11:26am PSTJ.Lo’s ears must be burning!
Two of Jennifer Lopez’s exes, Marc Anthony and Casper Smart, hung out after Anthony’s concert in Miami at the American Airlines Arena over the weekend.
“If you’ve never seen his show you are really missing out,” the 30-year-old dancer captioned a selfie with the two-time Grammy winner, 49, on Sunday, November 19.
“A Truly captivating performer!
They separated in 2011, and their divorce was finalized in 2014.



Number  186
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Five of her albums have cracked the top 10 of the Billboard 200, with the studio albums Revival (2015) and Stars Dance (2013) leading the chart.”
“In 2015 and 2016, she enjoyed top 10 Billboard Hot 100 smashes with “Same Old Love” and “Hands to Myself” and “We Don’t Talk Anymore.” The trend continues, with hits “Bad Liar,” “Fetish” (featuring Gucci Mane) and “It Ain’t Me” (with Kygo) in the past year.”
“We are thrilled to be able to honor her as our Woman of the Year.”Gomez’ career has never been in better shape.”
““She is never afraid to speak her mind and has used her platform to advocate for the needs of others.”
““Not only is Selena soaring on the charts, but she continuously inspires young women everywhere to be authentic, give back and to not be afraid to use their voice,” said John Amato, president of The Hollywood Reporter-Billboard Media Group.”


Five of her albums have cracked the top 10 of the Billboard 200, with the studio albums Revival (2015) and Stars Dance (2013) leading the chart.
In 2015 and 2016, she enjoyed top 10 Billboard Hot 100 smashes with “Same Old Love” and “Hands to Myself” and “We Don’t Talk Anymore.” The trend continues, with hits “Bad Liar,” “Fetish” (featuring Gucci Mane) and “It Ain’t Me” (with Kygo) in the past year.
We are thrilled to be able to honor her as our Woman of the Year.”Gomez’ career has never been in better shape.
“She is never afraid to speak her mind and has used her platform to advocate for the needs of others.
“Not only is Selena soaring on the charts, but she continuously inspires young women everywhere to be authentic, give back and to not be afraid to use their voice,” said John Amato, president of The Hollywood Reporter-Billboard Media Group.



Number  187
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"One of my favorite videos yet..." she wrote.”
“Go get it, girl!”
“In the dramatic new music video for her song "Tell Me You Love Me," which dropped on Friday morning, the pop star and Grey's Anatomy actor Jesse Williams play an engaged couple who head for the aisle despite their tumultuous relationship.”
“You'll have to watch the entire video—clocking in at almost seven minutes—to see how the couple's relationship fares, from proposal to accusations of infidelity to exchanging rings, but it might be tough to focus on anything other than the gorgeous wedding Lovato staged for the clip.”
“The ceremony takes place outside, on a perfectly manicured lawn in the shade of a massive tree with drooping branches.”
“An entire robe-clad gospel choir stands on bleachers behind the wedding party, and the wedding guests sit in simple wooden chairs arranged in rows across the lawn, facing the flower-adorned arch where a pastor waits for Lovato to approach.”
“The "Confident" singer wears a white lace gown with flowing tiers and a strapless sweetheart neckline for her not-so-real nuptials.”
“Like what you see?”
“Lovato's wedding dress is actually Style 3659 by Lazaro and can be purchased at local Lazaro retailers for $4,290.”
“The (fictional) bride completed her look with dewy pink-tinted makeup, and a delicate fingertip veil.”


"One of my favorite videos yet..." she wrote.
Go get it, girl!
In the dramatic new music video for her song "Tell Me You Love Me," which dropped on Friday morning, the pop star and Grey's Anatomy actor Jesse Williams play an engaged couple who head for the aisle despite their tumultuous relationship.
You'll have to watch the entire video—clocking in at almost seven minutes—to see how the couple's relationship fares, from proposal to accusations of infidelity to exchanging rings, but it might be tough to focus on anything other than the gorgeous wedding Lovato staged for the clip.
The ceremony takes place outside, on a perfectly manicured lawn in the shade of a massive tree with drooping branches.
An entire robe-clad gospel choir stands on bleachers behind the wedding party, and the wedding guests sit in simple wooden chairs arranged in rows across the lawn, facing the flower-adorned arch where a pastor waits for Lovato to approach.
The "Confident" singer wears a white lace gown with flowing tiers and a strapless sweetheart neckline for her not-so-real nuptials.
Like what you see?
Lovato's wedding dress is actually Style 3659 by Lazaro and can be purchased at local Lazaro retailers for $4,290.
The (fictional) bride completed her look with dewy pink-tinted makeup, and a delicate fingertip veil.



Number  188
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“No; she was executed, and then everything was back to bad-normal.”
“Oprah is in exile.”
“Her husband confronts her captor in Canada.”
“She delivers her own baby.”
“Even though people died to help her escape at the beginning of the season, she’s determined now to stay in Gilead, because I guess Season 3 has to be about something.”
“One read is that there’s no escaping the suffocation of a subjugating regime.”
“Except within the show, there actually is escaping it — and yet June has decided not to.”
“Season 2 has been dutifully brutal, complete with ample torture, rapes, executions and murders.”
“It gave in to every one of the show’s most tedious instincts, substituting slow stares and endless montage sequences for any actual development or new interiority.”
“Every inch of existence is awful.”


No; she was executed, and then everything was back to bad-normal.
Oprah is in exile.
Her husband confronts her captor in Canada.
She delivers her own baby.
Even though people died to help her escape at the beginning of the season, she’s determined now to stay in Gilead, because I guess Season 3 has to be about something.
One read is that there’s no escaping the suffocation of a subjugating regime.
Except within the show, there actually is escaping it — and yet June has decided not to.
Season 2 has been dutifully brutal, complete with ample torture, rapes, executions and murders.
It gave in to every one of the show’s most tedious instincts, substituting slow stares and endless montage sequences for any actual development or new interiority.
Every inch of existence is awful.



Number  189
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The threesome posed for a photograph together.”
“I’m going to go party now!”AdvertisementIn addition to talking with reporters, Blige was spotted at Vanity Fair’s after-party along with Sean Combs and Kobe Bryant.”
“She said, “Ok, enough talking.”
“Admittedly, Blige was in a hurry to mingle with other celebs.”
“And while Mary was excited to speak with reporters, her mind was focused elsewhere.”
“Mary was on the red carpet because of her performance of the track, “Mighty River,” in the movie Mudbound, a song which received critical acclaim on varying levels.”
“When Zuri asked her if she would like to star in a movie such as Black Panther, Mary said, “I hope so!” Last night, Mary received two Academy Award nominations for the first time.”
“Blige claimed the new Black Panther meant a lot to her and possibly even the culture at large.”
“She said, “I saw some of the cast from Black Panther, which made me excited.”Mary added that it was a real honor to meet Chadwick Boseman as well as Lupita Nyong’O.”
“Mary said, for her, the best moment was meeting and seeing people that she’s always wanted to meet.”


The threesome posed for a photograph together.
I’m going to go party now!”AdvertisementIn addition to talking with reporters, Blige was spotted at Vanity Fair’s after-party along with Sean Combs and Kobe Bryant.
She said, “Ok, enough talking.
Admittedly, Blige was in a hurry to mingle with other celebs.
And while Mary was excited to speak with reporters, her mind was focused elsewhere.
Mary was on the red carpet because of her performance of the track, “Mighty River,” in the movie Mudbound, a song which received critical acclaim on varying levels.
When Zuri asked her if she would like to star in a movie such as Black Panther, Mary said, “I hope so!” Last night, Mary received two Academy Award nominations for the first time.
Blige claimed the new Black Panther meant a lot to her and possibly even the culture at large.
She said, “I saw some of the cast from Black Panther, which made me excited.”Mary added that it was a real honor to meet Chadwick Boseman as well as Lupita Nyong’O.
Mary said, for her, the best moment was meeting and seeing people that she’s always wanted to meet.



**Something goes wrong**
“But in reality, both of us were put against each other,” he said at the time.”
“They wanted angry black guy, they wanted this little white girl.”
““In the media — the media wanted black versus white.”
“Image zoom DeMario Jackson and Corinne Olympios in Octobe | Credit: Broadimage/REX/ShutterstockIn October, Jackson opened up about his friendship with Olympios.”
“The pair has been spotted out and about multiple times over the past few months, sharing a friendly embrace in late August, leaving TAO restaurant in Hollywood in late September, and most recently celebrating Halloween together in Los Angeles.”
“We have fun, and you know, that’s it.”Image zoom DeMario Jackson and Corinne Olympios | Credit: Photographer Group/Splash NewsDespite the BiP sex scandal that rocked season 4’s production last summer, Jackson and Olympios remain close.”
“Further clarifying, “We hang out.”
“We’re really good friends, and you know, we just enjoy each other’s company and we like to take things slow,” Jackson added.”
““Just for the fact that – you know, we’re homies.”
““I can’t wait for tonight,” he said.”


But in reality, both of us were put against each other,” he said at the time.
They wanted angry black guy, they wanted this little white girl.
“In the media — the media wanted black versus white.
Image zoom DeMario Jackson and Corinne Olympios in Octobe | Credit: Broadimage/REX/ShutterstockIn October, Jackson opened up about his friendship with Olympios.
The pair has been spotted out and about multiple times over the past few months, sharing a friendly embrace in late August, leaving TAO restaurant in Hollywood in late September, and most recently celebrating Halloween together in Los Angeles.
We have fun, and you know, that’s it.”Image zoom DeMario Jackson and Corinne Olympios | Credit: Photographer Group/Splash NewsDespite the BiP sex scandal that rocked season 4’s production last summer, Jackson and Olympios remain close.
Further clarifying, “We hang out.
We’re really good friends, and you know, we just enjoy each other’s company and we like to take things slow,” Jackson added.
“Just for the fact that – you know, we’re homies.
“I can’t wait for tonight,” he said.



**Something goes wrong**
“She’s a good woman.”Chapman shares two children, India, 7, and Dashiell, 4, with Weinstein, who she wed in 2007.”
“The filmmaker spent a brief period of time in a sexual rehabilitation facility in Arizona after the allegations surfaced in October.”
“Renee Zellweger’s team is denouncing allegations that she had inappropriate encounters with Harvey Weinstein in order to escalate her career.”
“The claims came to light in a class-action lawsuit that six unnamed women recently filed against Weinstein, alleging that Zellweger, 48, and Charlize Theron both ascended in their professional endeavors by performing “sexual favors” for Weinstien, 65.”
““If Harvey said that, he’s full of shit,” a rep for the Bridget Jones actress, who has starred in several films produced by the former studio exec, including Cold Mountain which she won an Oscar for in 2004, told Us Weekly in a statement on Wednesday, December 7.”
“Weinstein responded to the claims in a statement to Us on Monday, December 11: “Mr.”
“Weinstein vehemently denies these accusations and has never stated he slept with any of them.”
“It’s ridiculous that anyone would believe these talented women, Academy Award winners, provided sexual favors in exchange for roles they earned based on their talent and brilliant work.”
“It’s simply not true.”As previously reported, the former Miramax producer made headlines in October after nearly 30 years of sexual assault and abuse allegations came to light in expośes published by The New York Times and The New Yorker.”
“North of 60 women have accused Weinstein of misconduct to date and he has since been faced with several lawsuits and expelled from the Television Academy.”


She’s a good woman.”Chapman shares two children, India, 7, and Dashiell, 4, with Weinstein, who she wed in 2007.
The filmmaker spent a brief period of time in a sexual rehabilitation facility in Arizona after the allegations surfaced in October.
Renee Zellweger’s team is denouncing allegations that she had inappropriate encounters with Harvey Weinstein in order to escalate her career.
The claims came to light in a class-action lawsuit that six unnamed women recently filed against Weinstein, alleging that Zellweger, 48, and Charlize Theron both ascended in their professional endeavors by performing “sexual favors” for Weinstien, 65.
“If Harvey said that, he’s full of shit,” a rep for the Bridget Jones actress, who has starred in several films produced by the former studio exec, including Cold Mountain which she won an Oscar for in 2004, told Us Weekly in a statement on Wednesday, December 7.
Weinstein responded to the claims in a statement to Us on Monday, December 11: “Mr.
Weinstein vehemently denies these accusations and has never stated he slept with any of them.
It’s ridiculous that anyone would believe these talented women, Academy Award winners, provided sexual favors in exchange for roles they earned based on their talent and brilliant work.
It’s simply not true.”As previously reported, the former Miramax producer made headlines in October after nearly 30 years of sexual assault and abuse allegations came to light in expośes published by The New York Times and The New Yorker.
North of 60 women have accused Weinstein of misconduct to date and he has since been faced with several lawsuits and expelled from the Television Academy.



**Something goes wrong**
“And not being aware: “Wait, what group were we in?”
“Everyone’s been an outsider, especially in adolescence, so who can’t relate to that?”
“I just turned 50, so there are all these chunks of time that I’m measuring things by.”
“Vincent Ventresca (Billy Christianson): It’s crazy.”
“Elaine Hendrix (Lisa Luder): Twenty years really sneaks up on you.”
“It feels like just yesterday.”
“Julia Campbell (Christy Masters): I was shocked when my agent told me.”
“But I suppose it does make sense mathematically.”
“Alan Cumming (Sandy Frink): It’s terrifying.”
“Lisa Kudrow (Michele Weinberger): I saw it in my mind as something that was 10 years ago, then my husband reminded me that it was 20.”


And not being aware: “Wait, what group were we in?
Everyone’s been an outsider, especially in adolescence, so who can’t relate to that?
I just turned 50, so there are all these chunks of time that I’m measuring things by.
Vincent Ventresca (Billy Christianson): It’s crazy.
Elaine Hendrix (Lisa Luder): Twenty years really sneaks up on you.
It feels like just yesterday.
Julia Campbell (Christy Masters): I was shocked when my agent told me.
But I suppose it does make sense mathematically.
Alan Cumming (Sandy Frink): It’s terrifying.
Lisa Kudrow (Michele Weinberger): I saw it in my mind as something that was 10 years ago, then my husband reminded me that it was 20.



Number  193
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...all of the hidden gems and unbelievable surprises within Tivan s collection but we did find quite a few enough to send you back through the ride a few times over...”
“As the story goes Tivan likes to collect items from across the galaxy which includes Disney parks of course and secret nods to older attractions and characters is also a Disney tradition We re certain we didn t find them...”
“Plenty of odes to vintage Disneyland rides, including its predecessor the Tower of Terror , are tucked inside, too.”
“...delights for comic book aficionado...”
“Tivan s two offices and the gantry lift deck are packed with so many secret Marvel Easter eggs that unless you re seeking them out in the dimly lit rooms you d never know they exist There aren t just...”
“Yet, it’s further into the queue where things get interesting.”
“...its own universe separate from the comics and films there are intriguing Marvel items throughout the Fortress like Kree artifacts the Warlock s Eye and an audio animatronic Cosmo test dog...”
“The ride building which serves as the fortress of Taneleer The Collector Tivan is bursting with vintage Disney props and Marvel weaponry including some that may be in films that aren t even out yet Though the attraction exists in...”
“You’re bound to expect frightening drops, chaotic thrills and laughs on behalf of Rocket Raccoon from the new “Guardians of the Galaxy” attraction at Disneyland, but trust that your wait in line will be anything but boring.”


...all of the hidden gems and unbelievable surprises within Tivan s collection but we did find quite a few enough to send you back through the ride a few times over...
As the story goes Tivan likes to collect items from across the galaxy which includes Disney parks of course and secret nods to older attractions and characters is also a Disney tradition We re certain we didn t find them...
Plenty of odes to vintage Disneyland rides, including its predecessor the Tower of Terror , are tucked inside, too.
...delights for comic book aficionado...
Tivan s two offices and the gantry lift deck are packed with so many secret Marvel Easter eggs that unless you re seeking them out in the dimly lit rooms you d never know they exist There aren t just...
Yet, it’s further into the queue where things get interesting.
...its own universe separate from the comics and films there are intriguing Marvel items throughout the Fortress like Kree artifacts the Warlock s Eye and an audio animatronic Cosmo test dog...
The ride building which serves as the fortress of Taneleer The Collector Tivan is bursting with vintage Disney props and Marvel weaponry including some that may be in films that aren t even out yet Though the attraction exists in...
You’re bound to expect frightening drops, chaotic thrills and laughs on behalf of Rocket Raccoon from the new “Guardians of the Galaxy” attraction at Disneyland, but trust that your wait in line will be anything but boring.



Number  194
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After news got out, the star told TMZ that 'everything's fine.'”
“TMZ is reporting that Justin's tour crew was completely blindsided by the sudden move, saying that no warning nor explanation were given before the announcement that put 200 people out of work.”
“The Canadian singer, who has an 'intense' relationship with Lentz, was also described as the 'Tom Cruise of that church''No!”
“The bright fabric stretched up from underneath a pair of black sneakers.”
“The Canada native completed the eccentric ensemble with color-blocked white, yellow, and blue socks that reached the middle of his calves.”
“The A-lister paired the simple garment with colourful, leaf-patterned basketball shorts that boasted overly-long drawstrings and flashed his toned legs.”
“The 23-year-old sported a plain, white T-shirt that exposed the partial sleeves of tattoos etched on his arms.”
“...lunch at the popular sushi spot...”
“While sources told the online publication that the church did not advocate the cancellation of his tour it was mentioned He made his decision based on spiritual soul searching and his own view of the path in life he should be taking The scandalised celebrity kept it casual while getting...”
“According to TMZ: The decision stems from his relationship with Hillsong Church founder Carl Lentz, which allowed him to reflect on the 'own view on the path in life he should be taking'Leaving music behind?”


After news got out, the star told TMZ that 'everything's fine.'
TMZ is reporting that Justin's tour crew was completely blindsided by the sudden move, saying that no warning nor explanation were given before the announcement that put 200 people out of work.
The Canadian singer, who has an 'intense' relationship with Lentz, was also described as the 'Tom Cruise of that church''No!
The bright fabric stretched up from underneath a pair of black sneakers.
The Canada native completed the eccentric ensemble with color-blocked white, yellow, and blue socks that reached the middle of his calves.
The A-lister paired the simple garment with colourful, leaf-patterned basketball shorts that boasted overly-long drawstrings and flashed his toned legs.
The 23-year-old sported a plain, white T-shirt that exposed the partial sleeves of tattoos etched on his arms.
...lunch at the popular sushi spot...
While sources told the online publication that the church did not advocate the cancellation of his tour it was mentioned He made his decision based on spiritual soul searching and his own view of the path in life he should be taking The scandalised celebrity kept it casual while getting...
According to TMZ: The decision stems from his relationship with Hillsong Church founder Carl Lentz, which allowed him to reflect on the 'own view on the path in life he should be taking'Leaving music behind?



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Minnie did a brilliant job and he believes Ashley would have as well.””
“With anything that I do or say so for that I m really sorry Driver also told the NYT she supported a model of truth and reconciliation referring to commissions that were established after the Rwandan genocide and South African apartheid in which victims of violence were given a platform...”
“In December, Damon told ABC News that the alleged sexual misconduct of powerful men represented a “spectrum of behavior,” explaining that he believes there is “a difference between patting someone on the butt and rape or child molestation.”
“Both of those behaviors need to be confronted and eradicated without question, but they shouldn’t be conflated.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“He also said I think it s wonderful that women are feeling empowered to tell their stories and it s totally necessary Driver who criticized Damon for the comments at the time told the New York Times on Tuesday that she feels Damon represented every intelligent nice white male who...”
“...feels it is their job to comment on the way that women metabolize stuff Image zoom Credit Rob Kim Getty Michael Loccisano Getty She added That somehow we should have a hierarchical system whereby touch on the arse is this tits is this you know front bottom back bottom over...”
“...the shirt rape...”
“That there would be some criteria Driver advocated for involving men in the women s movement saying there s no way to move forward unless we do this together In January Damon apologized for his controversial comments telling the Today show I really wish I d listened a lot more...”
“...before I weighed in on this...”
“Ultimately what it is for me is that I don’t want to further anybody’s pain.”


“Minnie did a brilliant job and he believes Ashley would have as well.”
With anything that I do or say so for that I m really sorry Driver also told the NYT she supported a model of truth and reconciliation referring to commissions that were established after the Rwandan genocide and South African apartheid in which victims of violence were given a platform...
In December, Damon told ABC News that the alleged sexual misconduct of powerful men represented a “spectrum of behavior,” explaining that he believes there is “a difference between patting someone on the butt and rape or child molestation.
Both of those behaviors need to be confronted and eradicated without question, but they shouldn’t be conflated.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.
He also said I think it s wonderful that women are feeling empowered to tell their stories and it s totally necessary Driver who criticized Damon for the comments at the time told the New York Times on Tuesday that she feels Damon represented every intelligent nice white male who...
...feels it is their job to comment on the way that women metabolize stuff Image zoom Credit Rob Kim Getty Michael Loccisano Getty She added That somehow we should have a hierarchical system whereby touch on the arse is this tits is this you know front bottom back bottom over...
...the shirt rape...
That there would be some criteria Driver advocated for involving men in the women s movement saying there s no way to move forward unless we do this together In January Damon apologized for his controversial comments telling the Today show I really wish I d listened a lot more...
...before I weighed in on this...
Ultimately what it is for me is that I don’t want to further anybody’s pain.



Number  196
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Guests on the first season include Gina Rodriguez, Rob Gronkowski, Randall Park, James Van Der Beek and Vanessa Hudgens.”
“Also Read: TBS Orders James Corden's 'Drop the Mic' to SeriesThe 16-episode series will premiere in the fall.”
““Dame on Dame, saying everything they’ve dreamt of saying for the last 30 years.”“It’s our Biggie and Tupac … it only ends with murder,” Karp wryly quipped.”
““If I could write a rap battle for anybody, it would be Dame Judi Dench.”“I’d like to see Judi Dench vs. Maggie Smith,” added Corden.”
“Also Read: Jennifer Hudson Raps About James Corden's Penis in London 'Drop the Mic' (Video)“Judi Dench is my pick,” Karp said.”
“The stars team up with the show’s writers and rappers to pen their verses, and the executive producers revealed who they’d most like to write for at the Television Critics Association press tour on Thursday.”
“The new TBS series, yet another musical spin-off of one of Corden’s “Late Late Show” bits, pits celebrities against one another in no-holds-barred rap battles in front of a live studio audience and hosts Method Man and Haley Baldwin.”
“James Corden and Jensen Karp, executive producers on TBS’s “Drop the Mic,” shared their dream rap battle: Judi Dench vs. Maggie Smith.”


Guests on the first season include Gina Rodriguez, Rob Gronkowski, Randall Park, James Van Der Beek and Vanessa Hudgens.
Also Read: TBS Orders James Corden's 'Drop the Mic' to SeriesThe 16-episode series will premiere in the fall.
“Dame on Dame, saying everything they’ve dreamt of saying for the last 30 years.”“It’s our Biggie and Tupac … it only ends with murder,” Karp wryly quipped.
“If I could write a rap battle for anybody, it would be Dame Judi Dench.”“I’d like to see Judi Dench vs. Maggie Smith,” added Corden.
Also Read: Jennifer Hudson Raps About James Corden's Penis in London 'Drop the Mic' (Video)“Judi Dench is my pick,” Karp said.
The stars team up with the show’s writers and rappers to pen their verses, and the executive producers revealed who they’d most like to write for at the Television Critics Association press tour on Thursday.
The new TBS series, yet another musical spin-off of one of Corden’s “Late Late Show” bits, pits celebrities against one another in no-holds-barred rap battles in front of a live studio audience and hosts Method Man and Haley Baldwin.
James Corden and Jensen Karp, executive producers on TBS’s “Drop the Mic,” shared their dream rap battle: Judi Dench vs. Maggie Smith.



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Swift will release her sixth studio album, Reputation, on Nov. 10, which includes the single "Look What You Made Me Do."”
“"We're thrilled to reach a deal to bring Taylor and her unique talents to her fans and our customers in new and exclusive ways," AT&T entertainment group CEO John Stankey said at the time.”
“Swift signed a multi-year deal with AT&T in October for future performances and content.”
“...video catalog available to AT T customers via the company s DirecTV Now streaming service...”
“Such a taxing day when they re like eat some cookie dough and you re like ok I ll make this sacrifice for my art go att com tsnbts1 A post shared by Taylor Swift taylorswift on Sep 7 2017 at 8 03am PDT Taylor Swift NOW is a curated...”
“"Such a taxing day when they're like 'eat some cookie dough' and you're like 'ok I'll make this sacrifice for my art,' Swift captioned a behind-the-scenes video from the commercial's shoot.”
“The pair previously collaborated on a skit for a 2014 episode of Saturday Night Live.”
“AdvertisementThe ad follows a fictional day in Swift's life, including her "unbelievable choreographed fight sequence" with Samberg.”
“The 27-year-old singer takes on the 39-year-old Brooklyn Nine-Nine star, gobbles cookie dough and returns to the studio in the commercial for Taylor Swift NOW.”
“File Photo by Phil McCarten/UPI | License PhotoSept. 7 (UPI) -- Taylor Swift battles actor Andy Samberg in a new ad for AT&T-DirecTV.”


Swift will release her sixth studio album, Reputation, on Nov. 10, which includes the single "Look What You Made Me Do."
"We're thrilled to reach a deal to bring Taylor and her unique talents to her fans and our customers in new and exclusive ways," AT&T entertainment group CEO John Stankey said at the time.
Swift signed a multi-year deal with AT&T in October for future performances and content.
...video catalog available to AT T customers via the company s DirecTV Now streaming service...
Such a taxing day when they re like eat some cookie dough and you re like ok I ll make this sacrifice for my art go att com tsnbts1 A post shared by Taylor Swift taylorswift on Sep 7 2017 at 8 03am PDT Taylor Swift NOW is a curated...
"Such a taxing day when they're like 'eat some cookie dough' and you're like 'ok I'll make this sacrifice for my art,' Swift captioned a behind-the-scenes video from the commercial's shoot.
The pair previously collaborated on a skit for a 2014 episode of Saturday Night Live.
AdvertisementThe ad follows a fictional day in Swift's life, including her "unbelievable choreographed fight sequence" with Samberg.
The 27-year-old singer takes on the 39-year-old Brooklyn Nine-Nine star, gobbles cookie dough and returns to the studio in the commercial for Taylor Swift NOW.
File Photo by Phil McCarten/UPI | License PhotoSept. 7 (UPI) -- Taylor Swift battles actor Andy Samberg in a new ad for AT&T-DirecTV.



Number  198
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020
...in January...
To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...
Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.
...inspiration...
RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...
As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.
But there will be a few tweaks.
For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.
This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.



Number  199
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In the photo, a smiling Jennings wears a hospital gown as she lies down on a pillow.”
““I’m doing great, thanks for all of the love and support,” she tweeted alongside the selfie.”
“Next year, the transgender teen’s reality series, I Am Jazz, will be returning to TLC for a fifth season, and when it does, audiences will see Jennings undergo the life-changing operation.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““It’s happening!” Jennings, 17, says in a YouTube video.”
““Season 5 is going to be super exciting.”“As many of you know, I did get my gender confirmation surgery — woo woo!”
“— and I am doing super well.”
“I can’t wait for all of you to see that journey as I go through it,” she shares.”
““It’s definitely going to be a journey.”Image zoom Jazz Jennings | Credit: TLCIn footage that was captured at the hospital ahead of the surgery, Jennings snaps her fingers and says “let’s do this” before heading into the operating room.”
““Also this season, you’ll see me turning 18 years old.”


In the photo, a smiling Jennings wears a hospital gown as she lies down on a pillow.
“I’m doing great, thanks for all of the love and support,” she tweeted alongside the selfie.
Next year, the transgender teen’s reality series, I Am Jazz, will be returning to TLC for a fifth season, and when it does, audiences will see Jennings undergo the life-changing operation.
Get push notifications with news, features and more.
“It’s happening!” Jennings, 17, says in a YouTube video.
“Season 5 is going to be super exciting.”“As many of you know, I did get my gender confirmation surgery — woo woo!
— and I am doing super well.
I can’t wait for all of you to see that journey as I go through it,” she shares.
“It’s definitely going to be a journey.”Image zoom Jazz Jennings | Credit: TLCIn footage that was captured at the hospital ahead of the surgery, Jennings snaps her fingers and says “let’s do this” before heading into the operating room.
“Also this season, you’ll see me turning 18 years old.



Number  200
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.3539325842696629
Correct number is  63
Total number is  178
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
